RINGWOOD THE ROVER.
CHAPTER I.
The
earliest dawning of a lovely summer
day, in the year 1659, was pouring its sweet
light, unclouded yet with that fierce heat
which renders almost insupportable the
noontide
hours, over the forests which encircled,
with a belt of ever-during verdure, the Spanish
city of St. Augustine. It was already in
those days a place of much importance, with
nunneries, and steepled churches, and
terraced
dwellings, with white walls and
jalousies
peeping from out the foliage of dark
orange groves, and all those beautiful
peculiarities
of semi-Moorish taste, which lend so
much of poetry and of romance to the old
towns of Spain. It had its flanking walls,
its ditches, and its palisades, presenting their
impregnable resistance to the fierce and wily
Indian, whom the relentless cruelty of the
white colonist, of whatsoever nation, had at
length goaded into systematic and continual
hostility; in seaward bastions, with
water-gate
and demilune, mounted with heavy
cannon
,
and garrisoned by old Castilians, under
an officer who bore the style of royal
governor
.
Such was the aspect of the place at the
conclusion of the first century which had
elapsed since its foundation; nurtured into
undue maturity by the stern bigotry and
energetic enterprise of that land, which had
filled the southern continent with giant-cities,
over whose ramparts floated its proud motto
of Plus Ultra, marking every spot whereon its
sons had set a foot by massacre and
blood-shed
and drained from El Doradoas they
justly termed itthese vast but fatal
treasures
,
which raised it for a little while above
all nations of the earth, only to plunge it in
the end into effeminacy and ruin and effete
barbarism.
The heavy dews, as they were exhaled by
the rising day god, teemed with the incense
of unnumbered perfumes wafted from the ten
thousand vegetable wonders which had given
name to that peninsula, wherein credulity,
insatiate of all that nature had bestowed with
profuse bounty, had placed the seat of all
those monstrous fictions which alchymists
had palmed upon their dupes, until they
brought themselves to deem them real. The
land-breeze swept far seaward the rich odors
from the orange groves, and the vast forests
whence gleamed frequently the snowy
chalices
of the superb magnolia, and the dense
star-like blossoms of the flowering dogwood,
and colored the azure waters of the Gulf into
a thousand tiny wavelets, which sparkled
with innumerable smiles to the bright heaven,
while the thrilling and prolonged notes of
the emulous mocking-birdsnightingales of
the west, with scarce inferior songmade
everything resound with their rich liquid
melody. On earthon oceanand in the
cloudless ether, all was calm, lovely, peaceful
but on the bastions of the town there was
the din of arms, the dissonant harsh clang of
mingling voices, the hurrying to and fro of
soldiery, the long roll of the drum beating to
arms in haste, blent with the piercing strain
of trumpets, and the continuous peal of bells,
rung backward, as it seemed, in token of
dismay and danger.
Beneath the yellow flag with its tri-castled
blazonry, surrounded by a group of
noble-looking
men, clad for the most part in the
half-armor of the day, with much of waving
plumage, rich lace, and fair embroidery, stood
the governor, Juan Melendez de Aviles,
descendant
of that Pedro, of the same noble
name, who, by an exertion of both skill and
valor, which, had they not been tarnished
by the most fiendish cruelty, would have
been deemed heroical, won for the second
Philip the fair province from the French
Huguenots
of Coligny. The eyes of all that
little group were intently fixed upon the sea,
from which it would appear the apprehended
dangerif apprehended danger it were, that
gave rise to those tokens of surprise and
preparationwas most to be expected, and
in the visages of all, an evident expression
of anxiety and doubt was marked, in its least
doubtful character. But in the face of no
one there, were there such signs of
perturbation
and dismay, as in that of the governor.
He was a man of large and heavy build, a
veteran of many a bloody war, with limbs
which, although deprived somewhat of agility
and lightness by the unsparing hand of time,
were cast in a mould of iron; his features
prominent, bold, and haughty, with a world
of iron resolution in the firmly compressed
mouth, and massive jaw, and a glance of
intolerable fire in the dark eye; and his
bearing
,
such as became a cavalier to whom the
camp and court had been alike familiar from
his first boyhood. But now his rich dress
was in disarray; a leathern shoulder-belt
with an immense two-handed sword attached
to it, and a display of cumbersome and
ill-wrought
pistols thrust hastily into a broad
buff-girdle, assorted ill with a fair garb of
courtly fashion; his long hair, once as black
as jet, but now discolored with full many a
streak of wintry grey, hung in disordered
masses over his broad brow, lank, and
uncurled
,
and gracelessand on his brow the
perspiration stood in drops, like bubbles on
the bosom of some turbid streamand the
deep olive tints of his complexion wore an
unnatural and ghastly hueand, as he
grasped a powerful perspective-glass with
which he ever and anon swept the horizon,
his fingers might be seen to work in quick
convulsive twitches, as though they would
have bedded themselves into the polished
brass.
Nothing? he said, after a long and
wistful gaze, I can see nothing seaward.
Yet right sure am I, that those sounds were
of far-distant ordnance. It is the twelfth too
of the month, and long ere this, the caravel
we were advised of should have been safe in
harbor. Hark! hark! heard ye not then,
he cried, heard ye not that dull roar to the
eastward? Pedro, Gutierrez, hearken-what
say ye, cavaliers, is 't not the voice of
ordnance
?
Past doubt, it is, replied the elder of the
gentlemen he had addressed, and heavy
ordnance too.
And lo! a sail! exclaimed the other,
who had directed his glass instantly towards
the quarter whence the sounds proceeded,
I marvel how we saw her not before. Here!
here, your Excellency! here! bring your
palmetto in the range of the east angle of the
demilune, and you will catch her! Now, by
St. Jago, I can see her to the courses; three
tiers of wide-spread canvas!
I have her now, replied Melendez,
thoughtfully, I have her now. 'Tis she;
it is El Santo Espiritu, past doubt; but
wherefore
was she firing? Pray Heaven, these
cursed English, these infernal rovers, be not
upon her track!
I fear me much it is so, answered
Gutierrez
.
I fear me much it is so; for ever
and anon, I fancy I catch glimpses, as they
rise upon the waves, of smaller sails behind,
and further yet to the eastward. Lo! now
in range with you skiff upon the beach
there! it has sunk againand now, again,
I catch it!
Ay! and again she fires! pray Heaven
she have the heels of them; once under our
guns, she were in safety from any armament
which they can bring against her!
Meanwhile the vessel, which had been
first seen hull-down in the far offing, was
rising rapidly as she drew near, not having
met as yet the counter-influence of the
land-breeze
but
scarce less rapidly rose, one by
one, the smaller barks, which had at first
escaped the notice of the eager and excited
watchers; until five low and rakish craft
might be distinctly seen in chase of the tall
frigate. One somewhat larger than the rest,
three-masted, but of the same sharp and
picarooning build, was now so near astern,
that she was able to keep up a constant firing
from her bow-guns, which the caravel
returned
with her stern chasers; though it was
evident by the rate at which she rode the
waves, staggering along with every stitch of
sail set that could draw, that she was most
sincerely anxious to avoid close action with
her diminutive antagonist. An hour had
elapsed at most since she had been at first
made out; and had there been anything of
real doubt as to the nation of the frigate, or
the character of her pursuers, that doubt was
now entirely at an end; for at the distance
of about five miles, by the aid of strong
glasses, it was not difficult to note the castled
bows and poop of the tall caravella, bristling
with culverin and demi-cannon, or to
distinguish
the proud bearings of Castile upon
the yellow colors which, in the hope perhaps
of bringing help and succor from the friendly
fort and city, she wore not only at her three
mastheads, but at the bowsprit-end, and some
six or seven other points conspicuous in her
rigging. Meanwhile, the foremost of the
chasing squadron had hoisted at her peak the
snowy field of England, with the broad
bright St. George's cross, while at each one
of her masts' heads a bloody flag with the
black skull and cross bones proclaimed her
real character.
And now the agony of Juan de Melendez
had become fearfully, intensely visible; to
and fro upon the narrow esplanade above the
water-gate, with quick, uneven steps, and
features haggard with excitement, did he
stalk during that long hour; now pausing
for an instant to note the progress of the chase,
and now with a despairing gesture again
resuming
his distracted walkhis officers
surveying
him the while with looks denoting
deep commiseration, but more of that
surprise
,
which must have been felt by men
ignorant of the cause of his strange gestures
and bewildered mien.
She will escape them yet! Be of good
cheer, cried one, a young and noble-looking
gallant, be of good cheer, your Excellency;
she brings the sea-breeze up with her right
manfully!
Aye doth she, cried another, for the
nonce; but wait till she strike the
counter-blast
;
lo! you may see it ruffling the surface
now within a mile of her!
And when she doth, exclaimed the
younger officer, she can beat in, I trow;
tack and tack, merrily; and they can but
beat after her. Why in half an hour more
she will be safe here, under our batteries!
Not so! not so! cried Juan de
Melendez
,
mournfully, she never will lie here at
anchor any more, if she trust to her sails!
Curse on the fool Davila, that turns not on
that paltry picaroon, and crushes her at three
broadsides before her consorts may come up!
See you not, Pedro, and see you not, Diego,
who art a mariner so skilfulsee you not
that the sea-breeze even now has failed them,
and that the land-wind dies away momently?
God! God of my fathers! that we must stand
here helpless, and strike no blow in her
behalf
.
Yet! yet! if he would tack, while
he hath way upon her, he might engage the
pirate yard-arm to yard-arm, and so quell
him; but even now he loses; he
hath
lost
it! His sails flap idly to the mast; it is dead
calm! Fool! fool! accursed fool! and he
hath anchored.
But it is no less calm for them!
picaroons
though they be, and manned by devils,
yet cannot they make sail, more than the
caravella!
Look! was the sole reply of the
wellnigh
distracted governorLook!and it
needed but a glance to show that the ill-fated
frigate had now, indeed, no hope but in the
vigor of her own defencefor low and light,
and built no less for oars than sails, the wind
had scarcely left them, a half league at the
most astern of the Spaniard, ere they had
furled their lateen sails, and getting out their
sweeps, came up scarce slower than before,
crowded with men whose weapons might be
seen momentarily glancing to the broad
sunshine
.
My childgreat Godmy child! cried
Juan de Melendez, his pale features writhing
with horrible intensity of anguishWould,
would that thou wert dead, Teresa! And is
all lost?is all lost, gentlemen? Shake not
your heads, look not so gloomily upon me;
can ye devise no scheme, no hope, no
possibility
and
yet how should ye, when we
have neither boat nor even store enough of
pirogues in the bay, to bear them any succor?
Oh! would, would Heaven, that I had died,
I care not how disgracefully, so that I were
but
dead, ere I had been so fettered here, to
look thus helpless on the murder of my
comrades
the
worse than murder of mine
innocent
and lovely child! and thou, Don
Amadis
,
thou who hast dared to lift the eyes of
love to hercanst thou stand statuelike and
strike no blow for her? Canst thou endure
almost to hear the shrieks, almost to look
upon the form, of her thou wouldst have
wedded, writhing in agony in the foul arms
of the licentious buccaneer! A man! a
gentleman
!
ha! ha! a soldierha! ha! ha! a
man, a gentleman, a soldier, and an old
Castilian
look tamely on the violation of his
bride, before the very eyes of her insulted
father!
Answer him not, Don Amadisthe
grey-haired
veteran Pedro interposedanswer
him not, I pray; this is sheer madnessthe
pardonable madness of parental anguish!
And you, Sir Juanhe continued, turning
half-frantic to the governorthink you not
if we were to clear the long guns of the
southern bastion, we might yet drive those
picarooning scoundrels from their prey
methinks
the caravella lies even now within
their range?
No! no! you but deceive yourselves
there is no hope! none! none! Nathless we
may essay itand see, Davila hath slipped
even now his cables, hath got his boats out,
and tows cheerily towards us. Away there,
ye knave cannoniers, clear the long
culverins
,
ourselves, we will go down and point
them. And with these words, followed by
all his train, he hastily rushed down the
narrow
stairway of the rampart, passed through
the sally-port, and in a moment was engaged
among the guns, with an anxiety and zeal
that for a moment quelled his mental agony.
The caravella now was but a short mile
from the seaward batteries, towed by the
whole strength of her crew, rowing with that
tremendous energy which the consciousness
that all is centred in his own exertions, lends to
the meanest and the feeblest man that draws
the breath of life! One half mile more
would have ensured her safety. It was a
fearful chase! So close behind her was the
best manned and largest of the picaroons,
that now the fire, which had been for awhile
suspended, again became hot, animated, and
destructive. And now the mizen of the
caravel came thundering, with all its hamper,
over her groaning side, encumbering her
fatally, and lessening her way through the
calm waters; while at the sight a long, loud
yell of savage exultation burst from the
desperadoes
who had wrought that ruin, and
penetrated even to the ears of the appalled
spectators. Hitherto no opportunity had been
given to the Spaniards on the fortress for
firing a gun in aid of their companions; since
the three-masted galley, conscious of her
advantage
,
kept herself by her sweeps and oars
under the stern of the tall frigate, raking her
fore and aft by a continual fire of her single
gun, a culverin of the first class, avoiding
thus alike the heavy ordnance of her
broadside
,
and the yet heavier metal of the
batteries
which were deterred from firing lest they
should injure their own friends! But now
two other of the pirates, which, in the chase,
had made each a long circuit on the starboad
and larboard tacks, keeping as much as
possible
out of the frigate's range, having shot
far ahead of her, changed suddenly their
course, putting their bows each right towards
the other, and pulling with great speed to cut
her off from her desired haven. On these, at
the same instant, opened the frigate's fire,
gun after gun from both broadsides, a fierce
incessant cannonade! and the tremendous
salvo of the batteries. The whole shores
seemed to rock with the concussion! the
little
air there had been heretofore, stilled by
the fearful shock, sank utterly; and, ere ten
minutes had elapsed, the surface of the water
was covered by a dense mass of volumed
smoke, so closely packed that not an eye of
all who gazed so fearfully upon the scene,
could note vessel, or boat, or any living
being
,
though still from out the vapory cloud
the glare of the incessant cannonading might
be seen crimsoning the misty wreaths, which
every shot angmented.
Hold! hold! after awhile exclaimed
Melendez, let the smoke lift, this random
firing goes for naught; let it lift, we shall see
anon!
And at his orders instantly the firing from
the battery stopped, but not for that did the
dense vapors lift at all from the still surface
of the waters, nor did the prospect brighten
fed constantly as were those murky clouds
by the continual cannonading of the vessels,
which in no degree ceased or abated. If the
sight had been anxious heretofore, the
interest
appalling, when every motion of
assailant
or assailed might be distinctly noticed,
what must have been the anguish now, the
agony of expectation, when the fierce work
of death was doing at their very doors, under
the muzzles of their cannon, and they might
neither see nor judge by any sense or sign, to
which side fortune was inclining. The first
sound that attracted any near attention, was
the quick dash of oars close to the beach;
and, as each countenance was instantly
directed
to the jouful echo, boat after boat of
thoseit needed not a second glance to tell
itwhich had been last seen towing
shoreward
El Santo Espiritu, loomed through the
dusky veil, and, almost as they came in
sight, grated upon the shingly beach; while
their crews, throwing down their oars, rushed
madly up the slope in desperate confusion
towards the sally-port.
Ten thousand curses on the dogs!
fiercely hissed Juan de Melendez through his
hard set teeth; they have deserted her! but
not the better shall they fare for that! level
your arquebuses, guard; depress your
culverins
;
sweep the deserting scoundrels from
the earth!
But to his fiery command no answer was
returned, and no obedience rendered; for
during the last pause the firing had sunk, and
from the bosom of the smoke, wild cheers,
and all the tumult of heavy fight, were now
distinctly audible. In a few seconds' space,
the vapors gradually lightened, so that the
vessels might be seen, though faintly,
clustered
together in close contact. Anon the
breeze came up again, fitful at first and faint,
but freshening at every moment; and then,
whirled upward from the now rippling waters,
the smoky masses were swept boldly to
leeward
,
leaving the whole of the bright bay,
the verdant shores, and the pure heavens
rejoicing
in the gorgeous sunshine.
Far in the middle of that bay lay the
devoted
caravella, her sheets loosened and her
canvas flying disorderly and wild, while
grappling
to her sides, her stern, her bows, the
low barques of the pirates hemmed her in,
their savage crews mounting her bulwarks
in resistless numbers, their brandished
weapons
glancing to the sun, and their appalling
yells deadening the hearts of all who heard
them. Unharmed by the guns from the too
distant ramparts, the light picaroons had
succeeded
in cutting in between the frigate and
her boats, leaving no chance of safety to the
latter but precipitate and sudden flight, and
to the former no hope, save the precarious
chances of a pirate's mercy. Nor was it
long in doubt to the spectators what was that
mercy; for ere the fight, or massacre, more
properly, upon her decks had ceased, the
wily desperadoes anchored just without
cannon
shot; and as the Spanish ensign was
torn down, amid a tumult of tremendous
exultation, man after man of the defendants
was hurled overboard, so that their
terror-stricken
countrymen upon the battlements
might see the waters, ever as they fell,
lashed
into froth and spray by the ferocious
sharks, which, taught by their voracious
instincts
the consequence of battle, seized each
one as he touched the surface, tugging and
snapping at each other for every palpitating
morsel. And still more terrible than this the
howls of menhowls, such as nothing but
the utmost and most excruciating tortures
could force from human lipsmixed with the
shriller and more piteous shrieks of women,
told that the fate of those, who had become a
prey to the disgusting fish, was but a boon
of mercy when compared with the more awful
doom of those preserved from the first carnage
to satiate the victors' love of blood or beauty.
All day long did this fearful sight
continue
all
day long were the heavens polluted
by the atrocious deeds they were compelled
to witness, pierced by the frantic cries of
those who called on them in vain for succor
or for mercy. The evening was now
drawing
nigh, although, perhaps, some three hours
yet remained of daylight, when by a
simultaneous
movement of the frigate's decks, it
might be judged that some new project had
been fixed on by the buccaneers. Nor were
the garrison devoid, if not of absolute fear, at
least of much anxiety; since it was evident
that their relentless enemies were in great
force, not counting less, as they might
calculate
,
from the known habits of the Caribbean
pirates of stowing, in their long barques, as
many men as possibly could be contained in
them, than seven hundred, or perhaps a
thousand
soldiers; more fighting men than which
St. Augustine could not, at that day, have
turned out, though to preserve herself from
utter ruin. Nor was it contrary by any means,
or foreign to the policy of these far-dreaded
rovers to attack villages, or even forts and
cities, when in sufficient numbers to render
success probable, and when enough of
plunder
or of licentious pleasure might be looked
forward to, as the result of their bold daring!
A levy of the citizens
en masse
was instantly
resorted to, arms were distributed, even among
the slaves, whose terrors, not inferior to those
of their masters, rendered it safe to trust them
with the weapon, which, at another time,
they would have probably directed against
the bosoms of the givers. Cannon were
levelled, ammunition piled by every gun, and
all precautions taken which could ensure a
desperate resistance. The pallor and the
gloom had passed away from the dark visage
of Melendez, with the uncertainty which had
so terribly distracted him. Sure as he felt
himself now to be, that she, his treasured
child, the only being on whom his stern soul
doated, had endured the last and most appal
ling woe that can befall a woman! that now
her agoniesher innocenceher woes were
at an end for ever! he had again resumed his
soldierly and high demeanor! His face was
deeply flushed, and his eyebrows contracted
over the fiery orbs they shaded, till these
could scarcely have been noted but for the
flashes of fierce light which they, at times,
shot forth. His lips alone were pale and
ashy, so violent was their compression over
his clenched teeth!
Would God, said he, when every
preparation
was concluded, would God, that they
might try it! So should they feel a father's
vengeance.
Nor did it seem improbable that his
vengeful
prayer would be immediately and fully
granted; for now the pirate-barques might be
observed to put off, one by one, from the
dismantled
and abandoned frigate; a single
small boat only waiting, as it would seem,
for their commander. Diverging slowly, and
in opposite directions, but carefully
preserving
a safe distance from the batteries, they
came to anchor each after each, the nearest
about half a mile from their prize; and as
the last swung round, the crew of the
remaining
skiff were seen getting, in all haste, to
their oars. By aid of their naked eyes, the
Spaniards now beheld a group of officers
appear
upon the bulwarks of the caravel, from
which were lowered instantly three figures,
two of which were females, into the cutter at
the gangway. All, then, passed over the
ship's side, but one, who disappearing for a
moment through the cabin hatch, returned
bearing a lighted flambeau; deliberately then
he set on fire, in some twenty different places,
the slighter cordage and the sails of the
ill-fated
ship, and ere he glided down a rope
into his boat, the forked tongues of flame
might be seen darting up the shrouds and
masts like fiery serpents; and in a few short
minutes, the whole of that magnificent and
stately fabric, which had so lately walked the
waters like a thing of life, was one huge
pyramid of roaring and devouring flame.
Strongly and rapidly did that boat's crew
give way, and little time enough had they to
place themselves in safety; for fired already
in the hold before they left her, they had not
traversed half the space between her and
their nearest barque, before, with an
explosion
that might be heard leagues away into
the pathless forest, startling the wild beast
and the wilder Indian in his lair, and with a
wide and circling glare that for an instant
made the broad daylight pallid, the caravel
blew up! A mass of pitchy smoke settled for
a short space upon the water where she lay,
and as it drifted seaward, a few rent planks
and mouldering spars were all remaining of
that noblest work of man's invention.
After a little while, the skiff came to under
the lee of the three-masted picaroon, and
nothing
more was seen by the excited Spaniards,
until a burst of flame from a bow-port of the
felucca, and the dull roar of an unshotted
gun, woke their attention. With the report,
down came the English ensign from the fore,
down came the red flag from her peak, and
in succession a broad white field, in sign of
truce and amity, waved in the place of each.
Upon the signal, each in succession of the
pirates fired a leeward gun, and hoisted a
white flag; and next, ere half an hour had
elapsed, all the boats of the squadron, twenty
at least in number, might be seen to put off
from the barques, each bearing the same
amicable
signal at their bows; and after joining,
which they did at the first practicable point,
to pull on steadily, in beautiful and accurate
array, towards the shore.
Eagerly did the Spaniards watch these
singular manuvres, and with keen scrutiny
did they observe each several barge; but it
was not until they had arrived within a short
space of the beach, that they might make out
clearly the forms and features of those who
occupied them. Nor could they as yet do
this to their satisfaction, when observing that
no flag of truce was displayed from the
ramparts
,
they became stationary, just without
the surf, pulling a stroke or two at times
merely to hold their own, for the tide was
now fast ebbing. Scarce had they halted,
before a figure rose up in the bow of the
central boata powerful barge pulling with
forty oarsand waving a white flag about
his head, shouted some words, which did not
reach, however, the ears for which they were
intended, although there could be no doubt
of their import.
Shall we respond to their signal, fair
Senor? exclaimed the veteran Diego; I
trow 'twere best to answer them! it may be
well; they hold some of our friends to
ransom
!
No truce; no flag! fiercely replied
Melendez
,
I waited but to get them within our
point blank range! take good sight,
cannoniers
!
look to your match! fi
Hold! for God's sake, hold! cried young
Don Amadis, leaping before the muzzle of the
gun, and grasping by the arm the impetuous
governor.
See you not there, and with the eyes
almost
starting from his head, and lips apart,
and outstretched hands, he pointed to the
signal boat. See you not it is she?
Slowly Melendez caught his meaning
turned his glass towards the barge, wherein
the quick eye of the youthful lover had
detected
the form of his intended bridedropped
it from his unnerved and powerless hand, and
with a quick shrill cry, My daughtermy
Teresa! sank helpless as a child into the
arms of his attendants; while, catching
instantly
their cue, the cannoniers flung down
their linstocks, and in three minutes' time a
flag of truce was waving in the place of
Castile's
gorgeous blazonry.
CHAPTER II.
Scarcely
had the white flag of truce replaced
the castled blazonry of Spain, before a loud
hail rang from boat to boat throaghout the
pirate squadron, and the large forty-oared
barge leading, they pulled so swiftly
shoreward
,
that scarce a moment seemed to have
elapsed before the whole flotilla was battling
against the heavy surf that tumbled in, with
its deep booming roar, upon the narrow strip
of sand which lay between the bastions and
the seaand scarce another passed before
they were beached high and dry, with their
oars shipped, in easy shot of arquebuse
from water-gate and demi-lune. A more
superb
and gorgeous spectacle can hardly be
imagined, than was presented to the eye on
the disembarkation of the buccaneers; for
such at that time were the profits of their
lawless
and unholy trade, that not the meanest
mariner who toiled before the mast, but had his
gala suit of velvet and embroidery, his silken
hose, his arms inlaid with gold and silver,
and his rich chain of precious metal about his
brawny neck; and, as it ever was their wont
when on the eve of battle to don their most
magnificent attire, all now, from the great
captain downward to the humblest rower,
were decked in such pomp as to put to shame
even the splendid uniforms of the Castilian
cavaliers. It was, however, on the great
barge that every eye was riveted; for in her
bow a group was seated, that must have
awakened the most lively interest even in a
stranger's bosomupon a pile of cushions
covered with crimson damask, a portion
evidently
of the spoil snatched from the hapless
caravella, exposed to the full glare of the
burning sun, reclined a girl of most rare
loveliness
.
Sixteen or seventeen years at the
utmost
had passed over her fair head, but they
were years of a ripe southern climate, and so
just was the rich swelling outline of her every
limb, so perfect the development of her whole
figure, that in less genial regions she would
have been taken for a woman of some four
or five-and-twenty summers. Her complexion
was of that rich and sunny tint peculiar to
the most lovely regions of the European
continent
;
her hair black as the raven's wing,
and, if it be possible, even more lustrous
although it had been braided closely above
her high pale browdisordered now, and
torn from its symmetrical arrangement, flowed
in dishevelled masses over her neck and
shoulders; while one or two stray stresses
falling upon a bosom, that might have vied
in beauty with that of the Medicean Venns,
afforded a strange contrast by their jetty
blackness, to the almost unnatural whiteness
of the pure spotless flesh, on which they
restedfor not her tresses only, but all her
vestments had been disarranged and rent by
the licentious grasp of ruffian hands; the
graceful folds of the mantilla were no
longer there, to lend their friendly shade to
those sweet modest features; the full
basquina
of dark silk had been stript violently
from those lovely limbs, now all too much
disclosed through the thin draperies of the
single linen garment, which a precarious
mercy had conceded to her virgin blushes.
Nor had this wretched boon been granted as
it would seem without reluctance, perhaps
without the violent interposition of some
powerful protector; for from the neck quite
downward to the girdle, it had been riven
open by some cruel hand, which had left on
its sullied folds the distinct score of five
ensanguined
fingers, and now fell wide apart,
revealing to the wanton sunbeams one
sloping
ivory shoulder, and the whole of the
voluptuous bosom, which never had before
been so unveiled, even to the chaste glance
of the maiden moon. Her exquisitely rounded
arms, bare to the shoulders, were bound fast
behind her back, and the small foot which
peeped forth from below the hem of the
chemise, was not unsandalled only, but
encrusted
with a deep crimson coat of human
gore, contracted from the bloody decks of the
ill-fated caravella.
At the feet of this lovely being, whose
cheeks, pallid with agony and terror, had
long forgot to blush in the extremity of
anguish, bound like her mistress and yet
more brutally despoiled of her apparel,
crouched a negro girl, whose skin, of the
most polished jet, relieved the pale
complexion
of the Spanish lady, even as a
pedestal of sable marble sets off a statue
wrought in snow white alabaster. A little
way apart from these, there lay a slender
stripling, whose unfledged chin was not yet
clothed with the first down of manhood,
fettered
so torturingly hand and foot, that the
blood oozed in large broad gouts from the
pores of his swollen limbs; while a long
gash on his forehead, about which his
close-curled
locks were stiff with clotted gore, and
his whole person swart with the smoke of
gunpowder, and dabbled with the blood of
both himself and his assailants, showed
plainly that his desperate resistance had
been the cause of these unnatural and
needless
bonds. Erect behind this miserable
group, standing aloft upon the rocking
thwarts, as firmly as if his feet were planted
on the solid earth, one finger of his right
hand slightly leaning against the slender staff,
whence waved the flag of truce, towered far
above the rest, one whose commanding
aspect and proud bearing, no less than his
gorgeous dress, at once bespoke him the
commander of the buccaneers. Six feet at
least in height, broad shouldered, and
deep-chested
,
his person, notwithstanding, was so
admirably rounded, his waist so slender, and
all his limbs so just in their proportions, so
compact in their easy contour, that the
extraordinary
and almost Herculean power of his
frame was not observable, but on a close and
accurate survey. His lineaments were,
although
wearing a mingled expression of
licentiousness, effrontery, and daring,
decidedly
regular and even handsome; nor was there
any line or trait which could betoken cruelty
or fierceness. The eyes of a deep greyish
blue, although large and well-opened, were
rather sleepy than the reverse, in their
ordinary aspect: while of the mouth, that
most expressive feature of the face, the most
decided characterblended with much of firm
and dauntless resolution, and no little of
contemptuous
haughtinesswas passionate
voluptuousness
.
He wore no hair upon his
face, which, though much sunburnt, and
even swarthy from exposure to the fierce sun
of the tropics, was by no means flushed or
ruddyneither mustache nor whisker
except
one peaked tuft upon his lower lip,
many shades darker than the sunny locks
which fell in natural curls over the collar of
his doublet. The garments of this
remarkable
figure were no less striking than his
personal
appearance. Upon his head, set very
much to the right, so as to leave the waving
ringlets of the other side free to the breeze
and sunshine, he had a small cap of dark
purple velvet, encircled by three folds of a
delicate
chain, or fanfaronathe workmanship
of which, although the metal was pure gold,
surpassed in value its materialand further
decorated by a single ostrich-feather, near
half an ell in length, of perfect whiteness.
Over a full-sleeved vest of snowy satin,
fastened
at the bosom by a dozen buttons
each one a solid pearl as large as a hazel-nut
all linked together by a slight Venetian
chain, he wore a sleeveless coat of the same
velvet with his cap, laced down the seams
with gold, lined with white silk, and decked
with pendant studs of gold filagree, and loops
of bullion. White satin breeches, and white
silken hose with gold clocks, and red-heeled
shoes, completed his attire; but round his
waist was twisted a sash of purple network.
entwined with strands of gold, from which
hung at the opposite sides his basket-hilted
rapier, and a long two-edged dagger in a
shark-skin scabbardwhile a broad baldric
of the same materials, thrown over his right
shoulder, supported not less than six pistols
of rare workmanship and finish. The rowers
who propelled this powerful barge, were all
attired in velvet caps and jerkins, with
plumes, and scarfs of costly silk, and chains
of gold and jewelryand, like their leader,
were all armed to the teeth with cutlass,
dirk, and pistols; while through the whole
length of the vessel were stacked, ready to
their hands, the heavy musquetoons or
carbines
of the day. The crews of the other
boats, which swept on, all abreast, scarce an
oar's length asunder, were adorned with
equal splendor; and as they leaped ashore,
and fell into a serried line, with ported
carbines
seven
hundred men in number at the
smallest calculationa more magnificent
array can scarcely be conceived, than was
drawn up before the gaze of the dismayed
and anxious Spaniards.
After a pause of a few minutes, which
seemed ages to the distracted father, who
had recovered from his swoon to a full sense
of his anguish, the splendid captain of the
pirates advanced alone, a pistol shot in front
of the well-ordered buccaneers, followed at
a respectful distance by four others, whose
dress, as sumptuous, though less tasteful
than that of their superior, betokened them
the officers of the inferior vessels. Behind
these men, again, stepped forth as many
privates
,
two and two, leading between them
the damsel and the stripling, who, with the
negro maiden, were now the sole survivors
from about two hundred souls, the crew and
passengers of the proud frigate, of which
not now a wreck remained, to tell how she
had sailed the deep in fleet and fearless
beauty.
Ho! Juan de Melendezhe exclaimed,
when he had drawn so near the walls, that
every accent of his deep voice could be heard
with easeJuan Melendez de Aviles, I
summon thee forthwith to yield this city,
and these forts, named of St. Augustine, to
our mercy! He spoke in pure Castilian
Spanish, though with a trifling foreign
accent
;
so light indeed, that but to an ear well
practised it would not have been at all
perceptible
.
And who art thou, who summonest so
boldly?returned the governor, manning
himself to endure the torture, which his high
sense of duty and of honor told him he
might not even hope to shunand what
hast thou to set forth as a reasonable cause,
why we, the armed and numerous possessors
of strong works mounting much and heavy
ordnance, well found and victualled for a
six months' siege, should yield us to a
handful
,
without artillery to batter our defences,
or ladders to assail our ramparts!
Iif it could avail thee anything to
knowreplied the pirate, his lip writhing
as he spoke, with bitter scornI am called
RingwoodReginald Ringwood, once of
merry EnglandThink, Juan Melendez,
think! If thine ear may not find something
familiar in that soundask thy false heart
to prompt it!and for a causebehold these
arguments!perchance, though thine eye
may not recognise a man whom thy tongue,
scarce six years ago, styled friend and
brother, it may be more successful in
deciphering
the lineaments of this girl-like
stripling
!
And what of these? replied the father,
struggling vainly to conceal the agonies of
his paternal terrorswhat of these
innocent
,
defenceless children!or what have
they to make with the rendition of this
city?
Innocentand defenceless! sneered the
buccaneer, and knew not Juan de Aviles,
any child, ever, as innocentas defenceless
asnay, ten thousand times morelovely
and more lovedto whom, nor beauty, nor
innocence, nor helplessness, availed
anything
?
Now, by the great God, Spaniard,
he continued, lashing himself as he went on
into a state of fierce and terrible excitement,
now, by the great God, Spaniard, that
shall judge between us two, thou hast but
sealed thy doom! What, dost thou ask,
have these to make with the rendition of this
city! This!very simply this! That if,
within one hour, the city be not rendered to
our pleasure, your boy shall die upon the
beach before thine eyes, by such variety of
torture, as never yet racked human sinews!
And for the girlthou shalt behold her
undergo
things, fiftynay! but fifty thousand
times more terrible than death protracted and
made horrible by the most lingering torments.
Choose! thou hast but one hour!
And what if we should render usnot
that the mere thought of such a deed is
possible
!quivering
with anguish in every
iron limb, the Spaniard answeredwhat
terms dost thou offer if we should render
us?
Life! was the stern reply. Life to
the soldiers of the garrison, and liberty to
march out with their arms and three rounds
of munition! We know your numbers, fair
sir, far too well to dread them! Thy son
and daughter shall be restored to thee unhurt
for the rest we will hold the city for three
days' space, using all property,
all persons
therein, as our ownand at the three days'
end, we take with us whatsoe'er we list!
up anchors! and sheet topsails home! and
farewell to fair St. Augustine!
With an unutterable air of blank dismay,
the officers upon the bastion gazed in each
other's faces. The terms were such as men
could not endureand the alternative scarce
less appalling!
The agony, the mute, despairing, ghastly
torture
depicted in every speaking featurein the
dull, scarcely conscious air of Juan's eye, in the
convulsive writhing of his pale ashy lip, from
which the gnawing teeth, though they bit deep
and keenly, could force no drop of blood
were scarcely more heartrending than the
tremendous bursts of passionate and impotent
phrensy, with which the youthful loverthe
noble, brave, and beautiful Don Amadis, raved
with mad gestures and wild imprecations, to
and fro the ramparts.
Beware! after a long, awful interval,
during which he had gloated with a mixed
expression of pleasure, exultation, and
contempt
,
over the evident misery of the man
whom, as his dark words and half-uttered hints
implied, he had good cause to hate, with that
unbending and insatiate hatred, which, if
intensity
may give any token whereby to estimate
duration, may survive even death itself.
Beware
,
I say! cried Ringwood, and now, I
speak in mercy! Beware, I say, how thou
decidest. For by my wrongs, the depth of
which none know so well as thou! and by
my love for
her
which such a soulif any
soul, indeed, be thineso base, and sensual,
and brutishcannot so much as fancy! and by
those hopes of vengeance, which alone have
thus far sustained me, blighted though I be, and
blastedto gain which I have lived, and which,
once gained, I will die happyby all these
solemn things, I swear to thee, if thou refuse
my proffer, I will not bate one jot of this
which I have threatened! Nay, more! this
donefor fancy not thy paltry walls or
boasted
ordnance could for ten minutes' space
oppose
,
much more bear back, our onsetthis
done, I saywe
will
be masters of your city,
spite earth, or hell, or heaven!and, masters
of it, not one woman, from the grandame of
fourscore, or the fresh virgin of fourteen,
shall escape the worst pollution! not one man,
nor one boy, nay! not the babe that is unborn,
shall flee the sword's edgenot one building,
from God's temple down to the wretched
negro's kennel, but shall share the
all-devouring
flame! Before to-morrow's dawn, if ye
submit not to my terms, there shall not be one
living thing!there shall not be one stone
upon another, to tell the story of your ruin!
Choose, thenchoose wiselybut see that ye
choose likewise very shortly! One hour! I
have spoken!
Thou speakest mere impossibilities
replied
the miserable fatherand that full well
thou knowest! For howwere I so minded
should I compel all these to yield their
homes to conflagrationtheir children to the
swordtheir women to dishonor! Ask
anything
but this, and on the instant it shall be
performed!
Thou
hast heard!was the stern reply
and
I
have said!
If thou wouldst have wealth, say the word
our swollen treasuries would suffice to glut
the wildest avarice.
I have said! answered the pirate, fiercely,
dashing his heel with furious energy into the
yielding sandI have saidnor would the
gold of El Dorado buy thee one moment's
mercy!
If vengeanceII, Juan MelendezI
whom you hate so deadlyI will come forth
to ye unarmedI will yield me to the utmost
of your maliceyea! I will bless your
torments
,
so these may return harmless!
And Iexclaimed Don Amadis Ferrajo,
springing with outstretched arms upon the
battlementshigh privilege it were to die for
thee, Teresa!
And Iand Iand Iresponded twenty
voices, in a breath, of the hold cavaliers, who
stood upon the bastion; and who, till now,
dispirited and cowed by the sight of anguish
which they might neither heal nor hinder,
kindled to sudden animation at the high hope of
rescuing, by their own self-devoting gallantry,
those innocent and spotless victims, blazed forth
in all the lustre of their Castilian chivalry at
the proud words of Amadis.
A low and sneering laugh was the sole
answer
,
for the vengeful buccaneer, as he
perceived
by the increasing agitation of the
Spaniards
the full extent of his advantage, waxed
but the firmer and the cooler for all their
menaces and prayers.
Monster!ha! devil!shouted the fiery
Amadis, goaded by the calm and
contemptuous
air of Ringwood, into a state of utter
phrensydevil! thou shalt not live to boast
of it!and snatching, as he spoke, a
long-barrelled
arquebuse from a sentinel beside
him, he took a rapid aim, and before any of
his comrades could interpose to hinder himfor
all perceived the madness of the actionfired
it against the head of the proud Rover.
He was a practised and a steady marksman,
was that hot-blooded gallant: nor, had his
soul's salvation been staked upon the shot,
could his aim have been more accurate or
guarded. Before the sharp report had reached
any of the tremulous spectators who gazed,
as though their all was perilled by the deed
almost before the flash had gleamed upon
their eyesthe long white plume, which
graced the cap of Ringwood, was cut sheer off
within an inch or less of his unblenching head;
and was borne away, glancing, and fluttering
like a sea-bird's wing over the sparkling
billows
,
by the light western breeze. With a
wild yell of savage execration, the pirate line
rushed forward. But scarcely had they made
six steps, with brandished arms and furious
gestures, towards the Spanish works, before the
loud clear voice of their commander was
heard, as composed and slow as though he
had been speaking to a comrade across the
festive board!
Halt! ho!is this your discipline?
and his right hand raised quietly aloft,
without
a sign of menacescarce even of
authority
sufficed
upon the instant to arrest those
hardy desperadoes, that they stood motionless
and silent as a rank of statues.
And thishe said, turning, his eyes,
with a scornful smile upon his lips towards
the ramparts
this
is your Spanish honor
this your respect for the white flag, which even
savage and heathen venerate! Excellent well!
young man! excellent well, and wisely was it
done; 'Tis like that these would be more
merciful, seeing their captain slaughtered here,
before their face, under a flag of truce! Had
I been other than I am, this gallant deed
might have anticipated, somewhat, the time
when these shall suffer. As it is neither
for fear nor favorneither for anger nor
remorse
hath
Ringwood ever swervedbe it
for good or evilfrom his word! nor can so
slight a thing as thou move his most slight
resolve, more than the summer wind can lift
the earth-fast oak from its abiding place. I
said an hourthe half of it has flownhalf
yet remains to ye, to sport, or grieve, as it
seems best to ye!that past, the boy here dies
in torment. The girl lives for our pleasure,
and our scorn!
Even before the fierce rush of the pirates
had been made, the officers around had seized
the youthful lover and disarmed him,
reproaching
him unsparingly for the insane and
desperate
deed to which his uncurbed passions had
excited himAmadisAmadis, cried the
greyheaded veteran Diego, thank God upon
your kneeswith your whole heart, and
strength, and spirit, thank him, that your mad
effort failed. Had thy shot struck down him
at whom it was so deadly aimedshe, whom
thou lovest, had been lost, past hope, past
redemption
!
Young man, exclaimed the fiery
governor
,
rendered more fierce than ever he was wont,
by the increase of peril to his children, by that
most inconsiderate action; young man,
hidalgo
though thou be, and belted knight of
Calatrava, I swear to thee, had that shot taken
place, I would have stripped and bound thee
like a dog, and hurled thee headlong from the
bastions. As it is, if aught ill befall my
children
,
to thee I lay itsee thou be ready to
make full atonement: for
Ere he had finished speaking, with a shriek
so tremendous, that to describe its tones, or
even its effects on those who, shaken as they
were by the dread scenes enacting in their
sight, were harrowed to the very soul by that
appalling cry, were utterly impossiblea
female
of some forty-five or even fifty years, but
still remarkable for matronly majestic beauty,
with her long hair dishevelled, and her large
dark eyes glaring terribly, rushed up the
narrow
steps, and stood unveiled with all her
garments
in wild disarray, among the group of
warriors. My children! she criedOh!
God! God! my children!
None spokenone had words, or breath, or
heart, to speak to herand she went on,
mingling
the wildest, the most eloquent appeals to
Heaven for mercy and for succor, with yells
and shrieks, that made the very hair to bristle
on the heads, and the chilled blood to curdle in
the veins of all who heard hereven of the
unpitying, unsparing desperadoes, who, though
they shuddered at they knew not what,
swerved
not in their fell purpose, nor ever even
dreamed of mercy. And now she would
blaspheme
,
and rave with execrations, such as had
scarcely been outdone by the profanity of the
most desperate of men; calling down curses on
the heads alike of those who held her children
prepared for instant executionof those who
could not, howsoever they might pant to do
so, strike one blow for the rescue, without
insuring by that blow, more certainly than
ever, now it was decreed, their doom- and
on her own head, most of allfor that she had
borne, and nursed them at her breast, and
trained
them up so pure, and beautiful, and brave
and all for such an end!
Once Juan drew his swordonce almost
gave the word, to cast the sally-port wide open
to rush down with pike, and arquebuse,
and rapier, under cover of the volleying
cannon
to
cry, St. Jago and God aid!to set
all on the cast of one desperate charge! But
hope and prudence conquered. It cannot be,
he thoughthis hopes suggesting arguments
which his more sober reason would at once
have discovered as nothing worthfor well
did Juan Melendez know the unbending spirit,
the tameless, heaven-daring pride, the dauntless
valor of the man who stood beforr himnot
now, as once, a wronged and helpless exile,
but in the plenitude of power, and pride, and
vengeance! It cannot be that a mere
buccaneer
,
a sordid, selfish pirate wouldor would
be permitted tosurrender his, or his comrades'
common interest for any private vengeance,
how grateful or how sweet soever. And in
these frantic hopes, mingled with fears, if
possible
,
more frantic, the fatal moment passed.
Juan! once more exclaimed the deep
sonorous
accents of the EnglishmanJuan
Melendez de Aviles, the hour I gave thee
hath elapsedonce more I ask of theeshall
these two live or die? If thou wouldst have
them live, down draw-bridge, up portcullis,
and march out, thou and thy veterans, and thy
familyfor three days will we hold the city,
doing to it, and all within it, as to us shall
seem fittingafter three days will we embark
in our good ships and trouble ye no more,
here at St. Augustineand for assurance that
we will preserve our faith with ye, myself
will be hostage in your handseven in yours,
the deadliest of my foemen! Choose now
choose, choose, Juan Melendez, and if thou
doomest thesethese thine own flesh and
blood, on whom even I, who have such cause
to hate them, scarce can look without piety
if thou do this, say not that it is I, but thou
who art their slayer!
The brow of Ringwood, as he spoke, grew
very pale, and his lips absolutely ashy in their
tints. Yet his eye was as bright, and even
calm as ever; and not a muscle worked, or a
nerve quivered, in those stern features, or that
stately frame.
Mercy! exclaimed Melendez, stretching
forth his clasped hands towards the pirate,
mercy. As thou mayest, one day, ask for
it thyselfshow mercy!
As I received it, one day, at thine hands,
when I did crave it, so will I show it, Juan,
replied the buccaneer. Speak now, speak
out, I say! Wild thou yield up the town?
I will not, answered Melendez, very
firmly. God help meI will do my duty.
Then hear methy son will I torture here
to death before thy very eyesthy daughter,
if thou move not to sally, for the time, is safe
if but the bridge be lowered, or one shot
fired, I yield her on the instant to the mercy
of my crew. Lead out the boy!
And that pale stripling was led out before
his father's facepale, indeed, even to
ghastiless
,
partly from the loss of blood, and partly
from the conscious horror of his situation. Yet
he bore up with dauntless courage, and, though
a mere boy, proved himself, in that extremity,
a worthy scion of his proud race.
Teresa, he said, as he left his sister's
side, God bless thee, and farewell, and may
He grant that I may bear this agony for both.
Father, let me see that you look as bravely on
my death, as I shall bear it; unman me not
by any weakness; I would die as becomes thy
son, and a Castilian. Now, sir, I am ready.
It was a most strange sight. The lip of
Ringwood quivered, as he looked on the brave
boy, and all the muscles of his face, which had
hitherto been as tense and cold as steel, relaxed
a little, and a tear swam in his grey eye; he was,
it seemed, on the point of yielding. But with a
mighty effort he dashed off the growing
weakness
.
I, too, he said, painful, although
it be, and bitter, I too have my duty.
He gave a sign to the assistants, and they
made the boy kneel down upon the sands, and
bound a knotted whipcord closely about his
temples, and thrust between it and the flesh
the stout steel-mounted stock of a ship-pistol.
One strong man seized each arm, and held him
steady by the full exertion of their united
strength! Having made that one signal,
Ringwood
cast no glance more towards the hapless
boy, but riveted his eagle eye, with an intense
expression of horrible exulting pleasure, full on
the father's face.
It is done, captain, whispered the third of
those fell satellites.
Proceed! replied the Rover, never
removing
once his eyes from the distorted
features
of the governor. Proceed!
And at the word, the wretch who had last
spoken, seizing the pistol by the barrel,
twisted
it round and round, tightening at every
strain the knotted cord till it pierced through
the skin, and flesh, and sinews, and pressed
with agonizing keenness into the solid bone
itself. Manfullywonderfullydid that pale
stripling bear the intense anguishanguish, the
horrible extremity of which was but too well
displayed by the deep crimson flush, which
had supplanted the ghastly whiteness of his
browin the foam that flew from his
churning
teeth, in the dark sweat that gushed from
every pore. Still he so mastered that appalling
torture, that he spoke not a word, nor groaned,
nor even murmured! Had the fierce Rover
looked but once on that boy's face, he had
forgotten all his wrongs, all his deep hatred,
in overwhelming admiration. He would have
criedhad the cry sealed his own eternal doom
hold! hold! for shame if not for mercy!
But he did not look on itfor his hard eyes
were drinking in, with fearful satisfaction,
the tortures visible in the dark features of his
humbled foeman! At length the tough cord
pierced its way into the skull itself; the
sightless
eyes, forced from their sockets, started out
upon the gory cheeks; one loud long yell burst
from the boy's lips, and at the self-same
instant
Don Juan Melendez fell back into the
arms of his attendants, in such a paroxysm of
despair and agony, as happily deprived him of
all consciousness for hours. The yet more
wretched mother had been forced from the
bastions forcibly, before that hellish scene
commenced, or she had perished at the sight!
As Ringwood saw his enemy fall senseless,
as the boy's yell pierced his scarce conscious
ears, a deep flush crossed his brow; he
snatched
a pistol from his baldric, turned short upon
his wretched victim, and fired full at the head,
not three feet distant from the muzzle. One
spasmone quick convulsive shudderand all
was over, ere yet the echoes of the death-shot
had subsided! Was that an echothat deep
sullen roar? Again! again! No! 'Tis the
sound of ordnance! And lo! in clear sight,
on the bright horizon, four pyramids of sail,
looming up larger and more near, as every
second passes. And now what floats above
those lofty royalswhat but the yellow flag
with the three eastles of Castile? Hark! to
that cheer, awful, and deep, and solemn, which
rushes up to heaven from the beleaguered
ramparts
,
full of a thousand mingled feelingsof
gratitude for unexpected safetyof hope for
coming vengeance!
CHAPTER III.
Well
was it for the buccaneers, that the wind
died away, which had brought into sight so
rapidly the Spanish caravellas; for had the
four tall frigates which, deserted by the sea
breeze, were soon obliged to drop their anchors
at the very entrance of the bay, four miles at
least from the vessels of the piratesbeen able
to run in, the small light picaroons of the
Rovers
,
heavily armed although they were in
proportion to their rate and burden, would
have stood but a sorry chance, hemmed in
between the heavy batteries of those floating
castles to the seaward, and the yet heavier
cannon of the ramparts, should they attempt to
run into shoal water.
It was evident, moreover, that the
newly-arrived
ships were already in no small degree
suspicious of the character and intentions of
the squadron moored in shore; as appeared
from the quick interchange of signals, between
the Spanish flag-ship, which was the first to
anchor, and her comrades. In obedience to
these signals, the four tall vessels came to
anchor
,
all nearly in a line, at equal distances
across the harbor, so as to render escape
difficult
,
if not impossibleand in a few moments
afterward, in consequence of a fresh signal
shown at the mast-head, a second cable was
carried out from the stern of every frigate, and
she was warped round, till she lay broadside
to the bay with all her frowning batteries
commanding
the long expanse of water, across
which the picaroons must sail exposed to their
raking fire, if they should seek to force a
passage. The distance and the apparently
hopeless position of the buccaneers preventing
the Spaniards, as it would seem, from
sending
their boats' crews to ascertain their
character
,
if not to cut them out and capture them.
It must not be supposed that it took the
keen and practised intellect of Ringwood so
long a time to apprehend his own position, and
the intentions of the enemy, as it has occupied
us to describe them. On the contrary, they
had not dropped their anchors, before he had
envisaged fully the extent of his own danger,
and calculated accurately the chances of
effecting
his escape, under circumstances which
seemed so unpromising. Forming his men
into four columns, he commanded them to
retreat
by turns, one body facing the ramparts
with levelled arquebuse, and pike in rest,
while another fell back, till they had all
reached
the gravelly margin of the bay. Then
judging from the movements on the walls and
above the gate, that a sally was about to be
attempted, he strode out alone, till he was
within earshot, and then shouted aloud
Beware!beware how ye raise gate, or
lower bridge, or do but so much as to threaten
our retreat!for as ye do so, by Him who
knoweth all things! the fate of this crushed
clay,and he pointed with a meaning smile
to the dead body of the young Melendezthe
fate of this crushed clay shall be a lot of
perfect
bliss compared with that which shall light
on your sweet daughter! And with the
words he fell back slowly to his men, the
greater part of whom were already on board
their boats, leaving the Spaniards dispirited,
and faint, and sick with hope deferred.
Within
a short half hour, the whole flotilla was in
motion, dashing up the clear azure of the
peaceful bay, with hundreds of strong oars,
and ere the hour was well accomplished, each
picaroon had received its complement, had
hoisted in its boats, and lay, all hands at
quarters
,
ready for action.
When Ringwood reached the deck of his
felucca, ordering that his captive should be
conveyed without delay to his own private
cabin, he took to his perspective glass and
gazed steadily and long toward the Spanish
caravellas
,
and far beyond them towards the open
sea.
A mist! he cried anon, after examining
both sea and sky with anxious scrutinya
mist, coming in slowly from the seaward!
masthead there!signalize the captains of the
squadron to come aboard me here to
council
,and
with the word up went three balls
to the masthead, and bursting as they
reached
the summit, streamed out for one moment
three bright contrasted signals. Within five
minutes after, a little cutter might be seen to be
launched from the side of every picaroon, and
darting towards the principal felucca, as fast as
oars could urge it through the water; yet still
the Rover swept the horizon round and round
with his telescope, minutely watching every
sign and symptom of the weather, fixing his
gaze most constantly on a point directly
landward
,
where just above the tree-tops one small
dark cloud with snow-white edges was visible
quite motionlessand unconnected, as it
seemed, with any mass of vapor, the single
frown of the bright laughing heavensthe
single frown, full of dread menace. Just as
the first of the small pinnaces came
alongside
,
his scrutiny was ended, and he closed his
glass, saying to himself with a quiet smile of
satisfaction:
A mist forthwith from the sea-wardand
when the sunset is fully passed, a hurricane
and land tornado! Ha! Master
Cunninghame
,
he added, as his second in command
stepped on board, a handsome,
fresh-complexioned
,
fair-haired Saxon. Ha! Monsieur Le
Fortwelcome, good friends and comrades
Winslow and Drake! welcome, friends, all!
I have convoked you hither to study how we
may escape scot-free from these toils, that now
seem set so close about us. And before
heaven
!I
hold the clue, my masters. See ye,
how dark this sea-mist is now gathering?
The Spaniards must lie still till it blow over
and then look yonder, to the bright edges
of yon black cloud. Ere midnight we shall
have a land tornadothen must you Spanish
lubbers slip their stern cables, and swing head
to sea; and then will we run up to them
under slight storm-sails, and, it may be, slip
by them unperceived in the deep gloomif
not engage them and force passage. Lo! here,
my masters, when I shall fire a bow gun hold all
ready to cut or slip your cables! and when
I hoist three lanthorns at my main, then run!
You, Drake and Winslow, since that your
vessels draw least water, steer you betwixt the
headlands of the hay, on the right hand and
left, and those two outward frigates. I will
steer straight between the central two; ye,
Cunninghame and Le Fort, make good your
way between the others, on either hand of
mewhen ye are all at sea, fire each a
weather
gun, and burn a blue light and three
rockets
then
each make all sail for the inlet,
and so huzza for home! And one word
more, my friends, before we partit will blow
sturdily, I warrant mesend down all light
spars and top hamperhave your ships snug
and easy, with naught abroad but a small rag
of head-sail, so to steer. Have out your
sweeps, too,to get yourselves before the
wind, if need benone may tell certainly
where the tornado may strike firstfarewell,
be brave and fortunate, and see ye reach
your vessels ere this fog commence, since of
a surety ye scarce will find their berths, when
once the mist gets settled. So, my friends,
once more, fare ye well!
And with these words, accustomed long
ago to place complete reliance on the opinion
of that skilful navigator, and to yield with
instinctive
readiness to his least mandate, his
four commanders entered their boats, and
hurried to their several vessels, although in
truth they saw no symptomseven when
pointed out by his unerring judgmentof
the approaching changes in the weather which
their great chief prognosticated so decidedly.
Not long was it, however, that they doubted,
if indeed it may be said that they did doubt at
all; for though they marvelled, and looked
anxiously about to note some confirmation
of their leader's prophecy, they did not for a
moment presume to doubt their leader's
accuracy
for
ere they had all reached their
vessels
,
the thin haze which had for some time
floated on the extreme horizon's edge, grew
thick and heavyand by and by came
rolling
onward in deep and ponderous masses,
although no breath of air could be
discovered
,
by which it was urged landward; and
the whole atmosphere grew damp and watery.
Then one by one the caravellas of the enemy
were swallowed up in the dense gloom, and
then their own low rakish picaroons became
so indistinct and dim, that those which lay
furthest from the felucca of the great English
buccaneer were not reached by their officers
without much difficulty and some hazard.
Long before sunset, nothing was visible from
the deck of any one of that small pirate
squadron
,
but the calm surface of the unmoved sea,
and that within a circle of only some fifty
yards at the utmost, beyond which all was one
dead drowsy mass of impenetrable vapor.
Yet so well had the officers taken the bearings
of the enemy, of the headlands, and of their
consorts, that there was not one of their
number
who was not as fully acquainted with the
position of everything about him, as he could
have been had the whole scene been
laughing
out in clear broad sunshine.
All day the crews were mustered, and
toiling
at their several stations, and night was
advanced
somewhat, ere all the preparations
were completed; the loftier spars sent down,
the masts housed safely, and the lighter sails
unbent, the rigging taughtened, and the masts
fortified with preventers against the coming
tempest; the guns run out and loaded, the
matches lighted, and the armed crews at
quarters
;
the heavy sweeps already in the water
and ready, at a word's notice, to be worked
by powerful strong-handed gangs; the
carpenter
and his stout mates, prepared with
their broad axes to sever the strong cables at a
blow, and let the gallant barks shoot sea-ward!
The sun had long since sunk into the
waves, and the deep palpable obscure of night
been added to the gloom of the thick
fog-wreaths
no
stars were in the sky, no moon,
hid in her vacant interlunar cave, hung
forth her silver lamp in the dark vault; for
clouds, heavy and packed and solid, had long
since overspread the sky, though not a human
eye had marked them, swelling from out that
one small spot of vapor, till they had blotted
out each light of the broad empyrean, from
the horizon upward to the zenith. Midnight
was near at handwhen a deep, rumbling
roar, as of ten thousand chariots rolling upon
a strong causeway, rushed up from the
landward
;
and, after filling the air for some short
space, sank gradually down into a faint, sick
moanunlike to any sound of earth, or air, or
water. It ceased; and as it did so the sharp
and ringing discharge of a long brazen culverin
burst in a sheet of flame from the lee bow-port
of the Rover's galleyand scarcely had its
echoes died away, before a wide, blue
sulphurous
glare seemed to rush downward bodily
from the black skies with such a roar of
thunder
,
crash upon crash, and peal succeeding
peal, as stunned the sternest soul. In a
moment
,
in the twinkling of an eye, the misty
wreaths were swept sea-ward and vanished;
leaving, however, the night quite as dark as
ever; and as they did so, up shot to
Ringwood's
mainmast head three glittering
lanthorns
sparkled
there for a momentand
were quenched instantly, by the fierce
whirling
breath of the tornado. Bearing on its mad
pinions huge limbs fresh rent from the tall
forest trees, whirling the level surface of the
calm bay into a series of huge and
snow-capped
billows, and anon sweeping away the
heads of those vast waves, and beating them
down bodily into the deep, till the whole
bosom of the sea was one wide, white
expanse
of scattering, hissing sprayroaring and
howlingyea! yelling in its furious might
soon came the tropical tornado! But every
cable was cut sheer, before it struck the
water, throughout the Rover's squadronthe
sweeps were out and manned; the picaroons
all under weigh and steering, when the fierce
blast fell on their naked spars and scanty
canvas
,
and drove them, like beings full of fiery
life, bounding across the waters.
When the mist cleared away, the Spanish
caravellas were descried, not by their outlines
for no human eye could trace an outline
against the swart gloom of the skybut by
the broad glare of the battle lanthorns,
gleaming
out from their open port-holes, as they
lay broadside towards the bay, all manned
and cleared for action; so that her course
was definite and clear to each one of the
picaroons
.
But when the dreadful howl of the tornado
came raving through the tortured air, their
stern springs were all slipped at once, and
they came heavily round, head to sea, upon
the instant; and more cable was paid out;
and though they rolled and labored fearfully,
yet they rode still secure, amid the frightful
uproar.
No light was seen, no voice or sound was
heard on deck of any one of Ringwood's
squadron
;
as driving with the speed of light before
the raging hurricane, they neared the lofty
Spaniardsbut loud and violent was the
confusion
and the din aboard the castled
caravellas
.
Unseen and unsuspected, leading the
van of his little fleet, the Rover rushed into
the space between the central frigates, and so
rapidly did he shoot through, betwixt those
motionless and vast masses, that the scared
crews had scarcely time to note his transit;
yet did the fearful volley, which he poured
forth from each broadside, as he rushed past,
plunge fatally and fast into their clustered masts
and when they sprang in tarn to their guns,
and fired their answering salvos, the picaroon
had shot already a cable's length ahead, and
the two Spanish ships received each other's
shot, thinning their crews more fatally than
had the Rover's broadside, cutting away their
rigging, piercing their castled sides, and
shearring
their spars fearfully of their dimensions.
Under the cover of this disastrous chance,
Cunninghame and Le Fort passed
undiscovered
,
with their guns undischarged, within
half pistol shot on the outside of these same
two caravellas; and when the Rover, half a
mile now to sea-ward, fired his weather gun,
burnt his blue lights, and sent his rockets up
kindling the murky skies with their clear
sparkles, these two responded on the instant,
with ready tokens of their safety. Almost at
the same point of time a heavy cannonade
was heard from the two outward caravellas,
and scarce ten minutes later, the two
remaining
picaroons signalled their comrades through
the gloom.
Such was the desperate and daring feat,
long famous as the master deed of naval
warfare
in that remote and early age, by which
the English buccaneer ran, with five petty
picaroons, the gauntlet of Spain's noblest
caravellas
,
in safety and triumphlosing no man,
no spar, no rope, how trivial it might be soever,
bearing his captive with him, and leaving to
his baffled foes sorrow, and anguish, and
despair
.
Ere long the hurricane subsided, but still
the breeze blew swift, and sure, and steady
and swiftly danced the roving barques before
it. All night it blew, and all night long the
Rover paced the deck; but when the daylight
broke over the foaming ocean, and when he
swept the free horizon with his glass, and
saw his coasorts dancing merrily behind him,
and not a sail save theirs in sight, whether of
foe or stranger, he gave his deck in charge to
the next officer, and sought his private cabin,
and his unhappy captive.
CHAPTER IV.
The
cabin into which, with the break of
day Ringwood descended, was, according to
invariable custom, situate in the extreme after
2
part of the vessel, so as to enjoy to the utmost
the advantage afforded by the stern lights for
cheerfulness and ventilation. In its other
arrangements, however, it differed not a little
from the similar apartments in ships of war
of that, or indeed any other day. All the
guns, which were carried by the low light
picaroon, were on her upper deck; which,
somewhat in advance of the marine
architecture
of the times, was perfectly flush from
stem to sternby this arrangement the whole
interior of the vessel was reserved, free from
the incumbrance of the batteries, for the
accommodation
of the numerous crew, and for
the needful stores of food and war munitions,
and as its sub-divisions were not, as has been
said above, conformable to ordinary
practice
,
it will not be superfluous to give a brief
description of their fashion and appliances.
In the first place, then, be it observed, that
the cabin companion, instead of being situate
abaft the mizen, was placed about half way
betwixt that spar and the mainmastthe
stairway
which it contained opening into a narrow
space, between two musket-proof bulkheads,
perforated with loopholes and crenelles for shot
of arquebuse or carbine. In the forward of
these partitions, which ran entirely across the
vessel, there was no aperture whatever,
except
the shot-holes above mentionedin the
centre of the other, however, was a low
steel-clenched
door-way, before which a sentinel
stood on duty with his firelock loaded night
and day; while a second, similarly armed,
kept guard on deck by the companion hatch.
This portal, framed like the bulkheads, of
timber so thick as to be musket proof, gave
entrance to a narrow passage, running fore and
aft, between the armorer's and gunner's store
rooms, and through another strong door to the
ward-room or apartment of the officers, under
which general term were included all the
classes
superior to the private marines, with no
distinction as to warrant or commission. This
was a large, low space, occupying the whole
width, and about twenty feet of the length of
the vessel, fitted with a long table in the
centre
,
above which there swung from the ceiling
a compass, and several lamps. The sides
were occupied by berths sufficiently
commodious
;
while a range of lockers, covered with
cushions of rich velvet, so as to wear the
semblance of a superb divan, ran round the
whole apartment. The light was admitted,
not, as is usual, through a skylight, but by a
range of small glazed apertures pierced
through the sides like port-holes, and like
them provided with massive shutters, which
might be battened down in rough and stormy
weather, or in time of action. When it is
added to this, that the deck which formed
the floor was covered by a splendid carpet from
the Turkish loomthat the curtains of the
berths were of the richest arras tapestrythat
two large beaufets of some costly Indian
wood were decked with gorgeous plate, flagons,
and goblets, covers, and cups, and tankards, of
gold and silver, carved and embossed with the
best art of Italy's best sculptorsand that, in
wondrous contrast to the luxurious decoration
of the room, offensive weapons of every shape
and every construction, were disposed ready to
meet the hand, wherever any vacant space
was left for their arrangementa very fair
idea may be formed of the wild blending there
displayed of almost regal pomp with warlike
preparation. Thus round the mainmast was
suspended, in a fair gilded rack, a stand of
partisans with shafts of ebony, and blades,
two feet in length, of brightly polished steel.
Upon the bulkheads, at each end of the
apartment
,
pistols and carbines, loaded and primed,
and ready for immediate service, and Turkish
yatagans, Damascus cimiters, blades of Bilboa
and Toledo, with Malay creases, Scottish
dirks, and poniards of Italian fabric, all
glittering
with golden chasings and bright gems,
were placed in fantastical devices, of stars, and
suns, and crescents, reflecting every beam of
light, and almost rivalling in splendor the
luminaries in whose forms they had been
modelled. Besides this common stock, to every
column parting the sleeping berths, was attached
a complete panoplywith fascinet, cuirass,
and buckler, pistols and boarding axe, and
broadsword of the most choice material and
construction. It was apparent at a glance,
that this, the quarter of the officers, must also
be regarded as the stronghold, the citadel as it
were, of the ship. It might perhaps be
conjectured
likewise, from the arrangements, that
the occupants of this magnificent apartment
were not entirely free from some touch of
jealousy, if not apprehension, as regarded the
good faith of their subordinates. The upper
bulkhead, parting the captain's cabin from the
ward-room of his officers, was, like the lower
one, ball proof, and looped for musketry
the door-way, as before, gave access to a
narrow vestibule or passage, arranged in this
case as the Rover's private armory, and
communicating
by a hatch in the floor with the
ship's magazine and larger arm-room. From
the ceiling of this vestibule, which was not
more than a yard in width, was slung a lamp
of silver with two burners; beneath the clear
broad glare of which a negro, of gigantic
stature, and features singularly handsome for
his race, stalked to and fro with shouldered
carbine, and a whole armory of knives and
pistols in the broad belt that girded his white
linen caftan about his thin and sinewy flanks.
Another African, who both for bulk and
comeliness
,
might well have been twin-brother to
the sentinel, lay buried in deep sleep upon a
velvet-covered pallet, which occupied the
whole space to the left hand of the door-way,
with all his weapons round him. And never
by day or by night did those two grim
life-guardsmen
leave their appointed post together
and singly but at rare and distant
intervals
one
sleeping while the other watched
one feasting while the other fastedbut both
continually at hand, and ready on the slightest
signal to do their chieftain's bidding, whether
for good or evil.
On entering the last door-way, a scene of
singular beauty was presented to the eye of the
spectator. The cabin was perhaps twenty feet
in width, by half that depth, except that in the
centre a recess of about ten feet square was
formed by the projection of two state rooms,
one on each hand, into the chamberthis
alcove, raised one step higher than the cabin
floor, was lighted by two of the stern windows
occupying its whole breath, and reaching
almost
from the ceiling to the deckthe other
two lights being cut off by the state-rooms
above mentioned. The alcove was carpeted
with a thick soft Persian rug, and hung with
seagreen velvet, fringed with broad
arabesques
of gold; a divan covered with the same
stuff ran round it, while the centre was
occupied
by a circular table of dark wood inlaid
with ivory and brass. Against the state-room
partitions there hung, on the one side, a set of
shelves filled with about a hundred books in
costly bindings; and on the other, a portrait of
a young girl seemingly not over seventeen years
olda master-piece of the world's master
painter, Antonio Vandykwith a long
two-edged
gold-hilted broadsword, and a brace of
large horseman's pistols, of workmanship to
match the rapier, fixed to the panel under it,
as if to guard the lovely treasure. Upon the
circular table there stood a crucifix of gold,
and a small vase of the same precious metal,
containing some choice flowers of that tropical
clime, while near them lay an open volume of
Italian poetry, a Spanish gittern, and some
manuscript music, partially covered by an
embroidered
kerchief of white silk and gold.
The larger and lower portion of the cabin was
carpeted and decked with hangings of the same
color and material with those in the alcove.
A large square table filled the centre, on
which lay maps and charts, with books and
instruments of navigation. An antique
cabinet
of oak, with massive ornaments of brass,
a beaufet covered with vessels of wrought
gold and goblets of rock crystal, another
bookcase
,
with perhaps two hundred volumes, and
several huge arm-chairs of oak, with velvet
cushions, completed the furniture. It must
not, however, be forgotten that here, as in the
outer rooms, the walls were further decorated
by a superb collection of arms, offensive and
defensive, of every age and nation; the most
costly and most prominent of which was a
complete suit of tilting armor of blue Milan
steel, all damascened with gold, such as was
worn in the fourteenth century by every knight
of name, and by the most unhappy of the
Stuarts, and some few of his leaders even so
late as the war of the English Revolution.
Such was the form and fashion of the cabin
into which, his long night-watch concluded,
Ringwood descended.
In the ward-room, as he passed, his second
officera young and handsome Englishman
with a fair skin, where it had not been bronzed
by long exposure to a tropical sky, laughing
blue eyes, and a profusion of light curly hair
was seated at the table, busily engaged, with
several fine looking lads of various ages, from
fourteen to twenty, in discussing a morning
meal as sumptuous as a ship's store might
furnish
,
with the addition of fresh fish of several
kinds, and a tureen of turtle; which, though
concocted only by the untaught skill of the
bright-skinned and clear mulatto, who waited
by the beaufet, resplendent in cap, hose, and
jerkin, of unsullied whiteness, was even thus
no despicable fare; as was attested by the
frequent
applications to its dispenser, who seemed
to be in no small danger, while ministering to
the appetites of others, of losing his own
breakfast
.
At a smaller board, and a little way
apart, the armorer and gunner, two thick-set
sturdy-looking Britons of the Saxon race,
contemning
the effeminate luxuries of potted game,
broiled fish, and turtle-soup, diluted by
champagne
and bordeaux, were revelling in what
they deemed the manlier enjoyment of toasted
cheese, black puddings, and fat ale. With a
gay smile and some light jest, the Rover
declined
the invitation of his officers to join them at
their festive board; and bowing with an air of
easy dignity passed onward, showing no haste
or agitation in his measured tread, and closing
the door gently after him, as he entered the
small vestibule which led to his own cabin.
You might as well have spared yourself
the trouble of that invitation, good master
Falconer
,
said one of the juniors, who filled
the place of midshipman in a more regular
servicea likely thing it were that he should
tarry here, for such a poor temptation as meat
and drink may offer, with such a feast of
charms wooing him yonder. By St. George,
well might the loveliness of that pale,
black-browed
beauty overcome the virtue of an
anchorite
!
Hold hard, there, Ansoncried
another
covet
not thou, that which is sacred
to thy betters.
Tush, mantush! answered the first
speaker, I covet her not, by St. George; I
love not your delicate, coy damselsbetter one
Ariadne fresh from the arms of the blithe wine
god, than twenty tearful Niobes. We shall
have, by-and-by, a goodly chorus of shrieks,
yells, and lamentations, I doubt not, to tell us
how he prospers in his wooings.
But though a general burst of merriment
hailed this prophetic speech, and although
every ear was for a time on the alert to catch
some indication of the progress of events
between
the Rover and his lovely captive, not a
sound reached them, that afforded any clue to
their excited curiosity.
Closing the door, as has been said, gently
behind
him as he left the wardroom, the Rover
turned the key, and dropped a massive bar
further
to guard against intruders.
Let none disturb me, Pluto, he said to
the sentinel, on any pretext whateverI
am o'erdone with watching, and shall betake
me to my cot till noon. And hark thee, sirrah;
whatever thou mayst hear within, HEAR IT NOT,
if thou wouldst have ears afterward, to hear
withal!Hear nothing thou, unless I call on
theenor thy twin devil yonder, either!
The sable functionary grinned, till he
showed
his ivory teeth almost from ear to ear, as
Ringwood tutored him; and, when he had done
speaking, laid his broad hand upon his chest,
and bowed in silent acquiescence to his master's
will.
Satisfied, apparently, that his attendants
comprehended
and would implicitly obey his
bidding
,
the captain paused no longer, but
entered
his apartment without further waste of
words, with every sinew of his body strung,
and every energy of his strong mind resolved
upon his savage purpose. No clothing had
been given to the hapless prisoners, beyond
the miserable relics of their torn garments,
which had been spared in the first moment of
their capture; nor indeed, save for the wants
of delicacy, was any more required; for the
weather was extremely hot and sultry, and the
air of the small cabin, though all the windows
were thrown open to catch the favoring breeze,
was confined and oppressive. Little, therefore,
had it been in the power of those wretched
girls to do in aid of their offended modesty
little, however, as it was, all, that the utmost
delicacy with their small means could have
effected, was performed. Teresa's hair had
been replaced, folded in massive wreaths about
her classic temples, decently ordered, but
devoid
of the most simple ornament. Her single
robe, of thin and half transparent linen, had
been arranged; and the huge rent, which had
displayed all the voluptuous charms of her
young bosom and round ivory shoulders,
repaired
by such devices as woman can alone
contrive; so that the beauties of her unrivalled
form, though not concealedfor how could
one light fold of cambric conceal the swelling
outlines, the luxuriant roundness, the
unmatched
symmetry of that shape, delicately
full, yet slight withal and sylphlike?were
veiled at least from the too bold intrusion of an
unchaste eye. The stains, however, were still
therethe frightful stains of recent massacre
the plain print of ensanguined fingers upon
the sullied surface of that virgin robeand her
small and slender ankles, which might not be
concealed beneath her scanty draperies, were
still encrusted thickly with the unnatural taint
of human slaughter.
With the dark fringe of her long downcast
lashes drawn in distinct relief against a cheek
as colorless and cold as monumental marble
without one ray of hope, one gleam of
intellect
,
to lighten up the dull and soulless gloom
which brooded over those glorious features,
like a grey storm-cloud overshadowing a
lovely
landscapeher brow, too much oppressed
to feel the agony of its own inward aching,
propped on one snowy hand; while with the
azure veins painted in fearful vividness upon
its deadly whiteness, the other hung down by
her side, motionless, lifeless, and unconscious
with scarce more sense of sorrow or of pain
than Niobe, when the last shaft had flown and
her last child lay dead before that stony effigy
which had but a moment since writhed with
the anguish of a mother's griefsilent, and
cold, and rigid, save when a quick convulsive
shiver, the only sign of life she had displayed
for hours, ran through her palsied form
shaking
it for an instant, and then leaving it still as
the grave and nearly as insensibletearless,
and mute in her exceeding agony, Teresa sat
erect in a huge oaken chair placed almost in
the centre of the cabin; with the black girl, her
sole attendant, lately her slave, but now at
least her equalfor in their common misery
all past distinctions were abolishedcrouching
on the rich carpet at her feet, and clinging to
the knees of her, in whom, so deep set was
her half-idolatrous veneration, she could not
but imagine some power must still reside, some
magic of authority that must compel respect
even from the world's outcastthe proud,
pitiless
corsair.
Such was the picture that met Ringwood's
eye as his foot crossed the thresholda picture
that might well have called up sentiments of
pity from the most iron bosom! But in the
breast of the wild Rover pity, which spite his
merciless trade oft found a dwelling there, was
for the time overpowered; crushed as it were,
and silenced by the vast flood of fierce and
fiery passions, which swept across his soul,
withering up and searing every kind sentiment,
as the hot lava scathes the innocent flowers,
when he beheld the childthe heart, as it were,
the more than heartof his detested foe,
helpless
,
and courting, as it seemed, the blow that
should heap tenfold ruin on the object of his
undying hatred. The voice of memory spoke
trumpet-tongued within himmemory, fresh
from other days and distant climes!memory,
busy with confidence unwillingly bestowed,
and brutally requited!memory, full of wrongs,
and woes, and agony, and degradation! The
voice of memory spoke within him; spoke with
a thousand thunderous voices, whose every
whisper was of vengeance!vengeance,
delayed
for long, long years, but never for one hour
forgotten!vengeance, which should exceed a
thousand fold the injury that woke it!
vengeance
,
with which the universe should ring,
and which the page of history should hand
down, as unrivalled, to the appalled and
shuddering
ears of countless generations! With
such a prompter at his heart's core, how
should he pause to think of Ruth or of
forgiveness
!
He paused not!an exulting smile
curled his lip!curled it with an expression of
pride, malice, scorn, and triumph, that no word
but FIENDISH could convey, however faintly,
to the mind!his breast swelled with an
ecstasy
almost convulsive; his eye positively
lightened with excitementthe terrible
excitement
of ungovernable passions, o'er-mastering
every obstaclefierce, furious excitement! ripe
with the concentrated fire of every evil, every
unholy impulse implanted by the hand of
nature
in the breast of man, bursting the bonds of
reason, wild, remorseless, and untamable.
One glance he cast towards the miserable pair,
and cheering himself as if by a sudden
impulse
Without therehe criedHo!
without
!
On the instant the door was opened, and
the black woolly head of the gigantic negro
was thrust into the cabin. At the first sound,
however, of the Rover's voice, the Spanish
lady, whose senses, overpowered by the dull
torpor of despair, had not informed her of his
entrance, started upon her feet, turning her
clear cold gaze full on the splendid person of
the pirate chief; while down to her knees clung
the black maiden, with the whites of her eyes
dilated into glassy circles by the intensity of
her dismay.
Take hence the slave girlbestow her in
the hatch beside the greater arm room; keep
her close prisonerbut, as you love your life,
do her no wrongnot by a word, or look, if
you would 'scape my vengeance!gently
away with her!
A fearful spasm crossed the pale features of
Teresa, as the huge black drew nigh; and it
seemed as though her terrors would have found
vent in a piercing scream, but by a mighty
effort she restrained herself.
Let go my robe, Cassandra, she said at
length, in tones which, though they faltered,
no terrors could deprive of their almost
unearthly
sweetnessLet go my robe, girlseest
thou not that no present harm is meant thee?
and if there were it would boot naught to
struggle
?
Let goI say! minion, unloose thy
graspshe cried with increased agitation, as
the pirate's minister drew nearerwouldst
have thy mistress's person polluted by the
touch of you foul villain?nay! tremble not,
thou silly oneshe added, kindly, as the
terrified creature, relaxing the firm clasp which
she had fastened on her lady's dress, fell
prostrate
and almost insensible before her feet
they can but kill usthe longest torments
the direst crneltiescan only lead to thatcan
only inflict DEATH!
As she spoke, gaining courage herself from
the effort she made to cheer her
fellow-sufferer's
spirits, Pluto had raised the
half-inanimate
and shuddering girl in his strong
arms, and was already bearing her towards the
vestibule; when by a sudden jerk she almost
extricated herself from his embrace, and
followed
up the first attempt by a succession of
fierce rapid struggles and contortions, panting
and sobbing till it seemed that her heart would
have burst from her bosom, glaring with her
disturbed eyes, and foaming at the mouth like
a demoniactill finding all her efforts fruitless,
exhausted even more by the violence of her
feelings, than by her terrible though vain
exertions
,
she sank into a deep swoon; and with her
head hanging upon the massive shoulder of the
negro, and all her shapely limbs collapsed and
nerveless, was carried off insensible and
unresisting
.
Alone in that luxurious cabin, surrounded
with all that is most beautiful to the eye, alone
the Spanish maiden stood in the presencein
the power of the merciless Rover. Both young
both beautifulbut oh! how different in their
beauty! She, pale and woe-begone, and cold
as the white marble which alone could vie with
the pure splendor of her skinhopeless, yet
firmwretched, yet tearless in her misery!
He, flushed with fiery passions, burning with
high hot hopes, instinct with all the ardent
energies, the quenchless vigor, the indomitable
power of animal existence! She, the very
image and ideal of perfect and most lovely
death! He, the unequalled type of glorious
and majestic life! With a slow step, as if
half doubtful of his purpose, the Rover neared
his captivestill she stood firm and motionless,
with her large bright eyes shining out,
intensely
black and lustrous, from her fixed and
hueless
featuresfixed upon his with a cold,
steady, and unblenching gaze, like that by
which the leech is said to awe his maniac
patient, or man, the monarch of creation, to
quell the fiercest savage of the wild. It
seemed
as if that frail and slender girl had listened
and believed the tale, that a lion will turn
and flee from a maid in the pride of her purity,
and had resolved to try the virtue of the spell,
but on a fiercer and more tameless being. And
in good truth for a second's space it showed as
though the charm were not all powerlessthe
haughtyspirit diddid for a moment quail before
that firm and fearless gaze!the strong brave
man did hesitate, before the timorous weak
maiden! There is in truth nothing so difficult
as to approach, with hostile purpose, one who
opposes calm and passive fortitude to
threatened
violenceone who shows naught of fear,
meditates nothing of resistancewho neither
courts nor shuns the peril. Man will hew
down the trembling fugitive, from the same
natural impulse which prompts the dog to
tear whatever flies from himhe will assault
with all the pride of defied valor and insulted
strength the strong one who resists himbut
he will rarelyrarely nerve himself to the
attack
of one who fears not nor defies the
outrage
.
At length, with a half starta start at
his own unwonted hesitationhe advanced,
and laid his hand upon her shoulder, while
she still, moving not, nor speaking, maintained
that steadfast gaze, as if she would peruse his
soul; nor did the slightest change in her
deportment
give any token that she had felt his
lawless touch, save that a bright flush darted
over brow, face, and bosom, brilliant as the
electric flash, and scarce less rapid in its
passage.
This is well, fair one, he said with a
strange sneer, curling his chiselled lipthis
is well. I had looked for tears and outcries!
but you are wise, my beauty; wiser in your
generation, as the scripture hath it, than the
children of light!but why so mute, Teresa?
speak, girl, know you the fortune that awaits
you? and he shook her gently as he spoke, as
if to force an answer.
The lamb in the wolf's lair, replied the
maiden, requires no prophet to foretell her
doom.
You know it, then?'fore God I had not
looked for such most sweet compliance!you
know it, then, and deem it perchance a
rare
fortune. I knew erewhile you Spanish dames
were gamesome, and something light of love;
but I deemed notthe more fool I to fancy
woman could
be
at all, and not be wanton
but I deemed not a Spanish damsel of thy
blood and lineage should know herself, and
knowing rest content to be the paramour of a
robbermurdererpirate!
Nor do you know it now, replied she, by
a violent effort maintaining that composure
which she deemed the most likely to procure
forbearancenor do you know it nowten
thousand deaths
would
I die soonernor
will
I be the thing thou sayest!
How wilt thou help it, sweet one? he
asked sneeringly.
By not consentingand by dying!force
me you may to your vile will by bratal and
unmanly violencebow me you may, for the
brief space that is permitted you, to your dire
passionsbut wrong is not dishonor, nor
outrage
disgrace! But for a little timea little
time can you torment methe Lord hath given
you the power, and you must use it as you list
but only for a time.
Believe it not, he answered; not
unimpressed
by the cool majesty of her demeanor
Believe it not, my power upon you is for
everfor ever at least here on earth? That
which I make thee, wilt thou remain till death
deliver theehearest thou, girl? I say, till
death?
And I reply, not long!
To die, thou wouldst say, aye! to die by
the sudden sword-stroke is not difficult, nor
long, nor painful, worth the counting! Nor
is the poison cup, though slower and more
torturing
,
too tedious or too difficult for high and
resolved spiritsand such I do believe is thine,
Teresa. Nor in good truth, as thou didst say
but now, are the most cruel, most protracted
means by which the flesh can be compelled to
quiver through a living deathtoo much to be
enduredto be endured so long as they may
last. But mark me, mark me, maiden: to die
is not so easy! an eye shall be on you for ever
no means vouchsafed while thy fit lasts
and trust me use will reconcile thee to that
life, which thou deemest it no dishonor to enter
on compulsionto die is not so easy!
Nothing is more so, she replied, forcing
herself to go through the task she had imposed
upon her energies. Nothing is more so. The
strongest frame may not endure a fortnight
without sustenanceand neither thou, with all
thy boasted might, nor all thy mailed
myrmidons
,
can force one feeble girl to swallow one
small mouthful, save at her own good
pleasure
!
Brave words! he answered, still with a
sneerBrave words, Teresa! but behold!
here on the walls around you hang fifty
sheathless poniards, fifty well-loaded pistols!
had the one feeble girl been so resolved on
death, she might have died these three hours
gone, and none the wiser! Tush, girl, thou
cheatest me not so!
Hear me, she said, with an imploring
gesture, drawing herself a little back from him
Here me at least, as thou dost hope for
mercyas thou dost trust in God!
I do
not
hope for mercyI do
not
trust in
God! he answered. Why should I? Mercy
was
not
for me or mine, when I implored it on
my knees with adjurations, unto which thy
feeble prayers are but as whispers to the
sovereign
thunder! God heard
not
me when I
called on him at my most extreme need. Why
should I, girlwhy should I? I do
not
hope
for mercyI do
not
trust in God, yet will I
hear theehear thee, for that thou art a
woman
!
Hear me then, and believe my words
nor think that I
feel
not, because I
shudder
notthat I dread not, loathe not the infamy,
because I make my loathings subject to my
will, and speak of that most coolly which I
will not endure and live. When I first entered
here, the thought
did
cross my soul that
freedom
was at handthe blade
was
bared to win
itbut suicide is deadly sinor if not deadly,
allowable but in extremity. There was a hope!
one lingering, last hope
then
nor hath it quite
flown
now!
a hope that one so strong, so
mighty, and so brave as thou, wouldst
shame to harm a woman!a woman whom
all men are bound to shelter and defend for
that same weakness which makes it easy
makes it most base and sordid to assail their
frailty. Till this one hope is gone, I dare
not rush unbidden on eternity. I have thought
muchthought coolly on this matter!the
more, and the more coolly I have thought, the
more
I
am resolved, and the more certain
mayest
thou
be that my resolve is changeless.
Injure me, and I die! For some brief days
thou
mayest
thou
mayest
riot, if such be thy
savage will, in the possession, the unmanly
forceful brute possession of frail resisting
innocence
for
some brief days of agony to me
of infamy to thee and of remorse hereafter!
With these brief daysthanks to the mighty
Maker, who made the subtle and immortal
soul so separable from the gross mortal body!
with those brief days
thy
power for good or
illand
mine
for agonized endurance, are at
an end for ever! Cries, tears, and
lamentations
I know vaintherefore I use them not!
but deem not thou shalt win one favor of
my weakness, till that by utmost force and
violence you have overpowered my most true
resistance!
One wordone whisper from my lips
and thou wouldst fly as eagerly to my embrace,
Teresa, as now thou shunnest it, he again
answered, with the same sneer upon his lip
and she observed that his voice sounded
calmly
,
and no longer with the hoarse broken
intonation
of overwhelming passions; and that the
flush which had lighted up his features with a
light so unnatural and appalling, had given
place to the wonted tints of his complexion.
Not though that word would raise me into
paradisethat whisper plunge thee to the
abyss of hell!
What if I were to yield thee to the license
of my crewto the lewd pleasure of yon
loathsome blackamoor!
'Tis sinvicedegradationthat is
loathsome
!
naught elsenaught else. Compelled
to my dishonor, I may writhe hopelessly in
anguishI may die here on earth, and dying
live for ever in light and bliss, and glory
everlasting
!
Complying I should loathe my very
selfshould die each day I lived! and perish,
body and soulperish now, and for ever!
But thou
wilt
notthou
canst
notthou art a
mana feeling, a fiery, passionate, and it may
be a viciousyet a MAN! Born of a woman,
cradled upon a woman's bosom, nursed from a
breast! thou hast grown fair, and strong, and
noble, reared by the ministerings of a woman's
love! thou didst learn from a woman's tongue
the very accents which give voice to thy fell
threatenings against a woman's peace! thou
hastthou must have loved, have sighed for,
striven for, done gallant deeds to win a
woman
!
and wilt thouwilt thou now? wilt
thou? no! no! thou wilt
notcanst
not wrong
one so weak in her frailtyso strong in her
virtuein her resolve as I! no! no! thine eye
is mild, and thy lip quiversandandand
thou wiltwilt spare, protectoh God! oh
Godthou wilt
not
wrong me, and as she
spoke, she flung herself down at his feet;
clasped his knees tight, tight as the serpent's
coil, with her entwining arms; and turning up
her pale wan face, with those dark glorious eyes
swimming, yet overflowing not in outworn
nature's
agony, towards the stern, observant, but
no longer fierce or inflamed visage of the
Rover
thou
wilt notfor thy mother's soul!
for the sweet memory of her whom you first
loved! thou wilt
not
wrong me!
Not now! not now, at least, Teresa!
But I have heard theehear thou now me. I
have a tale to tell theeof one as innocent
as beautiful as thou, who prayed, as thou hast
prayed, for pitywho found it not, and died!
This thou must hearand then thyself shalt say,
if it can be that II, the Roverthe world's
scorn and hate and terrorI, Reginald
Ringwood
,
can
pity, much more spare Teresa de
Aviles.
CHAPTER V.
THE ROVER'S TALE.
I was
born of an ancient family in the north
of Englandof blood as pure and noble as
flows in the proudest veins of your Spain's
proudest nobles. My Saxon forefathers
possessed
the broad demesne, beneath whose old
oaks I grew upas firm as they of heart, and
scarce less strong of limbcenturies ere the
Norman had drenched our isle in gore. I
know not, and I care not, howthough they
battled to the last for freedomthey held their
landships and lordships until, by time and
intermarriage
,
the names of Saxon and Norman
were forgotten; and from the mixture of those
hostile bloods arose the strongest, bravest,
wisest race of men that tread the surface of
God's earth. I know not, I care not! I only
know, that to me those broad lands descended
through a long race of honored ancestors. I
only care that I was born, and bred, and shall
not die
an English gentleman.
I had a father, noble, and generous, and
gooda motherwho
was
indeed a mother,
and who
is
a saint in heaven!a sister!oh!
suchsuch a sisteray!
thou
art fair, Teresa
wondrously, exquisitely beautifulbut she
was as far before thee, as is the glorious sun
before a farthing rush-light! She wasbut I
can
notcan
not
describe her. No! not to my
own void and aching heart, that never hath
been filled sincenever even for a moment!
She was the comrade of my childish joys, the
soother of my boyish griefsthe dear
repository
of my every hope or fearthe bright
encourager
to all things high and noblethe
true unflinching friendthe
only
one! A few
years younger than myself, she grew up to
bright, glorious womanhood under the kindred
shelter of my stronger youthshe was my all
in alloh God! how I adored her.
But I must onwhile I was yet almost a
boy, the secret heart-burnings, the disaffections
and dissensions, which had so long been
smouldering darkly between the king and
parliament, blazed out into rebellion and fierce
civil war. Both parties flew to armsthe
nobles
and the gentry of the land, with many of
their yeomanry and tenants, drew their swords
for the king;the citizens and burghers,
and not a few of the smaller landholders,
espoused
the cause of parliament.
Throughout the north, the gentry, many
of whom were Catholics, were loyal to a man
and with the Vavasours and Musgraves, the
Landales and the Wentworths, my father
buckled on his arms to fight beneath the
standard
of his kingand well he fought for it,
from its first ominous erection at Worcester
amid storm and tempest, till it fell never more
to rise upon the fatal moor of Marston; where
he too fell beside it, undauntedly but vainly
striving against the iron-clad invincibles of
Cromwell! Boy as I was, through all those
bloody fields, I fought beside my father's
bridle
.
Boy as I was, at Brentford I was
thanked
by Charles himself before the leaders of the
armyboy as I was, when my bold father
perished in his stirrups, I slewthe man who
smote him down, and drew off his retreating
troop, sorely diminished, but unbroken. It is
a long tale, but suffice it, that Lilburn a few
days afterwards stormed, sacked, and utterly
destroyed
the dwelling of my fathersthat,
overdone
with weariness and woe and watching,
my mother wasted away, like snow before the
April sunshine, and died at length of that
worst malady, a pined and broken heart.
Then, our lands became the heritage of others
apportioned by the victor Independents to
the least scrupulous and bravest of their
creatures
;then
was our very namea name
coeval
in proud fame with England's storypro
scribed and outlawed. As best I might, I
cared for my loved sister's safety. In the
mean dwelling of an ancient servant of our
race, an humble fisherman upon the western
coast, in lowly guise and under a feigned
name, for years she was concealed in safety
while I, rash, desperate, and daring, fought
fetlock-deep
in blood wherever banner waved, or
trump was blown in Englandnow in the
ranks of some united host, and under some
renowned
and regular leadernow leading my
own little troop of undismayed adventurers
through the wild pleasures and yet wilder
strifes of that guerilla warfarethe fiercest and
most feared of the king's partisan commanders.
Enough is told, when I have said that not a
single plot was planned, a single insurrection
fostered, but my head was busy with its
machinations
.
That I fought on with Lucas, Lisle,
and Goring, till every hope was lostthat in
the siege of that loyal city Colchester, I shed
my blood in its defence till all was over; and
owed my safety then to wounds which fettered
me to my sick bed, and to the unbribed faith of a
poor laundress, who concealed me from the hand
of my inveterate pursuers. After long months
of suffering and of precarious hiding, I reached at
length the cottage, where, without now one hope
of seeing me again on earth, my sister lingered on
in sad but patient sorrow; looking for death alone
to liberate her from the woes which weighed her
down to the brink, as it were, of that
wished-for
grave, which, seeming to yawn ever to
receive
her, opened not to her prayers. Alas!
alas!that it did not! Alas! that she died
not then, with the young freshness of her
innocent
beauty, pure as an angel's sigh
spotless
as God's own sunshine! But words are
vainsorrow is vainall! all is vain, save
vengeance!
It was deep night when I arrived at that
lone cottageand oh! the ecstasy, the thrilling
ecstasy, that quivered through each nerve of
my rapt frame as once again I clasped that
angel
sister to my heartnever again, as fondly
I believed and falsely, to be torn thence, while
both had being! Little time was there then
for joy or sweet affectionlittle enough for
needful preparation, and swift flight! The
moon had risen before I reached the cottage
before she set, the lugger was afloat, manned
by stout hands and trusty hearts; her every
sail distended by an auspicious breeze; bearing
us, bearing us for ever, from nature's sweetest
namesour home, our country! Long
centuries
before, my father's race had intermarried
with a high family of Spainand, although
time had loosened the essential tie of blood,
friendly connexion had been maintained ever;
and still, in name and courtesy at least if not
in very deed, the haughty family of English
Ringwoods were cousins to the proud Spanish
clan, whose head isthe Melendez de Aviles!
Start not, Teresa! By the God who
looks upon us nowwho looked of yore on
that most hellish crimewho shall anon look
on that crime's meet retribution. By the God
I saythe God of both our fathers! the
blood of
thy
race runs even now, hot as the
lava of Vesuvius, through every artery and
vein of this
my
body! my body that has lived
through agonies and toils and perils, which
might
have consumed nerves of brass and
thews of tempered steel, which
would
have
worn out mine, but for the treasured oath of
vengeance that upheld me!
But passion boots not. What is done, is
done!what shall be, shall be! Friendly
connexion had, I said, been maintained ever!
Letters had passed from age to age, presents
been interchanged, and mutual benefits done
and requited. When our Black Prince
displayed
his Lion banner in aid of your King
Pedro, my ancestor was rescued from the wrath
of that brave bastard, Henry de Transtamara,
by the Melendez of that day. When Spain's
armada was dispersed, scattered to the four
winds of heaven, by Frobisher and Drake and
Hawkins, it was a Ringwood that redeemed
the chieftain of the Des Aviles; and sent him
home cumbered with gifts and ransom, free
from the dark tower of London. Allied in
blood, allied by mutual courtesies, my father
when first war broke outremitted
treasures
,
plate, gold, and store of jewels, to the
faith of his Spanish kinsman. Provident and
prepared for either fortune, he looked to Spain
as an asylum, should the king's cause be
bucklered by bold hearts in vain. When my
good father felllettersfair letters full of
greetingfull of high courtesy and noble
promise
styling
me `Dear and trusty cousin,
praying me `of my love to deem his purse as
minehis palace as my castle,' were borne to
mefair seeming! false! false letters! signed
`Juan de Melendez de Aviles.' Full of all
honorable confidence, full of gratitude and love,
now that even hope was lost in England, I set
sail; freely as to a second country, for the
bright shores of Spain! as to a second home,
for the proud halls of De Aviles! Three
days' fair sail, we made the Spanish coast!
another week, and in Madrid we were received,
received not as exiles and outlaws, but as most
honored friends, most esteemed kinsmen, by
that same Juan de Melendezthat same vile,
heartless, soulless
thing
, which thou callest
father. Aye! I recall it! allalleverything!
The very palace gates, upon the porphyry
steps of which the smooth-faced fiend received
usthe very liveried menials, who cringed so
humbly to our bidding, the very smile, the
very gesture, yea more, the very garb, with
every small detail of plume, and scarf, and
jewelled
rapier, which he woreall gleam upon
mine unforgetting eyes distinct and palpable, as
though they were depicted to my outward
sense by some rare limner's skill. He was a
noble gallant to the eye; witty, accomplished,
beautiful, and bravenor, as I fondly deemed,
more fair than faithful. Every art, every
gentle knowledge, every superb
accomplishment
were centred in his mind, his manner.
To the eye nothingnothing of God's creation
here on earth could be more glorious, more
transcendantly surpassing man's estate, more
god-like! In heart, no
thing
on earth, no
thing
in the abyss of hell could be more
utterly
corrupt, more base, more superhumanly
depraved and bad, more fiendish! Yet years
passed ere I gained this knowledge, years
passed, and I believed himnor was I even
then unwise in this world's wisdomall that
was kind, and good, and noble. What
wonder
that one younger than myself, artless and
unsuspecting, judging of others' faith by her
guileless standard, full of sweet fervent
gratitude
,
betrayed into security by her own very
purity of soul, and by the sanction of a
brother's
presence, should have believed as I! and
loved! andandoh God! that I must speak
itfallen! fallen! the victim to a perjury so
hellishly devised, so deep, so fathomless, that
wisest wisdom would have been all at fault to
sound it! The growing love of my sweet
sister, the constant and devoted wooing of the
enamored Juan I saw, and was well pleased to
see it. Forwhen I saw the liking mutual;
when I knew that my Teresa in purity of an
unstained descent was a match meet for kings;
that in the rescued treasures of my father's
house she had a fitting dowry; that in all else
beauty of form and face, intellect, feeling,
soulshe would have been a prize for the
choice of angels; when I beheld and knew all
this, I had no whisper of false pride to bid me
interpose between their inclinations and their
union! I had no doubts, no fears, no
hesitations
!
Juan, too, had a sistera fair, bright,
artless being, of whom, if I did not entirely
love her, I had at least mused fervently and
deeply. Thoughts of a double link had
crossed
my mind, as no impossible solution to the
Gordian knot of our entangled fortunes, not as
a termination to be gained by rash or sudden
speed, but as an end, which, other things
agreeing
,
might in due time crown all our cares
with pure and peaceful happiness. Thus
days and months rolled on, calm, undisturbed,
and happy. At times indeed, a touch of
wonder
would come over me, whywhen their
mutual feelings were so evident; when my
approval might have been known even from
my silence; when everything was suitable,
and no cloud even on the remote horizon
threatened
a storm which could divide themwhy
they should so prolong their courtshipso
needlessly delay the consummation of their
bliss. Still, as they seemed to understand each
other, I deemed it equally indelicate and
unwise
,
that I without the shadow of a pretext
should interfere between them. Entirely
unsuspicious
,
therefore, and fearless even of the
possibility of wrong, I left things to their
natural
course.
Meanwhile an opportunity at length
occurred
for my advancement, my establishment
in a befitting rank, and active service; an
expedition
was in course of preparation under
the prince, Don John, for the Low Countries,
there to co-operate with the great Cond, against
the allied force of the Cromwellians under
Lockhart, and the French Mazarinists under
the great Turenne, which had already reduced
Gravelines, and Merrdyke, and were now
threatening Dunkirk. In this fair expedition
I was appointed to take part; and in no
humbler station than lieutenant-general of the
cavalry. This proud appointment was
obtained
for me by the solicitations of Melendez,
for whichHeaven's hottest curses blight
him!I deemed him worthy of my eternal
gratitude. Brief space was granted for my
preparationyet, ere I started on my
honorable
duty, I opened my heart freely both to
Melendez and Teresa; and it was settled that,
the campaign ended, they at least should be
made man and wife; while Juan plighted me
his word that, should I prosper in my wooing
with his sister, his every aid should be
forthcoming
.
With a light heart I started; all
careless
at the present, all confident of the bright
future. In a short time we reached the
Netherlands
,
and there my every faculty of mind
or body was engrossed by my military duties.
It is not now my purpose, for it avails
us
nothing
,
to spin out long details concerning that
disastrous and disgraceful campaign, wherein
we were out-witted, out-manuvred, and
outfought
.
First came the defeat of Sandhills,
whereat the English standard waved on both
sides, and victory was once again decided by
the stout fanatics of the republic! then
Dunkirk
instantly surrendered! then step by step
were we beat back, town after town
admitting
our victorious foes! Enough, that at the
Sandhills I was dismounted in the last charge
of the superior cavalry of Castelman, which
broke us like a thunder shock! My right arm
shattered by a pistol shot, my helmet cloven,
and my skull laid bare by a long
broadsword-cut
,
a pike wound through the broken taslet of
my left thightwice was I galloped over by
the contending troopers in close mele, and left
for dead upon the field. Rescued by the
attachment
of a veteran follower from the tender
mercies of the plunderers, I lay for weeks
insensible
,
and for weeks more in helpless agony
till the campaign was ended by the truce; and
weak of frame, bent and bowed by my half
healed wounds, I slowly journeyed homeward.
Something I was indeed discouraged, and
something grieved, that during my long illness,
during my slow recovery, no letters should
have reached me whether from Juan or my
sister; yet even this might be explained by the
distracted state of the whole country; France
torn at the same time by civil strifes and
foreign
warfare; the Netherlands divided into
factions, filled with fierce bands of foreign
soldiery
;
all business at an end, and all
communications
interrupted. Consoling myself with
such thoughts as these, for the neglect of my
Spanish friends, I journeyed, with all the speed
my frail health would allow, towards Madrid.
I reached that splendid city; hurried through
its deserted streets, for it was midnight when I
arrived, to the proud dwelling of Melendez.
The porter who replied to my loud summons,
after a pause strangely at variance with the
former promptness of attendance which
characterized
all my friend's retainersknew me
not at the first; so strangely was I altered by
the enfeebling nature of my wounds, and by
the great exhaustion consequent on my
journeying
with those wounds yet unhealednor
when he recognised me, did he seem wholly
unembarrassed by my appearance. The
family
,
he told meDon Juan, and the Lady
Isidore
,
and the English Senorahad removed
from the city several months before; and were
now dwelling on a magnificent estate, of which
I had heard Melendez speak with rapture,
situate
on the lower ridges of the southeastern
Pyrenees
.
Worn out with fatigue, I resolved to
give myself a single day's repose; in the
course of which I learned from the porter, that
shortly after the removal of the family from
town, tidings had come that I had been slain at
the Sandhills; and that no subsequent news
had arrived concerning me, so that on all hands
I was believed dead; to which he cunningly
attributed his consternation at my unexpected
re-appearance; he also mentioned, as a casual
report, that it had come to his ears that my
sister
had been married to the Conde de Aviles,
shortly before the tidings of my death in
battle
.
The following morning, so much of fever
had anxiety and toil produced, that I was
miserably ill, and utterly unable to rise from my
couch, much more to undertake a tedious
journey
.
I wrote, however, on the instant, both
to my sister and Don Juan; telling them all
that had befallen me, mentioning the reports
which had encountered me on my arrival,
promising
to make all due speed to join them, and
praying them to write me instantly, as I was
all anxiety and agitation. Ten days elapsed
before I was enabled to rise, and a week more
before I could endure the motion of a horse
yet not a line had come to hand to lighten my
curiosity, which was fast growingwhy I
knew notinto a fixed presentiment of evil.
At length I was sufficiently recovered, and on
a bright autumnal morning, gallantly mounted
and well armed, followed by two stout English
veterans. I sallied forth from the portals of
Melendez
;
hurrying with the speed of fear
towards
the city gates. Before I had reached
there, however, I was surrounded and arrested
by a band of the holy brotherhood according
to a warrant of the all-powerful Inquisition.
Four months I languished in its dungeons,
often
examined, often threatened with the
torture
,
forbidden any intercourse with those
without
in
short, entombed alive. At length,
when I had given up all hope of liberty, I was
discharged with no more of explanation than
I had received on my capturewhat of that?
there was no possible redress! I had been
denounced
to the Holy Inquisitiontherefore
arrested
!
The charge had not been made out
therefore I was discharged! and well for me,
I ought to be content! yea! thankful! and I
was thankfulnone but the captive know the
exceeding, the transcendant bliss of freedom.
I was free! I was strong! for spare food and
hard lodging had worked miracles for a
restoration
of my healthI would seek out my
friendsfly to my sister!
I repaired once more to the palace of my
friend; when, to my mighty wonder and yet
mightier rage, the porter dashed the wicket in
my face with a horse laugh, barred it within,
and grinning through its barred lattice to my
teeth, he bade me `go seek my sister in the
Lazar House; meet place for harlotry like
hers!' Words cannot express my rage, my
madness. All availed nothingmadness, rage,
entreaty!no further answer was returned to
methe wicket opened notall was
contemptuous
,
scoruful silence. At length,
dreading
I know not what, I turned me to the
Lazar
House, and therethereoh God!
there
I
found her!there in that den of guilt and
misery, dying by inches, worn, and wan, and
wastedthere on the sordid pallet vouchsafed
by niggard charity, in the last agonies of life,
pale as the sheeted snow, and shrunken till
each bone of her fair frame seemed struggling
through the transparent skin
there
found I
my sweet sister. She diedhappy at least to
die upon a friendly bosomshe died in
blessing
me, and praying, from Eternal mercy, the
pardon of her murderer. She died, but not till
she had faltered forth the tale of her
unprecedented
ruin! The sun did
not
turn pale in
heaventhe earth yawned
not
, nor trembled
nature held on its wonted courseGod heard
the tale, as he had looked upon the deedand
the fell villain prosperedprospered, and
laughed in the exulting pride of conscious
strength, and high impunity of wrong! All
from the very first had been premeditatedI
was appointed to command, merely that I might
be removed from the scene of destined outrage;
a future period was appointed for the
marriage
,
merely to drown all possible suspicion.
Scarce was I gone, before the treachery stirred
into action; the first step was to find an expert
forger of handwriting; nor was this first want
long ungratified; a villain, triple dyed in
guilt, a disfrocked monk of Italy, the minister
for years of Juan's secret infamies, was
pitched
upon for the foul deed; and foully he
performed
it. My letters, regularly intercepted by
Melendez, were laid before him, one by one,
as they arrived, till he had learned the trick of
my handwriting; so that I scarce myself could
mark the fraud. This done, the work
commenced
;
letter was forged on letter, to that
unhappy girl, urging her to delay no longer
the consummation of her nuptialsurging her
by a thousand specious pretexts, and at length
enjoining it upon her, as the last dying
mandate
from a brother's death-bed, to be united on
the instant to Melendez. So specious was the
plot, that mortal wisdom scarcely could have
fathomed it. Her letters, like my own, were
interceptedanswered!each argument
refuted
;
each doubt set aside; each
apprehension
banished! moreover, not my handwriting
only, but my whole turn of composition, my
character of thought, my style, had been so
copied, that as I read the living evidence of the
lie, myself, I almost deemed them mine. It is
enough, that they prevailed! a marriage, a
false marriage, performed by that same villain
monk, and witnessed by, her sex's shame, the
shameless Isidore, completed the accursed plan.
Innocent,
innocent
she fell! Fell, as an angel
might have fallen, and yet remained an angel.
Secure of his poor victim, flushed with
success
and passion, he carried her to his castle
in the south; and till satiety had effaced
passion
,
and custom worn away the charms of
novelty, had treated her with at least the
semblance
of affection. Soon, soon was the dream
ended! My return from the army struck the
last blow to his expiring loveif love that
may be called, which was in truth corrupt and
brutal lust! The illness which delayed me, he
deemed an anspicious chance, and with
unexampled
,
aye! unheard brutality, in the most
public
manner, in the most coarse revolting
language
before his grinning menials and
sycophantic
guests, he told that suffering angel of
the fraudthe fraud which had destroyed her!
jeered at her tearsyea! bade her convey her
beauties to some new lover, and some fresher
market! And when she clasped his knees in
agonies of tearless supplication, he spurned
herspurned her with his foot, and bade his
vassals cast her forth into the wintry
midnight
.
Alone, on foot, in the light garments
of the ball-room, without food, or aid, or
money
,
she was cast forth at midnight; doubtless
cast forth to perish. But so it was not fated!
through storm and snow she struggled on!
barefoot! begging her bread! She reached
Madrid, and fainting in the street, some
charitable
hand conveyed her to the wretched
dwelling
,
where suffering, and woe, and utter
desolation
,
soon brought her to the long last home:
sole refuge of the wretched. She died! Died,
I say, died! but left me living; living alone
for vengeance. My tale is ended! it boots not
to tell how, when the second Charles regained
his father's throne, he yielded by base amnesty
the lands of his true followers, to the
oppressors
who had seized them. A double outlaw,
thence, have I lived for vengeanceand though
thus far thy father hath escaped me, some have
I had already, more shall I have ere longaye,
to satiety!
Some have I had already!and that, girl,
not a little. The monk I watched for weeks
for months(thy father,
conscience-stricken
,
had fled his country.) For months had I
watched him, till, as he journeyed towards
France, through the wild passes of the
Pyrenees
,
I swooped upon him. I dragged him to
the loneliest peak of those dread summits
stripped him and bound him to a
thunder-splintered
treeit was the very height of
summerplaced food and water close before
himso close that he could see! so far that he
could not reach itno, not to save his soul!
I left him there to perishyet watched him
from a distance, that none might succor or
release
himthat I might hear his blasphemies,
and mark his agonies, and glut my soul's dear
vengeance. He perishedhow, you may
guess; he perished there, and
knew me
ere he
perished.
Thine auntthe Lady Isidoremarried,
as thou knowest well, Teresa, the Conde di
Ribiera; and within three months after, was
found deadpierced by three mortal wounds
in her own bridal bed. I slew her!I,
TeresaI!I, Ringwood the avenger! scaled
the terrace at midnightentered her room and
woke herwoke her to die! One shriek rang
through the silent house, rousing its every
inmate
!
I leaped from the balcony, one
moment ere the chamber-doors flew open.
Have I not been avenged?
Before your father's eyes, your brother
died by the torture!
Before your father's eyes, Teresa, you
shall be shown ere long!shownwhat
hedared
to call my sister, and lied in calling her!
Start notbe sure of it; for it shall be! This
only boon I grant theegrant to thy courage,
girl, and nobleness of heart!that not now
will I wrong theenor by violence!thou
shalt consent to thine own degradation!
Meanwhile, rest herethat state-room shall be
thine; and the black girl, Cassandra, shall be
restored to thee; fit garments shall be furnished
thee; thou shalt eat at my table. Answer me
not, girl!not a wordit
shall
be so, I say it
shall!
I must on deck, somewhat is moving there,
that needs my presence. Content thee, and
farewell!
CHAPTER VI.
Broadly
and brightly dawned the morning,
which followed the departure of the
buccaneers
,
upon the forest-girdled wall of St.
Augustine
.
The sun shone blithely, and freshly
the sea-breeze blew. The small waves,
crisped
by the lightsome air, danced glittering in the
sunlight; while thousands of white gulls were
on the wing, fanning the wavelets with their
silver pinions. Jocund and merry was the
scene; and heavy must that heart have been,
which yielded not to the sweet soothing
influences
of the time and seasons. Heavy was
every heart, and downcast every eye, of those
who were abroad on that fair morning. The
bells of many a church and convent were
ringing,
With a deep sound to and fro
Heavily to the heart they go.
while on the four tall frigates, which now lay
moored in shore, under the covering guns of
battery and bastion, the colors waved at
half-mast
in honor to the dead, whose obsequies
were even now in process.
And now the city gates flew open, and a
long train of monks and friars, chanting the
mournful
miserere
, with crosslet and with
crosier, censer, and pix, and crucifix swept
forth from the wide portals. Then upborne
on the stalwart shoulders of four great Spanish
captains, whose plumes and sword-knots of
pure white betokened the brief years of him
they mourned, followed the coffin of the young
Melendez! Words cannot paint the agony
which overshadowed the bold lineaments, and
bowed to earth the manly frame of Juan,
following
to his last home the last male scion of
his immemorial race. Bravely, however,
manfully
he struggled with his tortures, and
subdued
them. Steadfastly did he gaze, with a
fixed tearless eye, upon the disappearing coffin;
as with heart-sickening sound the dull clods of
unconsecrated earthfor unanointed he had
fallen, unhouseled, and unshrivenrattled
upon its hollow lid; one quick spasm shook
his every limbdistorted every feature, as the
last sod was flattened down over that cherished
head, which now perceived, felt, suffered
nothing. The soldiers gathered round the
graveflash after flashroar after roarthe
volleyed honors of their musketry burst over
the dull ears that heard them not, nor heeded.
But with the rattling din the high soul of the
father lightened forth from the cloud of grief
which had oppressed ithe drew his long
bright rapier from its scabbard, stretched it forth
slowly above his son's low bed, and then
uplifting
it, with his eyes glaring upward, flung
his left hand abroad; and with distended chest,
beut brows, and head erect, stood for a second's
space motionless, stern, and silent, though his
lips quivered as with inward prayer, sublime
and awful in the might of self-controlling
energy
and pride. Then with a loud clear
voice
Hear! he exclaimedHear thou!
Maker
of all things, Judge of all men, hear! I,
Juan de Melendez de Aviles, noble of Spain,
and knight of Calatrava, swear! hear, on the
grave of the last male of the proud name I bear
here, with my foot upon the sod that covers
that young headwith my sword in my hand,
I swear: never, while life is left me, never, by
day nor by night, fasting or feasting, mirthful
or in the hour of woe, to cease from plotting,
from pursuing, from revenging!never until
this sword is crimson to the hilt with the
heart-blood
of him who slew theethee, innocent
and helpless that thou wert, mine own and
only one. If ever I unbelt the brand, if ever I
withdraw me from the chace, if ever I relent,
or spare, or pardon, till that the sword, the
faggot, and the gallows have, each and all,
been glutted with the lives of thy destroyers
if ever, oh! my son, I forget to avenge thee
may my flesh feed the vulture and the wolf
my soul be yielded to man's everlasting foe!
He paused, and as the sounds of his last
accents died awaymoved by one common
impulse, a dozen of the cavaliers who had
accompanied
the funeral train, and who
bareheaded
,
but with flashing eyes and inflamed
visages, had listened to the father's imprecation,
unsheathed at once their swords, and pointing
them to heaven, chorused that awful oath by
one deep, heartfelt, and unanimous amen!
For usfor us, and our sons after us, they
cried, be thine oath binding!never to
spare, nor pardon, nor relent!never to cease
from hunting to destruction the murderers of
thy dead sonthe ravishers of thy living
daughternever, so help us God, St. Jago, and
our honor!
The mournful ceremonial was concluded; a
massive cross of stone was pitched into the
sand at that grave's head, marking the spot
where he slumbers now so soundly, that
hapless
but high-hearted boythe spot, where
yesterday he bore so soldierly and well the
tortures which had slain him. The military
music of the garrison struck upthe very
trumpeters, inflamed by the sympathetic
indignation
which blazed forth so vividly from these
untamed and fearless cavaliers, struck up,
unbidden
,
that famous tune of old, the War
song of the Cidthe soldiers clashing their
arms in unison, and the wild cadences of the
shrill brass piercing each ear and stirring every
heart, they marched back to the city full of
exulting valor, parched with the thirst of
vengeance
.
A few hours later in the day, a dozen horses
led to and fro before the doors of a large
building
,
with a considerable crowd of grooms and
servitors and several sentinels on duty,
betokened
something of more than ordinary import
to be in process of enactment. It was the
government house, before the gates of which
that concourse was assembled; and in an
upper
chamber, the governor, with his chief
officers
,
was sitting in high council. Melendez,
as became his station no more than his skill
and mature wisdom, presided at the board;
Pedro, Gutierrez, and the veteran Diego were
seated the nearest to his person; the captains
of the four caravellas now at anchor in the
bay lent their co-operating aid, and the bold
youth, Don Amadis Ferrajo, though scarce
entitled by his years to such proud eminence,
had earned, by the brilliant reputation of his
impetuous valor, a place there which he filled
with as much of dignity as did the stateliest
veteran of them all. At the lower end of the
long table were placed two secretaries fully
engaged in minuting the orders of the council;
while just below a sort of bar, that ran across
the council chamber, two Spanish veterans,
well armed with sword and halberd, watched
over a young stalwart negro, who stood
between
them, entirely naked, except a cloth
about his loins, and a pair of Indian moccasins
upon his feet, with manacles of steel upon his
hands, but with a high free port and bold
demeanor
.
In a recess, likewise, below the bar,
usually covered by a curtain, which was now
drawn up, a fearful-looking instrument,
composed
of many wheels and springs of steel,
over which leaned a truculent dark-visaged
ruffin, showed the full means to which the
council had recourse to elicit truth from
stubborn
prisoners or unwilling witnesses.
Pointing to this recess, with its appalling
contents, Don Juan was in the act of speaking
to the prisoner, when he was interrupted by
his saying, in very tolerable Spanish.
There is no need of that, your Excellency!
without compulsion I am ready to declare
all that I know of these buccaneersfor that I
do
know something of them, it were quite
needless to deny. I have dealt with then often
sold them my fish and vegetables; and very
liberal buyers are they toosomewhat rough
handed at odd times, but what of thatif they
did slice off my old comrade Xavier's ears for
selling a raw Englishman a lot of gulls for
wildfowl, they gave him gold enough to buy
his freedom afterward. Yes? yes! I know all
their hauntsand I will tell the truthyes! I
will betray them alllead you up to their very
holdnow they have carried off the fair young
Senora, who had ever a sweet smile and a kind
word for the poor blacks. As for the proud
young Don, they might have tortured him to
all eternity, ere I would have told aught against
thembut now, now that they have carried off
Teresa
This to me, dog?Melendez interrupted
him, in tones that revealed the violence of his
feelingsKnow you to whom you speak?
This to me, to me, villain? Seize him, you
halberdiers, strip him, and drag him to the
rack. By the bones of St. James of
Compostella
,
he shall taste straightway of these
tortures
he prates about so glibly!yes! by the
sacred souls of the martyrs, he shall die under
them!
For Heaven's sake, hold, your
Excellency
,?'Diego
whispered in his earor we
shall get no word from him. I know the
knave of old! He is as stubborn as an old
mule of Arragon, and has, I believe, no more
feeling than a fish. Suffer his insolence, for
God's sakeso by his guidance we may save
your daughter.
You say very well, Sir Don Diego
interrupted
the free black, who had overheard
himYou say very well and wisely. For
if he gave me one wrench on that cursed rack
I would not speak one word to him; and if he
were to kill me, you know, that would bring
him no nearer to recovering his daughter. No!
no! it is no use to hurt menot the least in
the world. Besides, I did not mean to vex
him when I spokeI was thinking aloud only,
and wouldn't have said it, if I'd thoughtnot
but what it was quite true. I wont deny that
it was quite true. But lord! it would be no
use racking meyou'd just as well get
Spanish
words out of a big old alligator down in the
castle ditch, as you'd get anything but curses
out of me by all your torturing. But as I said
beforeI'll tell you all the truth, and bring
you right upon them, now that they've carried
off Teresa. Yes! yes! I know where they
're gone, and I'll carry all of you after them
but not with those big caravellasthey draw
quite too much water. But you can take the
ships' boats in, and mount some heavy guns in
the long fishing piroguesand thenyes! yes!
then you can catch the rogues, and kill them
and eat them if you like, too, for that matter
but I suppose you don't care so much about
thatand save the pretty Senorafor I don't
think they've done her much harm yethe's
an honest chap, is that Ringwood, to be such
an infernal thiefand pay them for screwing
the young Don, down there. Yes! yes! that
will be better much better that racking me;
now won't it? and he burst into a yell of
most obstreperous laughter.
May we trustthink you, good Diegoin
this knowledge that he boasts of? whispered
Melendez to his veteran counsellor.
Unquestionably may weanswered the
other, in the same low tones. There's not a
bayou or lagoon, a river or salt creek in all
Florida he does not know as well as his own
hatnor a sand key, or solitary rock along the
coast, but he has once and again explored it.
Besides he is in league of amity with the red
Indians, the wild Seminoles; and if he chooses
he can bring out the warriors of their tribe to
aid us. He is a faithful knave, too, and a
valiant
;
though somewhat bold of speech, and to
the windward not a little of due reverence for
his superiorsyet no man ever heard him tell
a lie, or break a promise! Best place full trust
in him! Heard you not what he said of the
Senora
?
since she was but a child he loved her
and he knows, as I hear, right well the
character
of the great English Rover.
Well, fellow, you
can
guide us, as you
say, and will. Well then, suppose we trust
you, shall we set forth, and how?
You shall set sail to-nightdirectly
answered the negro promptlywith your
four caravellas; and make all speed quite
round Cape Floridaand then run sixty miles
up, close along the coastthen get out all the
boats, and man them full; and take along with
you fifteen or twenty big pirogues the
fishermen
came in this morning after the storm, filled
full of soldiers, and with heavy guns. There
is a narrowoh very narrowcreek, not ten
yards quite across, puts in there from the sea,
covered with manchinell and mangroves so no
eye can discover itup that you shall row
twenty, aye, nigh thirty miles, and there you
will find a big clear lake, with fort, and village,
and feluccasthere live the pirates! their
stronghold.
And you can pilot us? So be it, then!
No! no! replied the black, pilot you I
could
very well; but that won't do!no! no!
if you go up alone, the pirates fire on you from
the bush, cut you up quite, beat you all to the
devilno! no! my comrade Xavier, he best
must pilot you. I must get out old
Tigertail
the
great chief of the Seminoles, with his
red warriors, and go quiet quite through the
forestso when you take them front, we fall
upon their back, and shoot them every way
destroy them altogether. Don Amadis go
along with ushe'll go along with black
Antonio, he'll gohe fears not anything!
take fifty musket men, and with the Indians
we'll doyes! yes! we'll do quite well, and
save Teresa!
He's right, your Excellency, black
Antonio
is right, exclaimed the eager Amadis.
I'll go with him, by St. Jago! He shames
us all for wisdom!and hark, Antonio, I'll
take a hundred men, not fiftya hundred of
my own old Castilians. Where will you find
the Indians?where's Xavier?quick! quick,
speak.
Xavier's below, Don Amadis, he was along
with me when these kind gentlemen, looking
toward the halberdiers, laid hold of me, and
he wont stir, till he sees me! And for the
Indians
,
never fear but I can find themget you
your men into marching trim, with lots of ball
and ammunition; and let each soldier bring a
spare firelock with him, so can we arm a
hundred
of the Seminoles, and meet me at the land
gate by sunset, and we'll get under weigh at
once'
Hold! hold! replied Melendez, evidently
speaking in great agitation and much doubt,
this will not do, I fear, no! no! It will be
quite impossible to act in concert; we shall
fall on at different times, and so be beaten in
detail.
Not so, fair sir, the negro answered
eagerly
,
the Indian runners will watch all your
movements from the shore, and bring us word
into the bush, when you have pulled up into
the stream, and how you prosper!no fear
but we can act in concert!
For a few moments the stern governor mused
deeply, the dark expression and hard lines of
his bold visage showing no tokens of
incertitude
or agitation; yet the broad hand, which
he had laid upon the board, quivered
perceptibly
,
and he kept beating his heel with a quick
nervous action against the footstool, which was
placed before his honorary chair.
Remove the negro, he said at length,
raising his eyes slowly from the floor on which
they had been rivetedtreat him with
kindness
,
but keep strict ward on himbegone!
A little bustle took place, while the
halberdiers
were leading off Antonio, and the
secretaries
,
in obedience to a signal from Don Juan,
were withdrawing from the chamber. The
moment it ceased, however, Melendez rose
from his seat; and casting his eyes round the
circle as if to read the thought of each of his
advisers, addressed them firmly, with a voice,
low-pitched indeed, and perhaps somewhat
subdued, but steady withal and unfaltering.
Gentlemen, he began, and comrades. I
am a father, as ye know; and, as a father,
must feel deeply the appalling situation of my
most wretched childmust burn to rescue her
from the pollution which, if it have not tainted,
surrounds at least, and threatens her. I am a
soldier likewise, and governor of this fair town;
and, as such, am in honor bound and duty to
fetter down all private sentiments obedient to
my military devoir!am bound to provide,
before all things, for the good state and safety
of this my loyal government. I am hard set,
and look to all of you for council. Should we
adopt the negro's plan, and trust to his
guidance
as,
if we move at all in this same
business
,
I see not how we can do elsethere is
good
cause to hope!
great
cause to fear. If
he be trustworthy, and if his plan succeed, we
shall preserve Teresaroot out, and utterly
destroy a nest of pestilent accursed pirates, and
win great booty, and no small renown! If on
the other hand we failwhich we may do
right easilyour whole force
must
be
annihilated
nor
is this all! We must so weaken
the garrison here at St. Augustine, for to make
any head against them we shall need every
man that we can musterthat if we be beaten,
and the buccaneers follow, as they doubtless
will, the blow, they might well win the city!
Thus stands the casethere is a mighty gain!
there is a mighty peril! I
can
notI
dare
not
decide!for I cannot distinguish, so fiercely is
my soul disturbed, between a parent's passion
and a leader's duty! Speak ye in order, then!
Diegofirst! and oh speak honestly and
freely!
Before he had sat down, the old greyheaded
warrior started to his feet; and cool although
he was, and guarded for the most part, he
spoke as hotly nowas passionately as a
boy!
The question, gentlemen, is thisthis
absolutely
!
ONLY! Whether we shall give up a
womana Christian maida Spanish lady
to the brutal violence of these incarnate fiends
without one blowone effort to relieve her;
or march with all our power to liberate her if
we may! to die for her if we may not! Being
myself a Spaniard, a soldier, and a knight, I
have but one reply to this question, and see not
how
a Juan
could find a second! we
must
essay
it with all our best endeavors, and leave
the rest to God!
Not for the maiden's sake alone,
exclaimed
Gutierrez eagerly, though that were
ample cause! but as I see the matter, in duty
to our king we stand bound to avenge the
insult
offered to his flag, in duty to humanity to
hunt out wretches, who set its every dictate at
defiance, in duty to the laws of common policy
to strike at the foe in his own place of strength,
rather than wait his pleasure to assault our
weakness!
Besides, cried Pedro, we are far stronger
than our ordinary power by aid of these stout
caravellastheir crews will double our
effective
strength!
I brought with me, a private volunteer, one
hundred picked Castilians, bound to no duties,
save at mine own will, cried Amadis, with
fiery vehemence; if not a soldier else stir
from the city gates, I, with my men, march out
to-night at sunset!
And I, exclaimed the elder and superior
of the four Spanish sea captains, as in
obedience
to my broad letters of commission, shall
sail this night with my four frigates, to take
burn, sink, and by all means, destroy and
harass
the foemen of my king and country!
Eight hundred stont hands can we muster for
boat service; leaving enough behind to work
and guard the caravellas! Do you, Sir
Governor
,
embark six hundred more of your best
veterans on board us, press every fisherman and
mariner to follow us, with every boat, pirogue,
or galley, they can find; let this young cavalier
go with his followers to join the Indians, and
my life on the issue!
Be it so, gentlemen! Fair thanks to all
for your good courtesy! and may God guard
the right. You, Don Diego, I leave
here
nay,
it must be so, my good friendlieutenant in
my absence. Pedro, Gutierrez, let the drums
beat to arms!muster the garrison in the great
square! pick out six hundred, the youngest and
best soldiers!let each man have his morion
and breast plate, but no back piece, brassards
or taslets; each man a musket with a
hundred
round of cartridge, broadsword and
dagger
,
and two pistols! Ye gentlemen of the
marine will see them on board straightway!
A word with thee, Don Amadis! Ye to your
duties, gentlemen, anon I will be with ye!
Amadis, he continued, as soon as they
were left alone, win her and wear her! If
God give you the grace to rescue her, before
God shall you wed her. Get your men under
arms, take with you black Antonio, and God
speed you!
Trumpets pealed wildly through the streets
the drums rolled long and loudand, with
the clash of arms and tramp of marshalled
footsteps
,
the veterans of the garrison were
mustered
!
Before the sun set, the tall caravellas
had cleared the landlocked bay, staggering out
to sea with a fair breeze, each stitch of canvas
set that they could carry; and his last glances
fell upon the little party of Don Amadis, filing
away under the guidance of the faithful negro,
into the pathless forest.
CHAPTER VII.
It
was already afternoon when Ringwood
left the cabin; so far had the recital of his tale,
broken by violent fits of wrathful indignation,
and bursts of fiery passion, trespassed upon the
day. When he reached the deck, he found he
had conjectured, justly, the cause of the bustle
overhead, which had excited his attention,
while in the very heat and tumult of his
remembered
wrongs and meditated vengeance.
The vessel was now heading to the
northward
,
having already rounded the extremity of
Florida, and, with the wind on her laboard
beam, blowing strong and warm directly from
the Gulf, was running close in shore along the
western coast of that forest-mantled promon
tory. The alteration in the course of the
felucca, and corresponding changes of her trim
and tackling, had, therefore, as Ringwood
supposed
,
produced the sounds on deckconfusion
tending unto order. The wide spread studding
sails which had protruded many feet beyond
her ordinary yard-arms, wooing the favorable
breeze, while, previous to their doubling the
cape, it had fallen full upon her starboard
quarter
,
were now reduced, her topsails reefed, and
her topgallant yards sent down, as if in
preparation
for a storm, although no cloud or speck
of vapor was visible on the bright clear horizon.
Her consorts, close behind her, were gliding
along gently under the same easy sail, in
obedience
,
as it seemed, to a set of signals floating
at Ringwood's fore, and thence repeated by
each following barque of the squadron, which
came on singly, in long file, the leading vessel
being a mile, at least, in advance of the last.
The waves, or wavelets ratherfor though
the breeze blew steadily and strong, the surface
of the Gulf was, notwithstanding, singularly
calm and levelwere as bright, and almost as
transparent as a sheet of crystal; every rock,
every coral reef that rose sheer from the white
and sandy bottomnay, every green variety of
ocean-grass and weed, every bright shell and
gorgeous sea-flower that studded, as with a
thousand living gems, the glistening pavement
of the deep, was visible as clearly as though no
denser medium than the air were interposed
between
them and the eye that gazed in rapture
on their wonders. Scores of bright flying fish,
their white scales glancing silvery to the
sunshine
,
their wing-like fans fast flashing, leaped
up from the small ripples, momently, and
vanished
beneath them; the blue shark shot along,
suspended, as it were, in the transparent
waters
,
leaving behind him a long streak of
flashing
lustre; the albatross soared high upon his
snow-white pinion, while gulls and
sea-swallows
,
and petals of every size and color
skimmed
the calm deep in the pursuit of prey or
pleasure. To the right, meanwhile, lay the
low shores of Florida, glowing with mingled
tints of almost magical verdure. Tall palms,
with their soft, feathery tops, towering far, far
up into the blue serene, above the denser
foliage
of the oaks and locusts which blended with
giant cedars; and the funereal cypress, hung
with long wreaths of pale and ghostly moss,
composed the eternal forestthe forest which,
in its turn, overpowering thousands of
flowering
shrubs: magnolias, with their vast
chalices
of odoriferous snow; and dogwood, bright
with unnumbered star-like blossoms: roses of
every hue: calmias, and rhododendrons, and
azalias, with manyfold and clustered bloom,
varying from pure white, through all the
shades of blush, and pink, and violet, to
gorgeous
kingly purple. And above all, the
orange, that young bride of the vegetable world,
enriching all the atmosphere with powerful
and almost oppressive perfume. Bushes of
manchineal and mangrove fringed the low
banks, growing far out into the shallow waters,
which actually laved their roots, and floated the
long wreaths of massive greenery that
garlanded
their pendulous branches.
Hard by the outer verge of this sea cradled
coppice, with little room to spare between her
tall topgallant masts and the wide-reaching
limbs of the huge forest trees which, here and
there, protruding from the brow of some bluff
eminence, or island knoll, overhung the
navigable
channel, the gallant picaroon shot onward,
her bellying sails shimmering white in the
meridian sunbeams, and the glad waters
foaming
before her sharp, lean bows, rippling with
a hoarse laughter along her beautifully moulded
sides, and forming in her wake a broad and
frothy furrow, where, parted for a moment by
her fleet transit, they foamed and frolicked as
if they joyed in their reunion. Fair blew the
western breeze, and fresh; and, as the sun
turned westward in his path of glory, it
freshened
more and more: and as the shades of
evening grew less distant, fleeter it waxed, and
stronger, till it became a stiff, though not
unfavorable
gale.
Long before this, had the topgallant masts
of the felucca been housed; and now her
topsails
were close reefed, and still with
undiminished
speednow lying over as the gale fell
full and steady on her distended canvas, till her
long yards seemed on the point of dipping into
the waves to leeward; now surging up again
with graceful elasticity in every temporary lull
the rapid barque flew through the gurgling
waters. Fast flew she, nor less fast did her
gay consorts follow; nor did the winged hours
flag more than they in their career across the
firmament.
The day was nigh spent, and the dim presage
of approaching night was stealing fast over the
azure vault, on the last western verge of which,
his lower rim already merged in its ocean
bed, glowing like a red furnace with his
borrowed
lustrehalf the sun's disk of gold hung
on the very point of disappearing. A thousand
purple tints were creeping over the bright pure
sky; a thousand rosy gleams were flickering
upon the glassy waves, most like the varying
hues seen on the changeful scales of the
expiring
dolphin: and now he plunged into the
deep. For a few seconds, long, radiant
streams of many-colored light, ruby, and pink,
and violet, checkered the darkening arch: these
passed away, and a deep purple shadow swept
slowly, as projected from a curtain interposed,
across the firmament of heavenacross the
laughing waters. Scarcely, however, had that
purple shade pervaded the whole visible
universe
,
before another change succeeded.
Myriads
of stars, planets, and stationary orbs, and
confused milky constellations, burst out at once,
like eyes unclouded from sleep, beaming, or
twinkling with quick diamond rays, from every
quarter of the deep blue, viewless ether, which
stretched away, contrasted to their sudden
brilliancy, far, fara vast abyss of lustrous
blackness. Still fair and freshly blew the
breezestill the bark bounded onward, eager
as the worn steed, which all forgets his
weariness
as he draws nigh his stall.
Ho! Cunninghame, exclaimed the Rover,
pausing in his walk to and fro on his brief
quarter-deck. Ho! we be here at lastbid
them beat instantly to quarters.
The order had been anticipated by the crew
before the words were spokenthe drummer
had assumed his instrument, and the men were
already mustered in divisions, expectant of the
call to quarters; for they had made the last well
remembered headland, a short league to the
southward of their harbor. Taking his cue then
from the Rover's words, almost before his
officer
had issued the command, the long roll of the
drum might be heard mingling with the sweet
sign of the sea breeze; and with the first rattle
the strong-handed crew flew to their proper
stations
.
Down with the helm, and square away
the yards. The rattling of the blocks
succeeded
,
and the harsh straining of the cordage,
mixed with a rumbling creak, as the huge yards
obeyed their impulse; and instantly the
graceful
ship fell off before the wind, and stood with
accelerated speed directly towards the shore,
which she had hugged all day.
Away there, topmen! and with the word,
the nimble hands were hurrying up the rigging,
and ready for the next command.
In with your fore and mizen topsails, and
ere five minutes had elapsed, the sails were clued
up in festoons, and the ponderous yards upon
the caps. House the foretopmast, followed;
and instantly the heel of that huge spar ran
half way down to the lower mastHouse
the mizen topmast. In with the main
topsail
.
House the main topmast. These orders
were immediately obeyed; and in less than ten
minutes from the time when she had kept away,
the felucca was dashing, as it seemed, dead
ashore, with her three topmasts struck, her
yards a-cockbill, and not one stitch of canvas,
save the foresail, set.
Before her lay the shore, low as it has been
described and levelbordered with a deep
fringe of floating verdureamong and over
which the surf, set in by the strong western
gale, broke high and stormy, and covered far
aloft with the impenetrable and eternal foliage
of the tropical forest! Behind her whistled the
driving breeze, and swelled the rolling billows!
on she came, fast and fearless! and now her
bows were almost battered in the upflashing
surf! yet was there visible no opening in the
3
low-growing mangrovesno gap in the vast
mass of leafy blackness, which stood out like
a wall in clear and palpable relief against the
starry sky! one thing, however, might have
been marked by a sailor's eye, although a
landsman would scarce have discerned the sign,
or known its meaning, if he had discoverd it.
Right under the light vessel's bowsprit there
showed one narrow spot where the surf broke
not, where undisturbed the floating mangroves
reposed upon a streak, for it was nothing more,
of dark blue water, scarcely ten yards in width,
where for a little space the giant timber that
overhung them receded from the margin of the
billows. Right upon this the felucca steered, the
practised hand of no less a mariner than
Ringwood
wielding the obedient tiller! Right upon
this she steered, as though she followed a well
known and easy channel into a secure
harbor
.
Ready there forward with the long
starboard
falconet! demanded the clear accents of
the Rover.
Ready, Sir! was the quick response.
Then fire! a stream of vivid flame burst
from the bow port of the picaroon, driving a
cloud of snow white smoke before it, and the
loud booming voice of the heavy gun succeeded.
Immediately a quick thin flash was seen ashore,
followed by the report of a carbineand then,
right in the centre of the little bay formed by
the recess of the forest trees, directly over the
space of dark blue water, a blaze of red light
burst forth sharp and dazzling, a dusky
crimson
glare, in which the bright green foliage of
the underwood, and the rugged stems of the
huge timber trees, the purple billows, and the
dark sky, glowed with a deep and lurid tinge.
Stand by there, with the grapnels!
On! on! she dartedthe thick embowered
manchineals were pierced by her long tapering
bowsprither cut-water plunged into their
dense greenerythe parted branches rattled
and scraped right against her lean bows as they
severed themthe leaves, entangled in her
rigging
,
were torn violently from their parent
branches; a moment, and she had passed
through them; and with the impulse of her
previous motion, was rushing up a deep but
narrow riverso narrow, that there were
scarcely six clear feet of space between her
bulwarks
and the shore on either hand. Heave
and the iron grapplings, whirled by strong
hands and with a will, rattled among the
tangled
coppiceOn shore there!
Aye! aye!
Haul taut, and belay! and instantly, from
either bow, a strong rope was dragged forcibly
ashore by unseen hands, and made fast to the
giant
trunks which shaded both banks of that dark
stream with an unbroken barrierthe vessel
was checked from her way, and after lying for
a few seconds motionless, yielded to the strong
tide which was setting like a mill-race outward,
and fell aft to the full swing of her cable.
Get hands enough ashore now, Master
Cunninghame; carry out warps, and swing her
round the pointlook alive! look alive!
Godslifethe Albicore is close in shore even
now; heave at the capstan ho!round with it,
men, round with it! or she'll be into us stem on!
Scarce forty yards from the embouchure of
the river, the channel turned at a sharp angle
round a low point into a small round basin;
whence with a tortuous route the stream might
be traced, turbid and black and swift, but
singularly
narrow, for miles into the heart of the
forest, to the far source where it boiled up at
once, from the bowels of the earth into a large
broad poolso deep that never lead had found
its bottom, even at its birth a river. Upon this
point a little knot of men was gathered: and
here the light had been displayed at the
felucca's
signal, which had now quite expired.
The men wrought eagerly and well; and many
minutes had not passed before the picaroon
swung roung the point into the little landlocked
basin; just as a gun from the Albicore
announced
her proximity, and was replied to, as before,
by a brief exhibition of the same crimson light.
Meanwhile the Rover had got all his boats
out, and strongly manned; so that before the
second barque rounded the inner point, he was
already under weigh, towing, and sweeping,
where the stream occasionally widened, and
warping through its frequent windings towards
its sequestered source; hearing, each after each,
the signal guns of his consorts as they made
the cove, and confident that, for a time at least,
all were secure from peril, whether of wind or
warfare. Through all that livelong night the
crews toiled faithfully by gangs, plying the
oars in the light whale-boats, or laboring with
more severe exertions at the huge sweeps of the
felucca! All night they toiled; but not all
night did Ringwood, wearied with past labor and
yet more overdone by struggling with his own
furious passions, watch on the guarded deck.
At midnight, or a little after, descending the
companion stairs, he sought the privacy of his
own cabin. Erect and stern the negro sentry
stood at his wonted post, presenting arms as his
proud leader passed.
Let Charon call my steward, he said,
bid him bring food and wine.
Even now it waits you, noble sir,
answered
the black attendant, this hour or more
it hath been prepared.
Without more words the Rover entered his
apartment, and blithely did it show, and
cheerfully
by the bright radiance of the large crystal
lamps, suspended from the gilded beams, and
throwing into every angle and recess a flood of
clear illumination. The large square board,
still cumbered with its accustomed load of
books and charts, papers scrawled over with
problems of singular and abstruse calculation,
quadrant, and astrolabe, and compass, and other
instruments of singular device, and, as in
those days it was deemed, rare virtue, had been
wheeled aside; in its stead a small round table,
covered with a cloth of brilliant whiteness, and
bearing all provocatives to tempt a languid
appetite
,
now occupied the centre of the cabin. A
single cover of richly chased and burnished
gold, with spoons and forks of the same
precious
metal; a goblet, rough with work of
Benvenuto's
graver; several tall rummers of thin
Venice glass, flanked by two flasks of wine,
appropriate decorations to a cold larded capon,
a salted neat's tongue, caviar, and other
delicacies
of a like thirsty nature.
Yet did the pirate chief manifest little
inclination
to taste the dainties, which, till he saw
them set before him, he fancied he had needed.
He threw himself into a velvet-cushioned chair,
which stood beside the board, stretched out his
legs, and covering his face with his broad hand,
remained for many minutes silent, absorbed in
deep and gloomy meditation. At length he
started up and sat erect, gazing about him with
a strange bewildered glance, as if he had
expected
to discover some one whose voice had
roused him from his lethargy; within a second's
space, however, he was calm and collected as
before.
Marvellous, marvellous, indeed! he said,
thinking aloud as it were, and probably
unconscious
that his thoughts had found utterance;
marvellous tricks our truant fancy plays us;
but, tush!I am outdone with weariness and
watching, my mind wanders.
He stood up and drew his hand across his
forehead, as if to pluck aside some cloud which
veiled his mental eyesight; then seizing a tall
flagon of champagne, he untwisted the wire
which secured the cork, decanted one half of
its generous and foamy liquor into a mighty
glass of Venice crystal, quaffed it off at a single
draught, and replaced the goblet. Then, as if
conquering his deeply-seated loathing, he
applied
himself to carve the capon, placed a few
morsels on his platter, and forced himself to
swallow a mere mouthful. But it was all in
vain! Again he had recourse to the rich wine;
and, after drinking it, fell back into his chair,
and as before mused deeply; dark frowning
shadows stealing across his broad fair brow,
and strange emotions curling his lip at times
with a fierce sneering spasm; anon these
gloomy signs passed over, and were succeeded
by a severe though sad expression: as if some
tender melancholy recollection had swept over
the unfolded tablets of his soul, and erased for
the moment thence each darker stain of sin or
worldly sorrow.
'Tis strange, he said, again, after a long
deep pause,  'tis passing strange, how at this
time the images of by-gone scenes, aye, to the
very verdure of the trees, and shadows thrown
by the yellow sunbeams athwart the laughing
landscape, array themselves before mine eyes,
in palpable distinctness. Yet was there no
linkno chain in the tenor of my thought to
join these visions of the past, with the utility
of the stern present. Strange, they are very
strange indeed, these pranks of the imagination!
Those boyish reminiscences were clear upon
my spirit, as the events of yesterdayevery
word that I spoke myself, every tone that I
marked of othersand thou, thou too, my
sister! The ancient village churchthe quiet
and sequestered pew in the shadowy corner
the sunbeams full of dusty motes streaming in
through the oriel windowthe humble devout
congregationthe old grey-headed curate
aye! I could hear the very accents of his
sonorous
voice, could mark the hum of the
responses
,
could hear the lisping trill of thy small
girlish treblemy sistermy lost sister!as
we did kneel together on the bright Sabbath
morningsas we did kneeland pray!pray
pray, he muttered, as though the sense of
the word had escaped his understanding; then
struck his forehead heavily with his expanded
palm, and now! he said, and now! Well
well, it is no matter! and, rallying by a
violent
effort his seattered senses, he quaffed off a
third goblet of champagne, and moving with a
rapid and firm step towards the starboard state
room of his cabin, seemed as though on the
point of opening the door; but just as his hand
touched the latch he paused, for the low sound
of regular calm breathing fell on his ear. Aye
aye! he said, ayeI had forgotten!
He turned away, and entering the alcove
between
the two small chambers, looked long and
with a fervent and excited gaze upon the
lovely
picture which hung there, with that serene
and innocent smile which, like a seraph's voice,
seemed to pour something of consolatory hope
into the bosomworn as it was and blighted,
and filled at that very instant by turbulent and
fiery conflict between good thoughts and evil,
of him who gazed on it so fixedly.
His eye, as he withdrew it from the picture,
fell on the crucifix of gold, which stood upon
the little table under itand, moved as he
was by a strange and long unfelt revulsion,
he knelt down before it, and burying his head
in his clasped hands, burst at once into a flood
of wild hysterical weeping.
I know not, he said thoughtfully, as he
arose, I know notwould God that I did!
Cunninghame, now, would term this naught
but a heated mind working upon a weary body
but no! no! I know it notit is not so!
Why do I doubt? I who have never doubted,
or pity, whose revenge has had no check or
stay of mercy! Whence, whence these
retrospections
to the long, long-forgotten past?
these journeyings backward of the soul to pure
and innocent days? Whence this insatiable
and longing wish for restfor restfor
something
stiller than mere reposesounder than
earthly sleepmore peaceful than tranquillity
itself? Wherefore this loathing of hot action,
for which till now I have alone existed? Is it
that coming death is even now spreading above
me the shadow, the prophetic gloom of his
approach
?
Is it, that now but one deed more
rests to be done, until my great revenge shall
be completed, and I may lay me down, my last
toil ended, and sleepsleep dreamlessly,
soundly
,
and for ever! and yet that one deed? that
one deed? no! no! no! Great God, it cannot be
and stillmy oath! why, why, doth she look
like my sister? Well! well! to-morrow will
be time enough! to-morrow!
Still gazing thoughtfully about him, and
walking to and fro with his right hand firmly
pressed upon his forehead, and his left hanging
down by his side tightly clenched and
quivering
,
he mused a little longer, then locking the
outer door of his cabin, he turned into his
state-room
;
and without altering his dress, or
drawing
off his buskins, wrapped his watch-cloak
about him, and threw himself on his cot; where
motionless and seeming in tranquil sleep he
lay, till the morning sun shone broad and
bright into the stern windows, pouring a flood
of golden light upon the cold stern features
which felt not, nor acknowledged the genial
warmth of its young lustre.
CHAPTER VIII.
The
strong beams of the morning sun, pouring
a flood of emerald-tinted lustre, caught from the
leafy arches through which they made their
way, into the stern lights of the Rover's cabin,
aroused him from his troubled slumbers. He
rose up on the instant in perfect possession of all
his senses, drew his hand once or twice across
his fine broad brow, as if to wipe away some
thought that had sat heavy there during the
hours of sleep, and then plunged his whole
head into an ewer of cold water, to cool its
feverish throbbing. This done, and his
disordered
dress arranged with somewhat finical
nicety, he hastened to the deck of his galley,
where his presence was hailed with a shout of
enthusiastic rapture by the assembled crew.
The scene was widely altered since the
preceding
sunset; for now the pirate squadron lay
calmly floating in a small wood-girt basin, so
exquisitely clear and glassy, that every line
and moulding of the vessels, every small rope
and fluttering pennant, was drawn to the very
life on the dark mirror of the still deep waters;
and it might well have tasked the strongest
vision to define the exact place where the sub
stance and the shadow met, so wonderfully
were they blended.
At first sight it appeared that this small pool
or lakelet, which was so nearly circular that it
might have been fancied artificial, and in no
direction was it a quarter of a mile across,
although
so marvellously deep that the deepest
sealine had never yet found bottom, though
run out to five hundred fathoms, was altogether
landlocked, and had no outlet for its brimming
waters; for it was hedged around on every
side but one, by the dense brakes and ever-living
umbrage of the tropical forest, and there the
shore sloped gently upward in a rich turfy
lawn of the tenderest verdure. On a nearer
inspection, however, it was not difficult to
detect
the spot, by the opening in the tree-tops,
where rushed from that secluded spring the
powerful and abundant stream, which boiled
up from the bowels of the earth, here at its very
birth a river; although it made so short a turn
immediately on quitting the parent basin, that
no part of its course was visible. Immediately
on the water's edge, where the smooth lawn
sloped upward, forming a gentle hillock, a long
green mound of short close greensward, cut
into many an angular zigzag, many a crescent,
and wedged ravelin, and abutting at either
extremity
on a small half-moon bastion of wrought
stone, presented a terrible array of batteries
mounted with above a hundred black-mouthed
cannon, grinning defiance to any bold invader
who should penetrate so deeply into the
Rover's
haunts as to reach this his inmost hold,
many a mile aloof from the blue billows of the
Mexican Gulf. From either bastion there was
drawn a line of powerful stoccades facing an
eastern rampart with many salient angles,
running
entirely round the hillock between its
grassy esplanade and the deep masses of the
forest which surrounded it; and a broad ditch
cut with vast labor through the swampy soil,
and lined with square hewn timber completely
isolated the position, which had been chosen
with so much skill, and fortified so masterly by
the directions of the great English Rover. The
space within the lines, which might have
formed an area of a mile's circuit, contained
many long wooden buildings, erected at right
angles to each other, with wide verandahs and
long porticoes, all clustered round the base of
the hill, presenting a picturesque and gay
appearance
;
for they were painted tastefully
enough with white and green in broad
contrasting
stripes, like some of the modern Italian
villas, and all the verandahs were furnished
with curtained awnings of the most sumptuous
and magnificent materials, velvets and rich
brocades, and gold and silver tissues, more like
the fanciful pavilions of some fairy palace, than
the adornments of a piratical stronghold.
Around the crest of the little hill,
commanding
the whole area, and forming evidently the
citadel of the position, a triple line of earthen
ramparts, with deep dry ditches, crowned with
chevaux de frise, and mounted with long
culverins
,
guarded the scarped ascent, and
encircled
a large keep or block-house, which
occupied
the summit of the knollthe Rover's
palace-castle.
Such was the scene which lay brightly
illuminated
by the low morning sunbeams, but
checkered here and there with cool blue
shadows
,
cast by the forest trees and grotesque
buildings over the emerald lawn, under the eyes
of Ringwood.
But though he was no mean judge, nor
careless
observer of the wild charms of nature, he
had gazed too often on that strange and lovely
prospect, to give at this time more than a
passing
glance to its attractions; besides, the
moment
had its duties. There was of course no
anchorage in that unfathomed gulf, whereon
the low and rakish picaroons floated so
calmly
;
they were moored, therefore, in shore, for
the banks were all abrupt and molden, by
hooks and grapnels; Ringwood's felucca, as the
largest, lying the furthest from the batteries, and
covering the outlet of the river with her
broadside
.
The other barks were anchored to the
shore at various points, so as to concentrate
their fire on the same spot, much further up the
basin and under the very guns of the fort, the
smallest of the squadron lying directly in front
of the water-gate, and covered by the eastern
bastion.
The crews, it would appear, of all the rest,
had already landed; for with the exception of
a single sentinel on the forecastle of each, not
a soul was to be seen on board; while, dotting
everywhere the verdant area of the fort, some
lounging idly in the cool shadows of the
curtained
porticoes, some walking to and fro in
little groups and parties, some dallying with
gaily dressed, light-mannered girls, two or
three hundred of the buccaneers were visible;
while from within the dwellings, loud bursts of
revelry, mingled with the sweet laughter and
half sportive shrieks of women, and now and
then a gay licentious song, or the tinkling of a
lute, betokened the presence of many more
inhabitants
than met the gazer's eye.
Ha! Anson, exclaimed Ringwood,
addressing
one of his subordinate officers with a
smile, I have played something overmuch
the sluggard; and these good fellows are, I
warrant me, fretting to be ashore among the
bona robas
yonder. So to it, sir, at once; hoist
all the boats out presently, except my private
pinnace, and have the people landed. Keep
the barge to the last; I will ashore in it
myself
.
A louder acclamation than that even which
had greeted the appearance of the rover on his
deck, now burst forth from the merry crew, as
they rushed with tumultuous hurry to their
quarters, eagerly urging their light duty, and
hoisting out the boats with many a jovial cheer
and hasty halloa! For a few minutes the
great buccaneer stood looking on in silence, till
the last boat had pushed off with its noisy
freight, leaving the barge's crew alone, waiting
for their superiors, who were grouped on the
forecastle; and the small private pinnace
swinging
beneath the stern-lights of the cabin. Then
motioning his officers to wait for his return, he
descending the companion-stair, and once more
entered his own cabin.
Pluto! he cried, Ho! Pluto! as he
entered; and as the negro sentinel thrust in his
turbaned head, at the half-opened doorjump
up on deck, and clear away my pinnace; bring
it round to the starboard gangway, and after
we shall have left the shipI and the gentlemen
do thou and Charon lead down the lady there,
and the black lass, and row them to the
sally-port
,
entering the covered way: I will be there
to meet ye; and hark, sirrah, in your eardo
thou, or thy swart comrade, but once look
lustfully
upon their beauties, and thou shalt wish
thyself dead fifty times, ere death shall end thy
tortures. See to it, and begone; then, as the
negroes hurried forth to execute his orders,
Teresa! he called aloudcome forth,
Teresa! There was a pause of a few
minutes
,
interrupted only by a slight rustling
sound as if of female garments, from the
state-room
;
but no one answered anything; nor
did she, when he called, come forth. What,
ho! he cried again: come forth, come forth,
Teresa! or, by the Lord that lives, you shall
repent it. Best not provoke me, beauty.
As he spoke the door opened, and the sweet
girl came forth, somewhat refreshed, indeed,
by sleep, but with her clear and luminous skin
still pale as alabaster; so that her large dark
eye, contrasted with the singular whiteness of
her face, showed almost supernaturally full and
lustrous. Her hair had been arranged in neat,
broad plaits, wound simply round the classic
contour of her head; and over her high brow
a single heavy curl falling down with a
massive
sweep behind each delicate ear; but her
neck, and the first gentle swell of her young
bosom, were all bare, and her round dimpled
arms uncovered to the shoulders; yet, even in
her disarray, there was a true dignity in every
motion, so rigid and severe a modesty in the
chaste, sorrowful eye, so perfect an air of
unconsciousness
of aught unseemlyalthough,
indeed, she was most consciousthat the most
hardened debauchee could no more have found
matter for voluptuous thoughts there, than in
the cold, denuded limbs of marble saint or angel.
I come, she answered, her words flowing
out in a calm, passionless, and even strain, as
though her very fears were dead. I come,
obedient to your call, so to eschew worse
outrage
.
I come; what would you?
Sweet lady, replied Ringwood, with a
half-meaning courtesy of accent, sweet,
innocent
lady, that you prepare you straightway to
take boat, in charge of my staunch guardsmen,
and so to my poor dwelling; there I will see
you presently. Meantime, in yonder
state-room
are store of velvet mantles; take one of
them, I pray you, and wrap you closely in its
folds; and 'twere no evil done, if you should
cast a silk kerchief, in lieu of veil, over those
lovely lineaments. I would not give your
charms to the brute gaze of the rude sailors.
Wherefore, kind sir, and most
considerate
,
she said, a slight flush rising to her pallid
cheek, or to what purpose would you veil,
to-day, me, whom, but two days ago, you did
display in so unwomanly disarray to the same
eyes from which you now would hide me?
perchance from motives not pure and
disinterested
?
Simply, returned the rover, in a cold,
resolute
voice, simply for that it is my will! and
have a carehave thou a care, Teresa,
provoke
me not too farI say provoke me
not! It were as easy, every whit, to me, to
strip your charms to the broad day, and so
parade
you to the gaping wonder of those brute
mariners, as to say, `veil your beauties!' By
God! he added, lashing himself into fury as
he proceeded, by God! it were as easy to
cast you forth a booty to the untamed
licentiousness
of those who know no mercyas
thus
As thus from selfish passion, she
interrupted
him, thus to reserve me for the more
foul dishonor of your own private pleasures!
Of my own private pleasures! he repeated,
mimicking the very tones of her voiceof
my own private pleasures! right daintily worded
that, dear lady, and very true withal. My own
most private pleasures, of which, believe me,
sweet one, you soon shall be the most choice
minister, and the well-pleased partakerand
now to punish you for this, your insolence,
and teach you wisdom for the future!
And with the words, he made one quick step
forward, and throwing both his arms round her
fair form, one encircling her lovely shoulders
and swan-like neck, the other twining with
irresistible pressure her slight rounded waist, he
clasped her to him in a close embrace, kissing
her lips, and sucking her sweet breath, till she
had well nigh fainted in his arms. She did
not shriek, nor struggleno more could she
have struggled within the overpowering grasp
of that gigantic frame, than could the linnet
strive against the talons of the ger-falcon. She
did not shriek; for there was none to hear;
much less to aid, or rescue her. But yet she
yielded not one jotmuch less responded to
his passionate caressbut stood within his
circling arms, cold, rigid, stern, impassive as a
wrought shape of bronze or marblenot a
pulse in her body bounded beyond its usual
motion; not a quicker throb of her bosom
answered
to the hot beatings of his heartnot a
pant was on her breath, not a cloud on her
clear steady eye, not a dew drop on her
honeyed lipbut when he again released her
from his arms, a faint brief color stole over her
cheeks and brow, and, when it receded, left her
even paler than beforeand a quick shudder
shook her limbs for a moment.
Thus deal I with the stuhborn, said
Ringwood
,
as he let her go, thus deal I with the
insolent and stubborn! see, if you like it not,
that you offend not in like sort again! and now,
do as I bid you, and make ready!
As he spoke, he turned on his heel, and
leaving the cabin, rejoined his subordinates on
deck, and shortly after going down into the
barge threw himself at full length on the
cushions
in the stern sheets, and was pulled to shore
as rapidly as twenty vigorous seamen could
ply their oars in that calm basin. While she,
deserted by the calm resolution which had
borne her up while in the presence of her
persecutor
,
and which a secret instinct rightly
taught her to be the only weapon with which
she could successfully oppose his forceful
violence
,
burst instantly into a wild agony of tears
and sobbing, and falling to the ground,
continued
in a series of fainting fits and swoons,
until the terrified Cassandra, who had been
twice already summoned by the negroes, brought
her back to her senses, by her half frantic
entreaties
,
that she would arise and obey the
orders
of the pirate, if she would save her life or
honor. Then she aroused herself at once, as
soon as she became conscious of her handpmaid's meaning; and casting one of the velvet
cloaks around her, by a strong effort gulped
down the whole of her hysterical passion,
wiped away the traces of her tears, and
followed
the tall negro to the pinnace wherein his
fellow was already seated at the oar.
No princess of old Spain could have been
treated with more ample courtesy, more deep
respect, by the most stately cavalier of her
proud court, than was Teresa by the two
pirate blacks. Not a glance of their bright
eyes rested upon her features for a moment
not a word was spoken, but such as were of
absolute necessity; and, when she had taken
her seat in the stern of the little boat with the
black girl crouching as usual at her feet, the
men took to their oars, and pulled as fast as
they were able, in perfect silence, towards the
sally-port, at the base of the western bastion,
upon the battlements of which the stately
figure of the great buccaneer was already
visible
,
as he awaited the arrival of his captive.
As the boat neared the port, however, he
descended
from his lofty stand; and as the keel
grated upon the pebbly marge, the portcullis
rose, the gate flew open, and displayed him
standing within the low browed archa third
negro, of similar dimensions to those who
were assisting the girls from the boat, holding
a flambean at his side.
They had not entered one second's space,
before the iron grating was again lowered, and
the heavy gate swung back, leaving the
boatmen
on the outer side, and Teresa found
herself
in a low, narrow-vaulted passage,
stretching
away into interminable darkness, though
continually ascending by flights of broad flat
steps, as if towards the daylight; but little
being
rendered visible by the smoky torch of the
negro, who preceded them in silence, except
the key-stone of the rude arch overhead, and
the mildewed walls on the right hand and left.
Take my arm, girl, exclaimed Ringwood,
and lean on it! mind what I say to you, and
forget not the lesson I was compelled to teach
you, even now; which, by the heaven above
`us! shall be as nothing to that which you
shall
learn, if you be any more refractory!
Pale as the winter's snow, and scarce less
cold, she took his proffered arm, in silence but
untrembling; and she
did
lean on him, for in
good truth she was scarce able to support
herself even when she entered; and the dank
mildew vapors of that cold vault, wherein the
drops of moisture were constantly detaching
themselves from the roof and plashing on the
muddy earth, had yet more overpowered her,
so that full surely she had lacked the strength
to drag her limbs along, has she not been
supported
by the nervous arm of Ringwood, to
which she clung with a convulsive gripe of
which she was indeed scarce conscious.
After walking for some distance through this
deep covered way, having ascended not less
than a hundred steps at different times, and in
various placesthey reached a huge oak door,
clenched with large nails, which gave them
access to a tall winding staircase, carried up
through a shaft in the earth, similar to a well,
each step being a beam of solid timbers, hewn
rudely with the axe, and all unconscious of
the adze or plane of the neat-handed joiner.
After ascending this rugged stairway, they
reached a little vestibule, above the level of
the ground, the floor and walls of which were
covered with neat Indian mattings, lighted by
a long shot-hole or crenelle, through which a
golden sunbeam, full of a million dancing
motes, streamed in, filling the little place with
glorious light and gaiety, which seemed more
lovely to those who viewed it in close contrast
to the swart darkness of the subterranean
galleries
which they had but just quitted. From
this small vestibule a second staircase, wrought
in the thickness of the wall, quickly conducted.
Ringwood and his fair captiveclose to whom
crept, more terrified a thousand times than her
pale mistress, the black slave girl Cassandra
to a well-lighted airy hall, overlookingas it
was easy to perceivefrom the upper story of
the Rover's keep, the whole green end of the
pirate fortress, with the gay dwellings and the
glassy bay, and the beautiful vessels moored
in their several berths, all laughing out in the
glad golden sunlight, which poured down
everywhere over the wide spread tropical
forests, and over that small inland lakelet, from
the soft smiling heavens.
The hall in which they stood, lighted by
four tall lattices, and looking down upon that
romantic view, was itself worthy of attention
from its magnificent and tasteful decorations.
The ceiling of dark Indian wood, from which
swung a vast golden lamp that once had
decked
some sacred edifice, was polished till it
shone like a mirror; the walls, covered with
hangings of green velvet, were all adorned with
groups of glittering weapons, disposed in rare
and picturesque patterns of every singular
variety
of forth and purpose. Shirts of
ring-mail
,
and corslets of bright plate, and casques
embossed with gold circular shields of oriental
fashion. Damascus cimeters, and Spanish
blades, and rare Italian daggers, all glittering
with gems and flashing to the morning sun.
The floor was carpeted with velvet, and a divan
of the same rich material, corded and laced
with gold, ran round the walls of the
apartment
;
while on a massive table was spread a
sumptuous collation, with many flagons of rich
wine, and tall Venetian glasses, among rich
meats and vases full of the dewy flowers of that
rare southern clime. There were no tenants
to this splendid hall, but from a door that
faced the staircase, which had been partially
left open, there came the mingled sounds of
more than one sweet low-toned female voice;
and once or twice a long soft thrilling laugh,
that seemed to speak a heart at ease and
happy
.
These sounds were followed, just as the
Rover led his prisoner into that noble hall, by
a light air touched exquisitely on a lute, and
accompanied by a rich clear melodious voice of
a girl singing. Her execution was admirable
her tones thrilled to the very heart like liquid
firebut, alas! the song was so passionately,
painfully voluptuous, that it could have flowed
from no modest lips, and should have been
listened
to by no modest ears. Pierced to the
soul, Teresa faltered, and stood stillbut
Ringwood with a strong pressure of her arm,
and a stern whisper of his deep penetrating
voice, saying, Beware! I say, beware,
Teresa, half led, half bore her onward to the
door whence came those hateful sounds. He
threw it open, and the sight she saw, stuck
that unhappy girl,more than the most
dreadful
of the dread scenes she had already
witnessed
with
agony and terror and despair.
CHAPTER IX.
The
room to which Teresa was thus
unwiilingly
introduced, was of dimensions
somewhat
smaller than the hall or armory on which
it opened, but far more graceful and luxurious
in its decorations. Its casements, although
high and spacious, and admirably calculated to
admit every breath of air that might be stirring,
were completely closed against the garish light
by deep Italian awnings of peach-colored
damask, striped with broad silver arabesques,
through which the rays stole softly, mellowed
to the same tender hue. The walls were hung
with Genoa velvet of the same delicate color,
divided into panels by rich frames of Venetian
filagree in silverthe very floor was strewn
with carpets of the same materialmirrors
were everywhere in bright profusion,
curtained
with gauzy veils of the faintest pink
couches and ottomans of down, with covers of
soft silktables and cabinets of marquetry and
buhl completed the furniture of this voluptuous
bower, the very atmosphere of which, like the
haunts fabled by Grecian bards, of that
Cytherean
goddess, reeked by the perfumes redolent
of love. But if the chamber and its
decorations
were in themselves luxurious almost
beyond
description, what words can paint the
charms almost unearthly, the Aphrodisian air,
the prodigal voluptuousness of its inmates?
They were but three in numberthree young
and splendid girls, all the very flower and flush
of young ripe womanhoodall beautifulbut
oh! how different in their beauty.
The firstshe it was whose rich clear voice
had reached Teresa's ear before she entered
was a rare specimen of that peculiar style of
English loveliness, which, save to the
voluptuary
,
is rendered far less lovely by the
predominance
in all its traits essential to
intellectual
thoughtand yet she was indeed most
beautiful. Her forehead, though rather low
than otherwise, was whiter than the virgin
snow-wreath, before the soft west wind has
thawed its dazzling purity, and smooth as it
was whiteher delicately pencilled brows
o'erarched
a pair of large soft eyes swimming in
liquid lighther nose was delicate and small
her lips of the richest crimson, wooingly
prominent
,
disclosed a set of teeth so pearly and
transparent in their lustre, that they set simile
at naught. Her hair, of the lightest and the
most shining brown, was all dishevelled as it
seemed,but, in truth, trained most artfully to
fall and float in a thousand wreaths of silky
ringlets, over her neck and shoulders, and far
below her waist, shrouding her as with a
golden glory. But exquisite as were her
features
,
they yet were nothing in comparison to
her unrivalled symmetry of personthe plump
and rounded neck wreathed to and fro with
many a swanlike motion, the soft full arch of
her superbly falling shoulders, the swell of the
fair bosom, even now in her fresh girlhood
luxuriant and mature, with myriads of fine
azure veins meandering about its glowing
surface
the
slender waist scarcely confined by
the slight silver zone that gathered in the folds
of the white gauzy lawn that scarcely veiled
her bust, leaving her shoulders and round
dimpled arms all unencumbered; the wavy
outlines of her form, indicated by the fall of
the thick heavy drapery of azure silk that
flowed from her waist downward, to the earth,
suffering only the extremity of one small foot
decked with a silver sandal to peep out
modestly
beneath the hem.
Such was the foremost of the fair tenants o
the room, who met the cold indignant eye of
the young prisoner, as she leaned negligently
on a pile of satin cushions, warbling the
amatory
air which had so shocked Teresa; not
that there was any touch of grossness or
indecency
in the words, which, the more fatally
seductive for that very want, breathed the full
soul of passion blended with sentiment and
pathosbut that the singer threw into every
tone and accent a manner so voluptuous, an
expression so entirely sensual, that, to an
ear not yet corrupted into sin, the effect was
painful and disgusting.
The second damsel was a tall slender
Persian
,
with the warm dusky hue of her
country's
complexion on her soft velvet skin, a
soft rich flush peering out upon either cheek,
like the first touch of young Aurora's pencil
upon the waving night-cloudsher eyes,
fringed by long silky lashes, dark, deep, and
swimming, now melted into a sleepy languor,
now flashed out with intolerable lustreher
hair, black as the raven's wing, was twisted
into a mass of little spiral curls, and decked
with chain work ornaments of gold, a glittering
amulet all set with sapphires of rare price
lying
by either ear. Her dress, too, was no less
dissimilar to that of her fair beauty, than was
the style of her loveliness; yet, though no
portion
of her flesh was visible, except the face
and hands and a small part of the throat, it yet
displayed her person, scarcely in a less degree
than did that of her companion which left her
bosom, shoulders, and arms almost entirely
bare. She wore a close cymar or jacket of
bright yellow satin, all flowered with sprigs of
gold, and buttoned up in front with studs of
chrysolite; below the zone, she was clothed in
loose trousers of gold-sprigged Indian muslin,
with heavy golden bangles, allhung with
glittering
bells, about her ankles, and light gilded
slippers
on her small shapely feet. There was,
perhaps, even more of beauty in the
movements
,
in the exceeding grace, in the air, the
manner of this oriental fair one, than in her
personal charms, as she danced lightly to and
fro, bending her slight shape into many a
strange and graceful posture, waving her arms,
whose every gesture was perfection, and
swaying
all her limbs with an exquisite freedom,
her golden bells chiming the while in time to
the words of the singer, and the tones of the
lute or gittern which the third girla tall
black-browed Italianwas striking with rare
skill, uttering ever and anon one of those
low-toned
happy laughs, which should have told
of an innocent heart at ease, but which, alas,
announced no more than heartless levity. The
tresses of the lute player, though black as the
bright Persian's ringlets, were as different from
them in their nature and disposition as things
can beeven the most dissimilarfor they
were parted evenly upon her forehead, and
flowed down quite uncurled in long and wavy
masses, actually resting in loose coils upon
the velvet floor-cloth, as she sat near the
English girl on a low ottoman, with her back
to a great Venetian mirror, which reflected the
contour of all her sloping shoulders down
nearly to the waist.
Such was the scenesuch the companions
to which the buccaneer now introduced his
captive. For a moment, so soft were the
carpets
of the armory, and so light had been the
footsteps of the new comersfor a moment the
girls continued their occupations, unconscious
that they were overlooked by any mortal eye
but when, after a meaning pause of a second's
space, and a threatening glance at Teresa,
Ringwood
advanced a step or two, the Persian
dancer
raised her head from one of her low
bending
attitudes, and catching sight of her stately
lord, uttered a shrill cry of surprise, and
bounded
forward like an antelope to meet him;
quick, however, as were her movements, she
was nevertheless outstripped by the fair beauty,
who, being seated nearer the door, sprang up
the moment she heard the outcry of the other,
and was in the embrace of the buccaneer with
the speed of light, winding her beautiful bare
arms about his noble person, pressing her
panting
bosom close to his mighty chest, and
pouring
a flood of sweet burning kisses on his
brow, eyes, and mouth; uttering all the time
a low soft murmur, all eloquent of eager
passion
,
and blushing so profusely with excitement,
that all her neck and bosom, seen clearly
through the thin gauze of her boddice, were
crimsoned by the torrent of hot blood, that
coursed through every vein of her whole body
like streams of burning lava. Nor was the
pirate chieftain slow or reluctant to return her
passionate caress, but clasped her in a long
embrace. After a minute, however, he
released
her, reluctant as it seemed. And there
amid those sirens, as beautiful as either, but,
oh! how different in her calm, innocent, pure
loveliness, scarce conscious of her own
exquisite
attractions, and all unsunned by any tinge
of noonday passion, from their unmaidenly
beauty, which actually pained the feelings
though it might fix the eye and rivet the mere
senses of the beholder, stood the sad Spanish
maiden. At first she gazed in mute
astonishment
,
unable to conceive the possibility of
aught so boldly passionate as the blonde
beauty's rapturebut gradually, as she felt her
own heart bound too fiercely in her bosom, and
her own pulses throb, she knew not wherefore,
she let her eyes sink to the carpet, and stood
all breathless and dismayed blushes and paleness
chasing each other over her speaking
lineaments
,
like the alternate lights and shadows
which sweep in autumn days over some lovely
landscape. The slave-girl all the time gazed
with dilated eyes that seemed to drink in all
that passed before themwithout, however,
comprehending anything; clinging with one
hand to the velvet cloak which partly shrouded
the form of her pale mistress, and trembling
wildly between fear and admiration.
When this strange scene had ended,
Ringwood
turned towards his prisoner, and taking
her by the hand said, while a cold convulsive
shudder shook her whole form
These lovely girls, Teresa, shall be your
future comradesthis bower of bliss shall be
your dwelling. Pleasure shall wait your very
wish; luxury, such as no human heart has
ever dreamed of, shall lull you to your
slumbers
;
not an air of heaven shall visit your
brow too roughly; and your whole life shall
glide away like one soft dream of rapture.
Bella, my fair-haired beauty, welcome your
new companion, choose her a boudoir near
your ownfit her with garments such as your
own rare taste may choose, and her rare beauty
justify, and above all, he added, lowering his
voice to a tender whisper, be not thou jealous,
rare one; for if I seek to win her to my will,
it is not anything for love, but all for
vengeance
!
and now, farewell, sweet sirens all,
he added, speaking once more aloud, and let
me find you, my Teresa, happy as these fair
creatures when I revisit you to-morrow.
Oh no! she cried, in vehement impetuous
tones, that would not brook control even of
reason, oh no! no! no! Leave me not here,
leave me not here, with these! No, better,
better far to languish in the deepest dungeon;
to writhe in untold agonies; to share the
slenderest
pittance of the most wretched
innocent
slave, than live in plenty thus, with wanton
guilt and barefaced infamy for comrades!
Slay me, then, slay me with agonies protracted,
as you will, cast me forth to the beasts of the
forest, tear my limbs joint from joint, but leave
me not with these.
Teresa, he said, speaking in a low but
distinct voice, with fearful emphasis, Teresa,
I have sworn, and you well know how deeply,
and with how deep a cause! Now mark me,
one thing I have remitted to you, in one thing
have I pardoned; tempt me no further, I
beseech
you.
O, slay me! slay me, rathershe
frantically
interrupted him.
I will, he said, I will, by Heaven! if
you say any more about it; but not as you
supposeI
will
, Teresa, I will cast you forth
if you provoke me any further; but not to the
wild beasts of the forest! By Him that lives!
tigers and sharks are merciful compared with
those to whom I will abandon you! Hark to
that shout of revelry and riot!
they
shall enjoy
the charms which you would keep so charily!
in the rack of their barbarous embraces shall
your frame writhe with anguish! by their
hands shall your limbs be torn joint from joint!
Three days I give you, but three days! to
yield you wholly to my will; or beyond doubt
it shall be done to you as I have spoken!
With an air of proud defiance, tossing her
long black locks from her pale forehead, her
bosom panting, and her eyes flashing as if with
a prophetic inspiration, she raised her head,
which had drooped on her bosom, and shook
her finger, menacingly, at the great Rover.
And I tell thee, she said, in clear and
liquid tonesthey were like the blast of a
silver
trumpet, and I tell thee, that ere three
days thou shalt be called to thine accountbe
it for good or evil!
Then! answered he, bursting into an
uncontrollable
fit of fury, then! by my Marker!
to
thine
shalt
thou
precede me! and he made
a step forward as if to seize her by the arm;
when the Italian girl and the gay Persian
dancer rushed between, and entangling him in
their caresses, hung round his sinewy frame,
like honeysuckles, wreathing their sweet
tendrils
about some giant oak; while at the same
moment the fair-haired Bella laid her hand on
the Spanish maiden's shoulder, with a delicate
respectful pressure, and in a soft voice
whispered
blandly
Oh! irritate him not! oh! irritate him not,
dear ladyfor although, when he is himself,
none are more noble-hearted, none are more
generous and kind, none are more gentle, yet
when the paroxysm is upon him, he is the
slave of fifty furious demons, his own
unchained
passions, to which the fiends
themselves
were powerless and tame! oh! irritate
him not! and all may yet be well; and see, he
smiles, she added, quite disregarding the air
of bitter scorn with which Teresa met her soft
and disinterested advances; and casting herself
in the way of the Rover with the conscious air
of a favorite, she threw her arms about his
neck, and stopped the words he seemed about
to utter by a long ardent kiss, whispering in his
ear as she did so, Heed her not now, she
will be tamer soonconsider she is but fresh
caged; and even singing birds will dash
themselves
against the bars of their fresh cages, even
although those bars be gilded! and she uttered
a low sweet merry laugh; which, though in
truth both the action which preceded it, and the
laugh itself, originated in the best and tenderest
motives, struck upon the breast of Teresa as
the height of cold unfeeling heartlessness.
The Rover laughed as he returned the fair
girl's kiss.
Well, be it so, beautiful Bellabe it so, if
you will; and then stooping down, he
whispered
a sentence in her ear. None heard it
but sheand, pushing him gently to the door,
cried, Oh, yes! I will remember: and now
goReginald, now go!
Nothing more was said for the moment; and,
turning quietly away, the Rover left the room,
closing the door behind himreleasing Teresa
from the dread, which, when he rushed
towards
her, despite her dauntless courage, had
shaken her every nerve.
He had not, however, quitted the apartment
a minute, before Bella again approached the
maidenan air of calm compassion sitting
serenely
on her lovely features; and laying her
white hand, which showed like snow itself for
the contrast, upon the darker complexion of
Teresa's arm
Come, lady, come with me, she said,
almost
humbly. Come to my private bower,
and we will seek for some attire less
unbecoming
.
With me you will be safe, and can take
some repose, of which I judge it certain you
must stand in need very greatly.
But the proud virgin shook off the caressing
hand as if contamination had been in its
slightest
pressure, and shrank back from her
consolation
with an air of absolute horror.
Pray, shrink not from me thus, the
English
girl exclaimed, in accents that told
forcibly
the depth of her emotions, her face again
covered with a deep, deep blush, far different
from the hot crimson color that had suffused
her whole complexion at the words of her
lover.
Nay, shrink not from me thus, dear lady:
contamination lies not in the mere touch, even
of the violet. It is the mind which, alone,
pollutes; and God, he knows that, be I what I
may myself, I would not teach vice to
another
no!
not to be virtuous again myself,
which I can never be, nor pure as I once was.
Nor yet too much despise us: for, be sure, lady,
that as thou art now, we were all once; as
innocent
,
as pure, as noble; and be
not
too sure,
lady, proud though thou be, and as unsunned
pure snow, and strong in puritybe not too
sure that thou be not in a few days as we now
are!
NeverOh no! by my own soul, no!
never! answered Teresa, eagerly, but in a
manner much mollified by her companion's
manner.
Be not too sure! Bella responded.
Honor is dear, indeeddearer than life to the
innocentbut life is very sweet! and death,
under the tortures, very awful; and if, by
losing life, we may
not
save our honor
Then better
die
dishonored!Teresa
interrupted
herbut though I hear your words
I cannot comprehend their purport?
Like enough, lady!like enough! and
may you never do sobut I believe you will!
For you will learn that this same honor, for
which you would die willingly, may be rent
from you, living, by the brute violence, not of
one noble-minded, although erring, soldier, but
of a thousand brutal desperadoesand that
you may not die till all, even the loathsome
blacks, are sated, and then die horriblyoh!
horribly.Better, perhaps, comply, than suffer
thus.
Besides, continued the other, as if she
had scarcely heard the Spanish maiden's words
Besides, if he so will it, without force he
can win you. No man's arm, and no woman's
heart ever successfully opposed, when he was
resolute in earnestthe fixed and
overwhelming
will of Reginald. Lady, before
three days, if
he
so
will
it, you shall dote on
him unto adoration.
You know not what you say, answered
the Spaniard firmly, but no longer with any
vehemence of passion in her tone. I love
another.
Ha! is it so? replied Bella Is it so?
then indeed, it may be, you shall not fall: for
had I loved another
then
, as I love
now
, surely
I had endured all sooner!
And do you thendo
you
in truth
love
this dread being? said Teresa, strong interest
overpowing the disgust which she had felt to
her frail companion. Do
you
indeed
love
you
, who seem so soft and gentlethis
merciless
,
this fiend-like Rover?
For what then do you take me?
exclaimed
Bella, looking full in the eyes of Teresa,
with as proud and haughty an air as she had
lately met, with all my mind, and heart, and
spirit!think you an English lady, though
she may stoop for love to be a Pirate's leman,
would feign love which she felt not? With
my whole mind, and heart, and spirit, I
worship
,
I adore him! In his lovein his life
I alone have my beingwhen he dies I shall
not survive him!it is enoughtrust to me;
you have naught to fearneither harm to your
person, nor pollution to your mindcome to
my hower, and I will speak with you more
fully.
The Spanish girl, who for a moment,
dignified
as she was, and proud and haughty, had
actually quailed before the fiery and surpassing
pride of the pirate's paramour, now feeling
perhaps that she had something wronged her
in her thoughts, and at all events experiencing
a melting of the heart towards one who, al
though frail, was kind to her and very gentle,
and who might have some palliation of her
crime in the peculiar circumstances of her sad
tale, answered no further, but took her proffered
hand in silence, and leaning on her shoulder,
for she was fast becoming very weak, retired to
the beauty's boudoir.
CHAPTER X.
The
day passed over, as all days must, in its
appointed time, whether of joy or sorrow, and
the great sun went down upon the pirate's
hold, as peacefully as on the shepherd's hut,
all bright and blessing, and one by one the
stars came out in their set places, and the
broad moon arosea ball of liquid silver.
The day passed overbut through its weary
hours, though trembling at each distant
footstep
,
and shuddering at every voice, Teresa
heard no more, saw no more, of the dreaded
Rover; and as she learned by slow degrees to
forgetif not to forgivethe frailty of her
lovely hostess in her compassionate kindness;
and as hour after hour glided by, and naught
occurred to wake new apprehension, the
tension
of her nerves, strong preternaturally by
the intense and terrible excitement of the scenes
in which she had so lately borne a part so
prominent, was gradually softened down; her
tears flowed, not convulsively, but in a
tranquil
stream which ever seemed to relieve her
burning brain from one half of its fiery burden
she now wept not for herself aloneand
even that rather from nervous agitation, than
that she had appreciated her positionbut for
her tortured, butchered brotherfor her
unhappy
parentfor, more than all besideher
true, her
own
dear Amadis! Nor did she only
weep!she prayedprayed purely, fervently,
with strong affectionate unwavering faith, for
strengththat only real strengththe strength
which cometh from on highto bear in calm
humility, in Christian fortitude, whatever might
be sent to her by
Him
, who sendeth all his
gifts, whether of joy or sorrow, wisely and
well, andthough we, thoughtless and
hardhearted
,
believe it not to be sofor our eternal
good! She prayedand rose up from her
bended kneesas all will rise who do pray
fervently, and purely, and with faith
refreshed
and comforted in spirit, and
strengthened
with an inward hope, surpassing any
confidence
of earth, in a strong Rescuer on high.
She rose up, braver than she had knelt down,
and with a better courage; for it was not
based on her own vain confidence of heart,
and stubborn purpose, but in the love of
Him
who slumbereth not, nor sleepeth, nor
overlooketh
the least hair that is rent from the head
of his most humble worshipper.
She rose up, as we have said, comforted and
strengthenedshe washed, and braided her
disordered locks, and clad herself in the most
modest garments of her fair entertainer; she
ate and drank, and laid her down in her pure
unsunned innocence, beside that bright hut
erring being, whose very virtues had been
melted down by the uncurbed indulgence
of-ungovernable
passions, into voluptuous vice,
and slept as soundly and as sweetly as the
young happy infant cradled upon its mother's
bosom. While long, long after she had sunk
to rest, the fair-haired beauty watched every
long drawn breath, and almost wept, she knew
not why, over the calm unconscious sleeper
till when the night had far advanced towards
morning, she started, as if into remembrance,
from a sudden dream; and rising from Teresa's
side, thrust her small snowy feet into a pair of
fairy slippers, drew a large robe of velvet
about her shapely limbs, and stole away, nor
returned any more to her own bower, until the
tropical sun was high already in the clear
firmament.
That day the Rover came not nigh Teresa,
for in the fort without, and in the circular
basin, all was now bustle and hot haste.
During
the night two more feluccas, which had
been detached from the rest upon some distant
cruise, had been warped into the harbor and
found berths beside their consorts, and all the
morning long all hands were actively employed
refitting them for instant servicewater casks
were rolled out, and filled, and hoisted in again;
and biscuit, and rich meats, and fragrant wines,
and arms, and ammunition, and fresh men,
embarked with emulous haste. At noon, as
the two girls might see from Bella's bower
for having, though half reluctant, and half
doubtful of her own liberty to do so, become
in some degree conciliated to that kind although
guilty creature, Teresa would no more consent
to quit
her
private chamber; nor to seek any
more intercourse with those who, although in
truth no more guilty than the English girl, yet
seemed so to her eyes, already influenced
alas! weak mortals!by some small show of
kindness; at noon as the two girls might see
from Bella's
bower, a council was held within
the ramparts of the keep of all the pirate
leaders; and shortly after the drum beat to
arms, and all the buccaneers assembled, and
fell into their ranks, a gay and gorgeous host,
numbering at least twelve hundred practised
warriors.
After a brief inspection by the great
buccaneer
himself, eight hundred were detailed,
and instantly embarked in the two last arrived
feluccas, and all the vessels of the other
squadron, saving alone the largest bark
Ringwood's
own flagshipand the small sloop or
tender which lay moored by the water-gate.
Within an hour at furthest, the last of this
gallant squadron, detached, as it was evident,
on some peculiar duty, disappeared behind a
dense mass of trees which veiled the outlet of
the harbor; and so strong was the current of
the river which leaped up there at once, a
giant from its birth, that in less than two hours
more, they were well out to sea, with their
sails set to the stiff breeze, ploughing the
billows
merrily.
With them, however, we go not on their
path of rapinetheir sails were spread, and
their masts bent to the morning blast, and their
lean bows cleft with a sound of laughter the
blue waves. But no eye from the pirate's hold
could mark them, though many a heart beat
eager with anticipation. When they were out
of sight, after some short parade and manning
of the guns, Ringwood dismissed his men; and
with his arms folded upon his bosom, and his
proud head depressed as though in melancholy
thought, strolled for some time in a listless
mood about the esplanade of the fort, and then
withdrew quietly to his own turret chamber,
where nonenot his most intimate associates
not his most trusted officersever presumed
to break upon his solitude; and there remained
all moody and alone, till the sun had already
plunged his lower limb into the deep and tufted
foliage of the surrounding forest. Just at that
time, however, as the land-breeze began to die
away, and a faint languid calm succeeded,
before
the setting in of the fresher breath of the
free oceana dull, deep, heavy sounda sort
of rumbling and continuous roar was heard by
the watchers on the bastions; and while they
were yet wondering what those hoarse notes
might mean, the Rover stood among them
Ordnance! he criedand heavy
ordnance
!man
all the batteries, load, and run
out the guns; see you have linstocks ready,
and fire at hand to light them.
And, although many doubted that those far
sounds were indeed gunsnone disobeyed his
orders; none hesitated for a momentand ere
long it was proved how perfect was the ear,
how accurate the judgment of the great
English
Roverfor as the sea breeze freshened,
and blew strong, it bore upon its dewy breath
the sharp reports of many a single cannon, of
many a long continuous volley. At last the
sounds died off, and seemed to melt into the
distance, and pass entirely awaybut again,
just as it grew quite dark, before the moon had
risen, or the stars yet come out, the
cannonading
was renewed, closer, as it seemed, than
before; and after a brief furious battle, a
crimson
glare rushed up the deep blue sky; and so
continued, wavering nownow flashing fiery
bright, for nigh an hour of time; then a keen
stream, or column rather, of white light shot
up towards the zenith with a dull heavy shock;
a shower of sparks fell seaward, and all was
dark and silent. All that night long torches
were blazing, and guards pacing the stone
bastions
,
and blue lights dimly burning in all the
trenches of the outer works. Nay, more, the
guns were manned even in the citadel itself,
and in the Rover's keepand all those tedious
hours with ear, heart, eye on the alert, Teresa
watched and prayed in the strong hope of
coming
succor. Both vessels in the harbor were
full manned, and all in battle orderbut,
though all hearts were burning, all arms high
strung against the foe, though Reginald
himself
waked to devise means of desperate
defence
,
half doubting that his consorts were cut
off, and two-thirds of his men destroyed, for
well he knew no one would yield him captive
no foe appearednor friend. The chirpings
and hummings of the innumerable insect tribes
the croak of the countless reptiles, mixed
with the chatter of the night-hawk and the
rich melody of an occasional mocking-bird,
were the only sounds that waked the night
echoes of the Florida forest, except the
watchword
and the tramp of the stern sentinel.
Just as day dawned, commanding the small
sloop to slip her cable, and with a picked and
veteran crew of twenty English sailors, to drop
down cautiously and reconnoitre, Ringwood
departed from the busy ramparts; and, for the
first time since the stormy scene which had
ensued on Teresa's introduction, turned towards
the bower. He lingered not, however, there;
when he found none within its gorgeous
precincts
,
save the Italian girl and the soft Persian
dancer, though each tried her choicest
allurements
to detain him; but passed, after a
few short moments, into the bower of his
English
favorite.
Ha! Bella, he said, as he entered, my
sweet Bella, and a touch of real fondness
was audible in its rich accentsand thou,
Teresa, nay! nay! start not, nor look so
wildly
,
ladyI come not to alarm, much less to
harm you; sit, fair one, and fear nothing.
Now, Bella, dearest, I have watched all night
long, and am fatigued and faint, bid your slave
girls bring forth their dainties, I come to break
my fast in your sweet company, and spend a
tranquil hour, and with the words he cast his
splendid figure at length upon a satin ottoman
on the side of the chamber furthest from
Teresa
,
in an attitude of the most perfect grace and
majesty, and remained for some seconds
without
speaking, a grave and even sorrowful
expression
prevading his expressive lineaments.
After a few moments, raising his eyes to
Teresa's
face, he perceived that the blank air of
dismay, almost despair, still sat upon her pallid
features; and that with lips apart, nostrils
dilated, and eyes rigidly set and glaring, she
gazed upon his features as if she therein
thought to read her doom.
Fear nothing now from me, he again
said, in a voice singularly mild and witching.
Fear nothing now from me, Teresa. The
fire has gone out here, and he laid his broad
hand on his brow, and if you fan it not by
any heedless folly, will sleep, perchance, for
ever. The fiend of memory is for a while at
rest; see that you wake it not to phrensy!
nay, wonder not, nor start at my words, either.
If I have sinned much I have suffered much,
and many of my sins have been the rank fruit
of those very sufferings. But a truce now to
this; my word is pledged to you, that you
shall undergo no violence. My word, girl,
inviolate
yetsee that you stir me not to any
reckless fitwhen reason yields the reins to
memory, to weakness, and revenge! Teresa,
fear me not!
I fear you not, she answered, half
timidly
,
half reassured by his strangely altered
manner
,
though I have mighty cause to fear you,
yet I do not!
So you shall have no causedaring
myself
,
I love the daring and undaunted, even when
they defy me! sin-stained myself and
passion-blighted
,
I yet admire the innocent and pure.
Dauntless I do
know
you, Teresa!for had
you not been so, long hence had your
dishonored
carcase glutted the dog-fish and the
shark, and pure I do believe you! Were it
not, I say, for memory and pride, I might even
now release you.
Oh! do! do! she exclaimed, do so;
and God will bless you; your sins, though red
as scarlet, shall become white as snow; your
rapines and your crimes shall all be pardoned
you; a grateful virgin's prayers shall rise up
nightly for your weal, shall win the grace of
the Eternal, shall shield your head in battle,
that not a hair of it shall perish, and more, far
more, than with a self-approving conscience,
shall crown your days with bliss, and steep
your nights in quiet. Do so, and on your bed
of death a weak girl's voice of gratitude shall
smoothe your thorny pillowher father's
Ha!no more!Peace on your life, no
more! cried Ringwood, fiercely interrupting
her, as he half started from the couch whereon
he was reclining, at the mere mention of the
man whom he indeed had so deep cause to
execrate; though but a little while before he
had seemed on the point of yielding to her
prayers. Teresa, nerved with the hope of
winning him, would have replied; and by so
doing would probably have once more roused
him into a burst of savage and ungovernable
fury, but as her lips moved to answer, Bella,
who had been absent for a moment with her
handmaids, fortunately returned, and laying
her hand on Teresa's shoulder, pressed it so
strongly, that she looked up, and then she laid
her fingers to her own mouth with a grave
smile, and changed the subject by addressing
Ringwood with some slight question of no
moment
.
Meantime the board was opened with
dainties
,
choice fruits, and savory meats, and snowy
bread, and the enchanting wines of Southern
Europe, in bowls of porcelain and crystal,
dishes embossed with gold, and flasks
engraved
by the unequalled chisel of Cellini
and Ringwood led, strange guests! the
fair-haired
Bella, and that stern innocent Spanish
virgin, to seats beside him; and played the
host with such unrivalled courtesy, such proud
humility in every accent of his rich, deep,
manly voice, such dignity and grace in every
free unstudied gesture, that even Teresa was
won for a space from her gloomy abstraction,
and to her own astonishmentwhen she
reflected
on it afterwardsfound herself
wondering
atalmost admiringthe chivalric and
dignified demeanor of the fierce pirate.
Before the meal was concluded, one of the
slave girls who attended, came with a hasty
step from the armory, announcing that Pluto
and another black awaited the Rover's leisure.
What other blackmy midnight beauty?
exclaimed the Rover, laughing, His fellow
Charon, is it?
His name Antonio, massawho sell us
fruit and fish from his pirogue.
Ha! cried the Rover, Ha! and
mused a moment, and stepped out into the
gorgeous vestibule, decked with its glittering
arms, leaving the door behind him open, so
that the girls could hear every word that
passed.
What! is it you, Antoniowhat brings
you here, and whence?
From Key West, massa, last, with plenty
fine fresh turtlethey in the pirogue, down
below, so heavy we can't warp him up!
Key Westwhat of our squadron then?
you must have met it?
Certain! replied the negro, I met 'em,
and told massa Cunninghame of Spanish fleet
in the offingseven merchant galliots and one
caravel! Then massa Cunninghame set sail
till he fell in with them, and hoisted English
color, and then ran!
Ran? cried the Rover, ran?
Yes, he ran, massa Ringwood, till they all
chased him, and got scattered, then he turned
round and fought; and when the caravel took
ground not fifty fathom from the inlet, he left
her hard and fast, and chased the galliots, and
took two; and then his squadron all came
back, and battered the war-ship and burned her
quite, and sacked the galliots, and then
scuttled
them, and then went off in chase again
after five others: long chase, but still I guess
he catch 'em!
Ha! well done, Cunninghame! brave
Cunninghame
!
brave Cunninghame! exclaimed
the Rover, take that for thy news, fellow,
giving him as he spoke two or three Spanish
dollars. I must away and call the men from
the felucca and the batteries; they list not
service
unless it be strictly needed. What wouldst
thou more, my good fellow?
So please you, send four hands in his
canoe, help poor Antonio up with big pirogue;
have plenty fat turtle and fresh fruit to-night.
Well, see to it, Pluto! and with the words
entirely deceived by the intelligence he had
received, and lulled into confidence that his
crews were victorious, the Rover hurried down,
and called off all his men save the two wonted
sentinels upon the bastions, and the two
watchmen
in his own felucca; revoked his orders to
the sloop which had already moved towards the
outlet; and ordering an extra supply of wines,
in compensation of their recent toils, to all the
buccaneers, gave himself up to dreams of
complete
triumph. An hour or two elapsed, and
Antonio's pirogue came up, manned in addition
to its usual crew by four of the Rover's
trustiest
men, who reported all still and peaceful in
the outlet, and was moored inside the large
felucca, close by the shingly beach below the
batteries. Her deck load of fruit and fish was
soon got ashore, her hatches battened down,
and herself, as it seemed, left vacant and
unguarded
,
while her black crew, consisting only
of two boys in addition to Antonio, went ashore
with the Rover's men to join in their
accustomed
revellings and riots.
Night fell; and though for a little while
licentious songs, loud shouts of mirthful
laughter
,
and many a sound of wild ungoverned
mirth rang through the guarded esplanade, long
before midnight not an eye was awake in the
ships, on the ramparts, in the dwellings, or in
the Rover's keep, so heavily were the
buccaneers
exhausted by the strange mixture of
fatigue
and feasting which had characterized the
last four dayssave those of the four sentinels,
two in the barque and one on either bastion,
and of the sad Teresa, who, waking from a
perturbed and dreamy sleep, had missed her
fair companionfor she, as on the former
night, had stolen from her couch unnoticed
and now stood gazing from her high lattice
over the lovely scene below, which lay all
glimmering out in the indistinct light of the
happy moon, half lustre and half shadow.
CHAPTER XI.
As she gazed down upon the moonlit esplanade,
Teresa saw a tall dark figure creep out with
cat-like stealthy tread from beneath the
verandah
of the large building nearest to the sea;
and, keeping itself with great care inside the
darkest shadows, drag itself inch by inch
towards
the stone bastion at the right hand
termination
of the battery; whereon she clearly
saw the pirate sentinel stalking his solitary
round upon the rampart, the long bright barrel
of his shouldered arquebuse glancing like
silver in the moonlight. At first she gazed
with simple wonder, wholly unmixed with
curiosity or interest, upon the movements of the
dark shadowy form; but suddenly, as he
crossed
a streak of moonshine, it struck her with
the speed of light that this was a well known
figure; and instantly a train of recollections,
all hitherto forgotten, flashed on herthe name
Antoniothe voice now well-remembered of
the unseen messengerit wasit must be!
the black fisherman, the trusted guide and
hunter
of her loved Amadis! She now strained
all her eyes, her heart, her spirit, to mark
what was his progress, not doubting for a
moment
that ere long she would be set free,
whether by death or rescue. While she had
been engaged, brief as they were, in these
imaginations
,
she had lost sight for a moment or
two of the dark gliding figure; and when she
turned her eyes again towards the spot, it was
no longer visible; and, what seemed stranger
yet, the pirate sentinel no longer paced the
bastion, although his comrade could be
distinctly
seen leaning against an angle near the
sallyport, by which Teresa had gained entrance,
at the further end of the lines. Suspecting,
more than ever, now that something great was
on the point of happening, she gazed yet more
intently; yet nothing might she see of him,
whom she believed, with all the confidence of
youth and inexperience, to be a friend and
rescuer within the pirate's hold. Tired at
length with watching the long line of vacant
ramparts, she looked again towards the
sleeping
soldier, and as she did so, from the dark
shadow of the ravelin and trench she saw a
coal-black figure leap, with the blithe and
muscular
action of a tiger bounding upon his prey,
on the unconscious piratesomething bright
flashed once or twice aloft in the clear
moonshine
,
and the struggle was ended in a
moment
,
the hapless sentinel falling a scarce less
conscious victim to his swift secret foe.
A moment more, and the victor had donned
the scarlet watch cloak of his fallen enemy,
and was now boldly traversing the whole line
of the esplanade, stopping and stooping down
for a moment or two at regular intervals, while
a faint clinking sound, heard indistinctly from
the distance, gave note, even to the
inexperienced
ear of Teresa, that he was engaged in
spiking all the cannon. After this task was
ended, disencumbering himself of the watch
cloak, he crept down to the water's edge, and
plunging into the calm basin swan straight for
his pirogue, swung himself by a rope to the
deck, and for several minutes' space was lost
to the anxious gaze of the Spanish maiden.
He re-appeared at last, however, from the
hold, accompanied by ten or twelve men,
whom by their corslets and steel caps, and the
long barrels of their Spanish muskets, she
knew at once to be Castilian soldierswithin
a moment they had lowered away the pinnace,
which hung at the pirogue's stern, and entering
it, pulled openly across the basin towards the
Rover's barque; the sentinels on which,
seeing
that their boat came directly as it appeared
to them from the water-gate of the fortress,
hailed not, nor uttered any challenge, but
suffered
the pinnace to come to under her very
stern, and her crew to scale her bulwark
unopposed
;
all of which Teresa might behold
distinctly by clear moonlight. What further
passed she knew not; but in a little while she
saw a bright light shown from the windows in
the stern, and at the same time the vessel began
to swing round slowly so as to bring her
broadside
,
which had so lately borne full on the
entrance of the basin, to cover the dwellings
of the buccaneers.
For a little while longer she watched
steadfastly
the basin and the vessels, but nothing
took place any more, although she stayed beside
the lattice till the moon set behind the
treetops
,
and deep darkness settled down over the
glimmering prospect. Then fancying that
nothing
would take place that night, and fearing
lest Bella might return and find her watching,
she turned away and walked towards her
couch. In doing so, however, she passed
another casement, which looked out towards
the forest in the rear; on which side, fearless
of any sudden onslaught, and confiding in the
remoteness of their station, surrounded as it
was by forests, everglades, impenetrable
hammocks
,
and morassespathless save to the
wandering Indianthe pirates kept no watch;
and, as she passed it, another sight flashed on
her eyes, even more wonderful as it appeared
to her, than aught she had yet witnesseda
long and regular line of dull red sparks, not
larger than the luminous firefly of that region,
and scarce so brilliant, were winding round the
outer side of the ditch, which circled all the
rear of the position. Suddenly, at one point
they clustered close together, and then
descended
,
as it seemed, into the deep wet fosse.
Then! then! her very soul on the alert, for
she had seen and heard enough of warfare to
know that those dull sparks were kindled
matches of a long line of musqueteers, she
threw the lattice open; and leaning out into
the dewy night air, listened intentlynor did
she listen long, before the grating of a saw
was clearly audible, although by no means
loud enough to wake a sleeper; or scarce,
perhaps
,
to rouse the dull perceptions of an
uninterested
watcherafter a time the sound was
heard no more, and very soon the little lights
might be seen, one by one, emerging from the
hither side, and forming in close order within
the esplanade, which they had actually entered
all unmolested and unseen, save by a friendly
eyeand now Teresa knew that friends were
close at hand, and rescue almost certain. Yet
now she trembled more than in her hour of
peril, and was so shaken in her every nerve,
that when she kneeled to pray and offer up her
tribute of thanksgiving, her tongue refused its
office, her senses failed her, and she sank
fainting
on the velvet carpet, so that she saw, rest
as she might, or any other, who had gazed
seaward from the height, almost at the same
point of time wherein the footmen passed the
palisades, the tall white sails of a huge
Spanish
caravella, steal ghost-like through the
shadows of the trees that fringed the outlet,
towed by a dozen boats pulled noiselessly with
muffled oars, into the middle of the basin.
Anotherand anotherand yet another
followed
;
and, strange to tell! though no slight
noise attended their proceedings, they, with the
captured barque of Ringwood, were moored
within half pistol shot of the batteries, the
guns of which were all, as has been seen,
spiked and so rendered useless, their cannon
bearing full on the defenceless dwellings of the
buccaneers, and their boats ready to land with
their armed crews at a moment's notice, ere any
ear had taken note of their arrival.
In another part of the Rover's keep, while
all this was in progress, even to the point of
time wherein Teresa fainted, there was a
widely
different picture, had any eye been there to
look upon it. It was the very topmost turret
of that tall buildinga small octagonal watch
tower, overlooking the whole esplanade below,
and having the breech of the huge gun, which
has before been mentioned, within six feet of
its doorway, which opened on the battlements.
Access was only gained to this high turret by
a steep winding stairway from the large armory
below; and on the platform, at the stair head,
so that no living thing could pass it without
awakening them, were stretched on a soft rug
full armed for instant battle, the two gigantic
negroes.
This was the Rover's den, his last
stronghold
,
his chosen privacy. Lighted by day
through eight tall pointed windows, now
muffled all by blinds of Indian matting; and in
the night by a large brazen lamp, with four
bright burners, it was as light as life, though
silent as the grave. It was the plainest, nay,
the only plain chamber of that superb and
gorgeous
building; its floor and walls being covered
equally with the soft seats woven by Indian
girls, from the sweet aromatic seeds and spicy
grasses of that regionits furniture, two or
three camp stools of dark English oak, a centre
table of the same fabric, covered with maps
and plans of battle or the like, a silver standish
and a tall golden crucifixand another large
broad slab of some Indian wood, littered with
charts and papers, instruments of astronomy
and navigation, pistols and dirks, and articles of
clothing (such as fringed gloves and feathered
hats), and one or two tall wine flasks, with a
Venetian drinking glass of scarce inferior height.
Upon the walls hung many suits of armor,
with fire-arms of rare and choice construction,
and swords of exquisite device and manufacture.
The only other article of furniture, and that
perhaps the most important in the chamber,
was a large low bedstead of oak, with a plain
cotton mattress, and white draperies of simple
linenand on that lowly bed reclined, in deep
though troubled slumber, the mighty frame of
the great English buccaneer, with his fair
favorite
by his side, sleeping as calmly as a
summer's
night upon a breezeless river. Her rich
redundant curls fell off in loose and wavy
masses from her fair brow, floating across the
massive chest and muscular shoulders of the
buccaneer, on which that brow was pillowed;
her eyes were closed, but the long fringe which
curtained them was pencilled in distinct relief
against her clear complexionthe whole
expression
of her face, as she slept, was
exquisitely
pure and child-like, and the soft smile
which nestled in the twin dimples of her rosy
mouth, seemed born of innocence and tranquil
bliss. So was it not with her companion.
Dark frowns and gloomy shadows chased one
another fast and thick over his broad expressive
featuresthe sweat stood in full bubbles on
his turbulent browa fierce sarcastic smile now
writhed his pallid lips, and now he laughed
almost aloud, but with a scornful and
self-mocking
laughter, such as the fiends might use,
jeering at stainless virtue. His great chest
heaved and fell, not with the regular pulsations
of healthful innocent sleep, but with convulsive
pants and throbbingshis arms were dashed
violently to and fro, with the hands clenched
like ironsuch were the night dreams of the
Rover, and fearful as they must needs have
been, to judge by their effect, as fearfully were
they dispelled. A clear sharp ringing sound
as of a musket shot close to the inmost keep,
rang through the night airone of the Indian
allies of Don Amadis having unconsciously
discharged
his arquebuse, and so called down
discovery
little,
however, if at all premature
on the attacking party.
Upon the instant, though the fair being by his
side yet slumbered all unconscious of alarm,
Reginald Ringwood sprang to his feet, fully
awake, and in the clearest mastery of his
senses
one
bound, he stood upon the platform of
the keep, and in less time than it would have
taken any other man to mark
one
portion of
the perils that environed him, he had envisaged
all;
and seen the only hope that was left to
him. The invaders as yet knew not, it would
seem, whether they were discovered, and rested
yet upon their arms; and Ringwood seeing
clearly that the exterior works were all
untenable
already, and knowing that his only
hope of making good the citadel itself, depended
on his getting men to man his guns from the
great barracks, resolved to turn this brief
inaction
to advantage. Before the very blacks had
roused them from their slumbers, he had sprung
to the breech of the huge cannon, had wheeled
it round upon its pivotHerculean task for any
single arm, how puissant it might be soever!
had pointed it upon the nearest longest caravel,
and, lighting a match instantly from the lamp in
his turret, had discharged it on the foe. A
broad bright glare shot out into the bosom of
the night, a cloud of snowy volume was driven
before it, and a roar, like that of twenty
thunder
claps, shook the strong tower to its base,
and deafened for an inftant every ear that heard
it. Before its echoes had subsided, before the
Spaniards, in turn surprised (for the huge
missile
striking the great caravel amid-ships, had
cut her mainmast by the board, carrying with it
the mizen), had poured in their answering
broadside, the Rover's bugle wound clear and
lustily, the signal of recall was heard by the
awakened pirates, who rushed half-dressed,
their weapons in their hands, from the rear of
the buildings, to obey his signal. The instant
he had fired the cannon, a dozen stalwart
blacks, Pluto and Charon at their head, the
garrison of this keep, stood on the platform at
his side, heavily armed and ready. Dressing
himself the while he spake, he thundered forth
his orders with strange rapidity and wonderful
precision
Pluto and Charon, away both of ye, down
to the southern sallyport, unbar it on the
instant
,
holding it well in hand the while, to
admit
our fellows from the barrack; but see ye
let not the Spaniards enter! You others, quick
there, quick! load the great culverin, and run it
out again; see that you keep the levelso,
well done, lads; now fire! and with the words
again forth burst the stunning roar. So,
cheerily, brave hearts; fight it thus till the
great caravel go down, then wheel it on the
next, and sink her likewise! I go to man the
inner ramparts. Ha! Bella, my sweet girl,
he cried, as she came forth in disarraydown
to your bower, my girl, and dight you! 'Fore
God, but I believe our time is come already!
And with the word he darted down the
stairway
,
and reached the sally-port just as the
buccaneers
,
half naked, scattered, and dismayed,
began to pour in from the esplanade. But few
and faint, they came all breathless, many
wounded, and some to drop down dead the
instant
they had forced their entry; for, in a
moment
after the Rover's unexpected shot, the
Spanish crews had started to their guns, and
five broadsides of very heavy metal were
poured into the clustered buildings of the
pirates, before they were yet well afoot, so that
the carnage was tremendous; then, when they
had rushed out, Don Amadis wheeled his two
hundred musketeers into a line upon their
flank, poured in a shattering volley upon their
scattered masses, and then charged, sword in
hand, with his Castilian troopers, and all his
Indian volunteers. Darkness alone saved
any
from destruction, and it was out of four
hundred
soldiers, for so many alone had remained
in the lines, scarcely a hundred sound men
entered
,
with perhaps fifty more, wounded and
wholly useless; not force, in short, enough to
man the guns, even at the rate of one man to
a cannon.
Still this mere handful was disposed, by the
wondrous genius of the Rover, with such rare
tact and skill, manning such guns alone as
were most useful, that until day-break he was
enabled not merely to repel the attacking
parties
,
but to beat them quite back from his lines
with fearful slaughter. Three times he rallied,
and each time brought back his every man
unharmed
;
leaving the ground which he had
traversed
piled high with carcases, and reeking
with hot gore. Meantime the black crew on
the keep plied the long culverin with unabated
zeal; its every bullet plunging into the castled
sides of the tall Spanish caravellasbut not for
that did they abate their murderous and well
sustained cannonading against the pirate
barracks
,
until not a stick or stone of them stood
upright to cover any foeman. Then, but not
until then, did they direct their fire on the keep;
and even then so distant was it from their guns,
and at an elevation so considerable, that their
fire did it but small damage, while, all the
time, they suffered heavily. Meantime, the
armed boats of the squadron landed; and their
crews formed instantly a junction with the
land forces, led by Amadis Ferrajo; which, by
the dint of energy and zeal almost unparalleled,
had forced their way through tangled brakes
and shaking quagmires, over broad lakes and
navigable rivers, to that impregnable
stronghold
,
as it was ever deemed by the too confident
and careless Rover.
Tremendous was the fate of every living
being who met the onslaught of the infuriate
Spaniards. No quarter was shownnone!
neither to age nor sexto innocence nor
beauty! Hundreds of miserable children were
tossed upon the spear-heads of the pitiless
avengers; hundreds of women shot, or cut
down, or spared only to glut for a brief space
the fierce lust of their captors. When the
day dawned, woman nor child survived; and
not a groan was heard from the red slopered
with their smoking gore!
Day dawned; and as the light grew clear,
4
the weakness of the defenders was discovered;
and the assailants, forming in six columns,
each column equal to the whole force under
Ringwood, rushed desperate to win the
ramparts
.
The guns were necessarily silent after
the first discharge, for it was needful now that
each man should fight hand to hand, or let the
lines be carried! And they were carried in ten
minutes! for though the buccaneers fought
like incarnate devils, though Ringwood bore a
charmed life, setting it fifty times upon a die
and still unwounded, man after man was piked
or cut down by his side, until the two blacks
alone, with four or five English pirates, were
left alive, and able to wield weapons.
In with you, Pluto and Charoninto the
keep and hold the gate in handnow! Anson,
Falconer, ha! Gambier, too, and Drake, one
charge more on these dogs of Spainone for
St. George and England! And with the
words, the five men dashed upon a column,
headed by Amadis Ferrajo, of full two
hundred
veterans, rushing in with their levelled
pikes, by the great gate which they had
stormed
three
men went down at three strokes of
the Rover; and his last troopers seconded him
like men, and gallant ones, if guilty!the
column
wavered; but Amadis rallied it instantly
with words of fire, and charged resistless! one by
one down went Ringwood's men, pierced each
with fifty wounds, each fighting till he fell for
England! merry England!
The Rover stood alonebut what recked he
of that? he crossed swords with Don Amadis,
beat down his guard, dealt him a blow that
would have stretched him lifeless on the plain,
but that his rapier shivered to the graspshot
two men with his pistols, seized a third round
his waist, who would have stopped him, and
hurled him to the earth, so that the blood
gushed
from ears, eyes, and mouth, and he stirred
hand no more; rushed through the castle gate,
and ere its bars were fast behind him, stood in
the presence of Teresa, all grim and gory, but
unwounded.
CHAPTER XII.
For
a moment or two the wretched girl
gazed in pale terror on the dread apparition
which stood before her; nor would it indeed
have been easy to imagine one more terrible.
His gorgeous dress was all begrimed with the
black smoke of gunpowder, and dashed with
frequent flakes of human gore; his face and
hands were crimson; and, more than all, in his
wild eye there was a gleam of terrible fire that
could be compared to nothing but the glare of
some dread fiend caught from the penal flames
of his eternal prison house.
She had risen from her knees on his entrance,
for during the whole din and clamor of the
desperate
assault, her silvery tones had mounted
to the throne of grace in pure and constant
supplication
;
she stood staring at his distorted,
furious
features, speechless with terror and
despair
;
but when he rushed towards her, and
seized her delicate arm in his strong grasp, she
sent forth a long, fluttering, thrilling shriek, so
awfully acute and shrill, that pealing far above
the blended roar of musketry and cannon, above
the shouts and yells of the assailants, above
the clang of axes plied fast and furiously
against the portal of the keep, it reached the
ears of the besiegers, and lent new vigor to
their arms, new fire to their hearts. Yet,
though the gate was crashing even now, and
wavering beneath their blows, yet had their aid
come all too latefor he had seized her round
the waist, despite her feeble struggles, despite
her pitiful supplications, lifted her from the
ground and flung her by main force upon a
velvet
ottoman, with all her raven hair dishevelled,
the braids which bound it having burst, and all
her garments ruffled and in the last disorder
from the hot struggle. He paused one second
in his barbarous pastime, and profiting by that
brief interval, all out of breath and panting as
she was:
Your word! she cried, your wordyour
plighted oath of honor! never to do me
wrong!
A bitter sneering laugh burst from his lips.
My word! he said, my worda pirate's
plighted word!a robber's oath of honor!
ha, ha! you jest, Teresa; ha, ha! you would
be merryhark, he continued, as the dread
sounds of the assault rang nearer and more
near. Hark! to the blows!the stepsthe
voices of your friends! There rings the full
shout of your cursed sirethe war cry of the
Des Aviles; there the fierce note of Amadis
Ferrajo! Close! close at hand, fair lady!
close enough, almost, to preserve you! Ten
minutes more, and they shall find you here,
but their arms shall not clasp you to their
heartsfather's nor lover's. No! no! I tell
you no! Nor their lips press your brow; for
you shall be a thing blighted, dishonored, foul!
Vengeance! ho, vengeance! vengeance on
Melendez
,
and with the words he again caught
her in his arms; and in a moment more his
horrid purpose had been too well accomplished;
but while she shrieked and struggled, as
impotently
,
it is true, as the small bird in the talons
of the merciless falcon, but still with all her
power, the fair haired English beauty rushed,
hardly less disarrayed than the Spanish maiden,
into the room; and close behind, both her
comrades
,
screaming for present aid to Ringwood,
and fearful was their need! For, seeing now
that every hope of protracting the defence was
over, and that the enraged Spaniards were
forcing
their passage foot by foot, the brutal
negroes
,
who had manned the great gun on the
platform of the keep, and fought it until now,
right dauntlessly, had left their post as
desperate
;
and drunk with bloodshed and despair,
maddened with liquor and with lust, had turned
their fierce and brutal passions from their
natural
enemies, against the favorite beauties of their
leader. But better had it been for them had
they awaited the avenging Spaniard; better
had they rushed into the den of the cub-drawn
tigress, than thus have roused the fury of their
chief.
Leaving Teresa pale and breathless, and
too terrified to thank God for her near escape,
he rushed upon the mutineersthe first he
caught about the middle, for he had no
offensive
armshis sword having been broken
in the conflict, and all his pistols emptied!
and hurled him headlong through the
window
,
like an enormous missile shot from
some giant catapult. The strong brocaded
awnings opposed his passage; but with such
mighty impulse was he sent, that the tough
velvet was rent through and through, as
though it had been gossamerand the huge
buccaneer was seen one instant sprawling
and writhing in mid air with a terrifie sound
of blended screams and curses on his tongue,
before he fell upon the lifted pikes of the
besiegers. Quelled for a moment by this
awful spectacle, the other negroes stood
aghast, and Ringwood, leaping upon them
with the bound of an angry tiger, snatched
his own weapon from the first, and whirling
it about his head, clove him with one blow
to the jaws.
Ha! dogs! he shouted, in tones
trumpet-like
and clear, ha! villains! dare ye
dispute
my
willor look too boldly on
my
prizes?down to your kennels, dogs! down
to the dungeon gate, and fight it to the last,
with these accursed Spaniards! Down to
the gate, I say, and if ye must, of your low
nature, perish brutes, see that, at least, ye
perish brave ones!
Not a word more was spoken, nor a blow
stricken, but all cowed and abashed, the
mutineers rushed down the sounding
stairway
,
and, ere a moment passed, might be
heard battling hand to hand with the fierce
veterans of Melendez, who had already forced
the gates, and were now rushing in, like a
flood tide, resistless. Just at this juncture,
by the other door, Pluto and Charon, the
trusty guardsmen of the Rover, entered the
harem, bleeding both from several recent
wounds, but still bold and undaunted.
Ha! all is lost, then, exclaimed the
Rover, as they entered. Is all lost, Charon?
All is lost, answered the faithful black,
all is lost! carried! postern gate carried too!
enemy in the hall, will be here presently!
And yewhat would ye? cried the
great English pirate, still calm in his
extremity
and fearlesswhat would yefly?
Will massa, answered the negroes in
one breath, fly with massa Ringwood by
covered way into the forestor if he will,
die
here, with him.
Ha! by the covered wayfine boysI
had forgotten! so may I live, if not for
victory
,
still at the least for vengeancereach
down three carbines from the wall, there
they are all loadednow light the matches
so give me that long Toledoha! here
they comethey come! but by he fiends, too
late! Charon, take thou Toraidaset her in
safety in the forest, and thou hast won thy
freedom. Pluto, bear thou Italian Beatrice!
Thou art for me, Teresamy girl, no
dallying
!
and he shook her fiercely by the arm,
as she would have struggled to escape; for
now the voices of her fatherof her dear
Amadis, came close upon her ear, above the
clash and clatter of the contest, as they bore
their last foes bleeding and breathless at the
sword's point before them, and now they had
won the staircase, and now were on the very
threshold of the gay armorytoo late! He
had swung her up in his stalwart arms, threw
her across one shoulder as though she had
been an infant. Follow me, Bella, he
cried, follow close, thine English blood is
brave, thou needest no supporter! follow me
close, and bar the door behind! and with
the words he sprang across the vestibule,
entered the secret stairway in the wall, and
was just out of sight, when beating down the
last of the defenders, Don Amadis darted
through the opposite doorway with twenty
veterans at his back. Well did the Rover
say that fair girl's blood was brave; for as he
left the armory, she snatched down from the
wall a studded buckler of the tough hide of
the rhinoceros, a light Damascus cimiter, and
with her beautiful blue eyes beaming with
fiery valor, made good the door in a moment,
and barred and chained it fast in the very teeth
of the foe.
With speedy steps they trod the damp floors
of the vaulted passagethey barred three
massive doors behind them, yet with so
desperate
speed did Amadis pursue, plying his
ponderous battle axe, that as they reached the
sally-port, they heard him thundering already
at the last portal they had passedthey
hurried
through the sally-port, a plank was thrust
across the fosse, they darted over it in safety!
they stood in the wild forest!another
minute and they had been concealed in the
dark mazes of a labyrinth so tortuous and
dense, that scarcely could the keen instinct
of an Indian have traced their flying
footsteps
!
But at the very moment when they
crossed the fosse, and climbed its landward
face, five or six Spanish musqueteers, who
stood on guard in the stone bastion,
discovered
them! blew their slow matches, levelled
their long bright barrelled arquebuses, and a
sharp volley followed! Three balls struck
Ringwood; his left arm fell to his side
shattered
by one bulletwell was it for Teresa
that he had just released her, or that same
ball had borne her fate upon its wings!a
second pierced his broad chest; a third just
grazed his muscular thighyet he flinched
not, nor uttered any sign of pain nor
wavered
in the least. By the same volley the
negro Charon fell, shot dead where he stood,
by one ball; while another, so closely was
that terrible discharge poured in, killed the
poor Persian in his armshappier so to fall,
than to survive awhile and glut the furious
vengeance of the enraged Castilians.
Ha, dogs!shouted the Rover
shaking
his long bright rapier at them, in defiance:
Ha! dogswould ye were at arm's length!
Now, Pluto, quick! quick! while their
muskets
are discharged, pull the plank over to
this side, and all will yet be well; quick!
quick, I say!they come!
And they did come; swinging his rapier
high in air, and leaping like a freed panther
from the dark sally-port, all youthful energy,
all high enthusiastic valor, young Amadis
Ferrajo; and close to his heels, with his long
grey locks all unhelmeted and floating on the
breeze, and his antique steel panoply all
blood from greaves to gorget, Juan Melendez
de Aviles; and after these, Pedro, Gutierrez,
Sanchez, and Diego, and fifty more hidalgos
of Castile, with their high hearts aflame for
deadly vengeance.
Forth leaped young Amadis, the foremost;
his foot was on the plank already; the cry
of triumph ringing already from his lips,
when almost simultaneously, the negro, who
when he stooped down to remove the plank
had not laid by his carbine, and the great
Rover fired. Well was it for Don Amadis,
his armor was Spain's choicest fabric; had
it been steel of any foreign city, he had been
sped that moment; for both balls took effect
at scarce ten paces distance; one striking full
upon the frontlet of his helmet, and leaving
a deep dent in the trusty steel; the other
actually penetrating the strong corslet, so
fairly was it aimed, and even inflicting a
slight wound; as it was, stunned and
bewildered
for the moment, he went down, and
all around surely believed him dead, though
in a little while he recovered himself and
regained his feet.
Teresa, who had been gazing on the little
group, with hope fresh kindling in her heart,
beheld him fall, and the light left her eyes,
and she sank faint and senseless on the dark
dewy earth. All this had passed in less
time than is needed to describe it. As
Amadis
went down, Melendez took his place, and
rushed across the narrow bridge, striking
Pluto, with a single sweep of his two-handed
broadsword, a breathless corpse into the
stagnant
moat; but while one foot was yet upon
the quivering plank, the Rover leaped upon
his foe. It was a desperate and a dreadful
conflict, for the wounds, one of which was
in truth slowly mortal, counterbalanced the
advantage which Ringwood's youth would
have otherwise given him over his aged yet
still firm antagonist. Melendez was armed
cap-a-pie
all to his helmet; the Englishman
was quite unarmed, with the exception of
his long two-edged broadsword, so that the
one had all his body to defend, the other his
head only. Yet was this point of vantage
neutralized by the extraordinary skill of
fence, the blithe agility, the mighty strength
of Ringwood, who like a wounded boar was
but the fiercier and more furious for his hurts.
Dreadful and desperate was that contest, yet
it was over almost in a minutetheir swords
flashed like the beams of the noon-day sun,
too dazzling and too fleet for any eye to trace
them; yet ere six blows and parries were
exchanged, the Rover's blade descended with
such violence upon the weapon of Melendez,
that it beat down his guard, and afterward
inflicted a deep wound on his browthe old
man staggered back, the Rover pressing on
with a fierce lunge, and sheathing his rapier
in the Spaniard's throat above the gorget vein.
Ha! ha! he laughed aloud with a
fiendish
tone, as he shook off his dying foeman
from the point of his ensanguined weapon
into the stagnant water of the ditch: Ha!
ha! ha! sister, sweet angel sister, thou art
avenged! avenged! avenged! and I die
happy
!
and with the words, unhurt by any
blow, unsmitten by any mortal hand in equal
combat, he staggered up the slope, fell by
Teresa's side, and was dead in a moment.
Whether or no it was the sound of
Ringwood's
heavy fall beside her, cannot be told,
but it is certain that as he dropped, she
started
to her feet, and, with recovered senses,
gazed wildly about her.
Her father's corpse she saw not, for falling
into the deep wet fosse it had sunk instantly
to the bottom, and was kept there by the
weight of armor which it bore! but she did
see her lover, whom she had fancied dead,
alive and on his feet, and rushing to her
rescue
!
she did see her deadly enemy prostrate
and lifeless at her side! and over him with
her broad blue eyes flashing fire, with lifted
buckler, brandished blade, was the beautiful
Bella, standing erect and fearless, so to
defend
from shame all that was left of her
undaunted lover.
Teresa screamed, she sprang to save her,
but she was all too late, for flushed with
victory, and mad with vengeful fury, the
Spaniards were upon her. One good blow
did the English girl strike at the nearest
enemy; one good home blow, and the
strongest
man who met it staggered, and fell
headlong
!
but ere he struck the earth, ten pike
heads tore the lovely bosom of that frail
faithful girl.
As she had spoken, so she died! She died
with him whom she would not survive! their
life-blood mingled, as she breathed out her
last sigh on his mangled breast; and one
tomb held their bodies; for at Teresa's
bidding
,
when the fierce rage of war was over,
a tomb
was
reared by that calm basin, over the lovely Bella, and the great English
Buccaneer
.
Long did Teresa mourn; long did she
weep her brother and her father; yet her
tears ceased at length to flow, as she blushed
her consent to her young rescuer's ardent
wooing; and, when they sailed together from
the wild shores of Florida, for their dear
Spanish home, the faithful slave Cassandra
followed her mistress's footsteps; and many a
time and often in after days and a far land,
they shed a pitying tear for the kind-hearted
English girl, and half admired the daring,
even while they blamed the sins of
Ringwood
the great Rover!
GUARICA, THE CHARIB BRIDE.
The
heavy dew of the tropics was yet lying
bright and unexhaled on every herb and flower;
myriads of which, in most profuse variety of
odor and bloom, strewed, like one gorgeous
carpet, the beautiful savannahs, and wild
forest glades of the fair province of Cahay.
The sun had not fairly risen, although the
warm and rosy light which harbingered his
coming, was tinging, with its fairy dyes, the
small and fleecy clouds that floated, like the
isle of some enchanted sea, over the azure
skies. The faint sea-breeze, which murmured
still among the fresh green leaves, though it
was fast subsiding, was laden with perfumes
of such strange richness, that while they
gratified
they almost cloyed the senses; birds of the
most superb and gorgeous plumage were
glancing, meteor-like, among the boughs; but
the innumerable insect tribes, which almost
rival them in beauty, had not as yet been
called forth to their life of a day, by the young
sunbeams. The loveliness of those
sequestered
haunts, which had but recently been
opened to the untiring and insatiate avarice of
the Europeans, exceeded the most wild
conceptions
,
the most voluptuous dreams, of the
romancer
or the poet. The solemn verdure of
the mighty woods, thick-set with trees, more
graceful than the shades of those gean
Isles, where the Ionian muse was born to
witch the world for agesthe light and
feathery
mimosas, the fan-like heads of the tall
palms, towering a hundred feet above their
humbler, yet still lofty brethrenthe giant
oaks, their whole trunks overgrown with
thousands of bright parasites, and their vast
branches canopied with vines and creepers
masses of tangled and impervious foliagethe
natural lawns, watered by rills of crystalthe
rocks, that reared themselves among the forests,
mantled not as the crags of the cold northern
climes, with dark and melancholy ivy, but
with festoons of fruits and flowers that might
have graced the gardens of the fabulous
Hesperides
.
It was upon such a scene, as is but
imperfectly and feebly shadowed forth in the
most glowing language, that the sweet dawn
was breaking, when, from a distance, through
the lovely woodlands, the mellow notes of a
horn, clearly and scientifically winded, came
floating on the gentle air; again it pealed forth
its wild cadences, nearer and louder than before
and then the deep and ringing bay of a
fullmouthed
hound succeeded. Scarcely had the
first echo of the woods replied to the unwonted
sounds, before a beautiful, slight hind, forcing
her way through a dense thicket of briers,
dashed with the speed of mortal terror into the
centre of a small savannah, through which
stole almost silently a broad bright rivulet of
very limpid water. Pausing for a second's
space upon the brink, the delicate creature
stood, with its swan-like neck curved
backward
,
its thin ear erect, its full black eye
dilated
,
and its expanded nostrils snuffing the
tainted
breeze. It was but for a second that she
stood; for the next moment a louder and more
boisterous crash arose from the direction
whence she had first appearedthe blended
tongues of several hounds running together on
a hot and recent trail. Tossing her head aloft,
she gathered her slight limbs under her, sprang
at one vigorous and elastic bound over the
rivulet, and was lost instantly to view among
the thickets of the further side. A few minutes
elapsed, during which the fierce baying of the
hounds came quicker, and more sharply on the
ear; and then, from the same brake out of
which the hind had started, rushed, with his
eyes glowing like coals of fire, his head high
in the air, and his long feathery tail lashing
his tawny sides, a formidable blood-hound, of
that savage breed which was, in after times,
so brutally employed against the hapless
Indians
by their Christian conquerors. Another,
and another, and a fourth succeeded, making
the vaulted woods to bellow with the deep
cadences
of their continuous cry. Hard on the
blood-hounds, crashing through the tangled
branches with reckless and impetuous ardor, a
solitary huntsman followed splendidly
mounted
on a fiery Andalusian charger, of a deep
chestnut color, with four white legs, and a
white blaze down his face, whose long thin
mane, and the large cord-like veins that might
be seen meandering over his muscular, sleek
limbs, attested, as surely as the longest
pedigree
,
the purity of his blood. The rider was a
young man of some four or five-and-twenty
years, well, and rather powerfully made than
otherwise, though not above the middle stature;
his long dark hair, black eye, and swarthy skin
told of a slight admixture of the Moorish
blood; while the expression of his features,
though now excited somewhat by the
exhilaration
of the chase, grave, dignified, and noble,
bespoke
him without a doubt a polished cavalier
of Spain. His dress, adapted to the occupation
which he so gallantly pursued, was a green
doublet belted close about his waist by a girdle
of Cordovan leather, from which swung,
clinking
at every stride of his horse, against the
stirrup, a long and basket-hilted bilboa blade,
in a steel scabbard, which was the only
weapon
that he wore, except a short two-edged
stiletto, thrust into the belt at the left side. A
broad sombrero hat, with a drooping feather,
breeches and gloves of chamois leather, laced
down the seams with silver, and russet buskins
drawn up to the knee, completed his attire.
He sat his horse gracefully and firmly; and the
ease with which he supported him, and
wheeled him to and fro among the fallen trees
and rocks, notwithstanding the fiery speed at
which he rode, bespoke him no less skilful
than intrepid as a horseman. The chase
continued
for above an hour, during which every
species of scenery that the level portions of the
isle contained was traversed by the hunter;
the open forest, the dense swampy brake, the
wide luxuriant savannahand each at such
hot speed, that though he turned aside neither
for bush nor bank, though he plunged
headlong
down the steepest crags, and dashed his
charger, without hesitation, over every fallen
tree that barred his progress, and every brook
or gully that opposed him, still it was with no
little difficulty that he contrived to keep the
hounds in hearing. And now the hapless
hind, worn out by the sustained exertions
which had at first outstripped the utmost pace
of her pursuers, but which availed her nothing
to escape from foes against whose most
sagacious
instinct and unerring scent she had but
fleetness to opposewas sinking fast, and
must, as the rider judged by the redoubled
speed and shriller baying of his hounds, soon
turn to bay, or be run down without resistance.
Her graceful head was bowed low towards the
earth; big tears streamed down her hairy
cheeks; her arid tongue lolled from her
frothing
jaws; her coat, of late so sleek and glossy,
was all embossed with sweat and foam, and
wounded at more points than one by the sharp
thorns and prickly underwood through which
she had toiled so fruitlessly. Still she strove
on, staggering and panting in a manner pitiful
to witness, when the deep bay of the
bloodhounds
was changed suddenly into a series of
sharp and savage yells, as they caught view of
their destined prey.
Just at this moment the hind had
reached
the verge of a piece of dense and tangled
woodland, through which she had toiled for
several miles, when the low range of hillocks
which it overspread sank suddenly by a steep
and craggy declivity of twelve or fourteen feet,
having at its base a rapid stream, brawling and
fretting over many a rocky ledge, down to a
wide and lovely meadow. Situated nearly in
the centre of this flower-sprinkled lawn, half
circled by a deep bight of the streamlet, and
perfectly embowered by the canopy which a
close group of waving palms spread over it,
there stood an Indian dwelling. It was of
larger size than were most of the native
cottages
,
thatched neatly with the broad leaves of
the palm, and ornamented in front by a portico
of wooden columns, quaintly, and not
ungracefully
adorned by carvings wrought by the
flint-edged
chisel of the yet unsophisticated savage.
A mat, woven with tasteful skill, from
many-colored
and sweet-scented rushes, was spread
upon the floor; while several stools of ebony,
inlaid with shells, and sculptured with
grotesque
devices, were ranged along the walls.
On a projecting slab, which apparently supplied
the want of a table, stood several gourds,
ingeniously
manufactured into cups and trenchers;
some bowls of hard wood, even more highly
finished than the other articles of furniture,
and many ornaments of gold and strings of
pearl scattered in rich profusion, lay among
the humbler vessels of the household. From
three columns were suspended large wicker
cages, beautifully interlaced with intricate and
quaint devices, containing paroquets and other
birds of rare and splendid plumage; while
from the others hung carved war-clubs of the
ponderous iron-wood, flint-headed javelins,
and several bowsnot the short, ill-strung,
worthless weapons used by the Africans, but
long, tough, and admirably made, and
scarcely
,
if at all, inferior to the tremendous long
bow which had gained so much renown, and
wrought so much scathe to their foes, in the
hands of the English archery. Under the
shadow of the portico, sheltered by it from the
warm beams of the sun, there sat an Indian
youth, tall and slightly framed, and not above
sixteen or seventeen years of age at the utmost,
polishing with a chisel the shaft of a long
javelin. On the lawn in front of the cottage a
bright fire was blazing, and several native
females were collected round it, preparing their
morning meal, with cakes of the cassava
baking
among the hot wood-embers, and fish
broiling on small spits of aromatic wood. But
at a little distance to the left of these, at the
extreme end of the building, nearest to the
steep bank which terminated the forest,
outstretched
in a light grass hammock, which was
suspended at the height of two or three feet
from the ground, between two stately
palm-trees
,
and swaying gently to and fro in the
light currents of the morning breeze, there lay
the loveliest girl eyes ever looked upon; her
rich black hair, braided above her brow, and
fastened with one string of pearls, was passed
behind her ears, whence it fell in a profusion
of glossy curls, so wondrously luxuriant that
had she stood erect, it would have flowed
quite downward to her ankles; her eyes large,
dark, and liquid as those of a Syrian antelope,
were curtained by the longest and most silky
lashes that ever fringed a human eyelid; her
features classically regular and even, were
redeemed
from the charge of insipidity by the sly
dimple at the angles of that exquisitely arched
and rosy mouth, which Aphrodite, fresh from
her ocean cradle, might have envied; and by
the voluptuous curve of the soft chin. Her
complexion was of a warm and sunny hue
half brown and half goldenthrough which
the eloquent blood mantled at every motion,
like the last flush of sunset upon the
darkening
sky. Beautiful, however, as was the
countenance, and enchanting the expression of
this Indian beauty, it yet was not until the
second or third glance that the eye could stray
from the matchless symmetry, the untaught
graces, and the voluptuous and wavy motions
of her form, to notice the less striking charms
of face and features. Her beautiful arms, bare
to the shoulder, were adorned with massy
rings of virgin gold, so flexible, from the purity
of the metal, that they were twisted and
untwisted
with as much ease as though they had
been silken cords; the right hung over the
edge of the hammock, its small and graceful
hand resting upon a little stand or table at her
sidewhile the left, folded beneath her head,
was half veiled beneath her abundant hair.
Her dress, a single robe of soft, fine muslin,
was clasped on the right shoulder by a golden
stud, whence it passed under her left arm,
leaving her bosom half exposed, and was girt
around her slender waist by a cord of
gaily-colored
cotton, covering the rest of her person
down to the tiny feetalthough its slight folds
clung so closely to the rich contour of her
limbs that not a single charm but wooed the
eye of the observer.
Such was the scene, and such the occupants
of it, into which, darting with a momentary
energy, that gained convulsive strength from
the near presence of her dreaded foes, the
hunted hind leaped suddenly. The craggy
bank and stream were cleared by one
tremendous
bound, the level lawn was traversed with
speed that seemed almost miraculous, yet scarce
two spears' length from her haunches the
furious blood-hounds followed. Whether it
was that her eyes were cast backward towards
her dreaded foes, and that every sense was
engrossed
by agonizing terror, so that she
marked
not anything before her, or whether a
strange instinct told her that no danger was to
be apprehended from that quarter, the shy,
timid creature dashed straight across the
meadow
,
passing within ten paces of the fire
from the vicinity of which the women fled,
fearful of the savage houndsand sank down
with a deep, heart-broken sob, close to the
hammock of the Indian beauty.
Roused suddenly from the half-dozing
dreamy languor in which she had been so
luxuriously indulging, the maiden started from
the couch, and, without thinking of the peril,
by an involuntary impulse stooped down, and
lifting up the head of the dying hind, wiped
away the foam from its sobbing lips, and
gazed with wistful pity upon its glazing eyes.
All this had passed with almost the speed of
lightfor not ten seconds had intervened
between
the first appearance of the trembling
fugitive
and the compassionate movement of the
young girl. It happened, too, as will
oftentimes
occur, when hounds are running at the
utmost of their speed, the blood-hounds, since
they had viewed for the first time their quarry,
had given no tongue, chasing solely by the
eyeso that until his attention was called to
what was passing, by the flight of the terrified
and trembling menials, the youth had remained
quietly engaged at his occupation, unconscious
of the peril to which his sisterfor such was
the relationship between themwas exposed.
Diverted, however, from his occupation, by
the tumultuous flight of the girls, he looked up
quickly, and at a glance beheld the hind fall
dying at his sister's feet, the fierce hounds
dashing forward to glut their savage instinct in
the life-blood of the quarry; and the girl, by
her own act, thrown, as it were, into the very
jaws of the literally blood-thirsty brutes
which, with hair erect and bristling, as if
instinct
with sentient life and fury, the white
foam flying from their tushes, and their eyes
glaring with the frantic light of their roused
natures, were bounding towards her, scarce
three paces distant.
At the same point of time the Spanish
cavalier
,
who had, while they were running mute
lost the direction of the chase, made his
appearance
at the top of the abrupt descent; and
seeing, as if by intuition, all that was going on,
lifted his blooded horse hard with the Moorish
bit, on which he rode him, and pricking him
at the same time sharply with the spur,
undismayed
by the sheer fall of the ground,
compelled
him to take the fearful leap. The
horse sprang nobly at it, and, aided by the
great fall of the surface, landed his hind feet
well upon the level ground beyond the rivulet;
but even then he would have fallen, such was
the shock of so steep a drop leap, had he not
been met by the quick support of a master
hand; so that, recovering himself with a heavy
flounder, he dashed on after scarce a moment's
pause. Still, had there been no readier aid
than his, the maiden must have perished
beneath
the fangs of the infuriate bloodhounds;
for though the hunter shouted in the loudest
tones of his clear, powerful voice, rating the
dogs, and calling them by name, their
fierceness
was so thoroughly aroused that they paid
not the least regard to his commanding accents,
and probably would not have been restrained
had he been interposed himself between them
and the object of their stanch pursuit, from
springing on the master who had fed them,
and to whose slightest gesture, under more
favorable
circumstances, they were implicitly
obedient. But as he saw them already well
nigh darting at her throat, that stripling leaped
upon his feet, and snatching from the nearest
pillar a bow which fortunately happened to be
strung, and two long arrows, in less time than
is needed to describe it, notched a shaft on the
sinew, drew the tough bow-string to his ear,
and drove the whirling missile with almost the
speed of light towards the leading dog.
It was not till the whistling shaft hurtled
close past her ear, that the maid was aware of
her own danger; for, engrossed by the faint
struggles and waning breath of the poor deer,
she had not raised her eyes, till startled by the
passing weapon; and now, as she lifted them,
and met the red glare shot from the angry orbs
of the foremost hound, and almost felt the
warmth of his quick panting breath against
her brow, hope left her; and her senses
yielding
to the sudden terror, she sank down upon
the body of the dead hind, as helpless and as
innocent. But even as light left her eyes, the
well-aimed shaft reached its mark; directed at
the throat of the animal, it flew correctly, and
the keen flint-head, cutting a little way below
the ear, clove through and through the neck,
piercing the jugular vein. The blood gushed
in a torrent from the wound; nor from that
only, but from the throat and nostrils,
likewise
;
and with one savage yell he leaped
into the air, and fell quite dead within a yard
of the Indian girl, whose snow-white dress
was actually sprinkled with large gouts of the
crimson gore. Still she was far from safe;
for, unchecked and undaunted by their leader's
death, the others of the little pack, baying
tremendously, were close at hand.
Again the bow was raised, and the string
drawn to the utmost, but with a jerking and
irregular tension, which snapped the tendon of
which it was framed. With a sharp twang
the bow recoiled, and the shaft fell harmless,
close at the archer's feet; but, unarmed as he
was, he bounded forward, and grasping the
staff of the unstrung and useless bow, he
gallantly
bestrode the body of the damsel, and
with a calm and resolute expression in his
clear eye and comely features, awaited
fearlessly
the onset of the approaching savages.
And now the first was close upon him, and
with his bristles all erect, like quills upon the
porcupine, and a deep stifled growl, dashed at
his face. Still he blenched not, but made a
desperate lunge with the tough horn-tipped
bow, full at the open mouth and yawning
throat of his assailant. And well for him it
was that his eye was true, and his hand
steady, for nothing else could have availed,
even though now the cavalier was within three
strides of the spot, to save his life. The
thrust took effect, and though the weapon was
but ineffective, and the beast not materially
affected by the blow, it still had force enough
to check, in some degree, the violence of his
assault, and to hinder him from using his fangs
for a moment. Yet, notwithstanding, such was
the weight of his sinewy lithe body, and such
the terrible impetuosity of his attack, that
checked and foiled as he was, he still plunged
so violently against the breast of his young
antagonist, that he dashed him to the ground;
and, himself falling, they rolled over and over,
with a stem grapple and fierce cries, on the
ensanguined green sward. But at this critical
moment a new and more important aider came
up in the young Spaniard; who, dashing his
spurs into the flanks of his Andalusian, with
his long two-edged sword unsheathed, and
brandished in the air, as he stood upright in
his stirrups, purposely galloped over one of the
hounds, sending it cowed and howling to a
respectful distance, then pulling up his horse
close to the confused group, well knowing the
tremendous fury of the animal with which he
had to deal, when it was thoroughly aroused,
he smote the other which was struggling with
the boy, and which had just got free from his
gripe, exactly at the junction of the neck and
skull. So true and steady was the blow, and
so keen was the temper of that thin two-edged
blade, that it shore right through muscle, bone,
and sinew, severing entirely the head, except
where a small portion of the skin remained
uninjured, at the further side. This done he
hastily dismounted, and striking the fourth and
last dog a heavy blow with the flat of his
sword, rating him at the same moment by his
name, succeeded in asserting his ascendency
over his crest-fallen vassal. The boy had, in
the meantime, risen from the ground, still
grasping in his hand the bow, which, during all
the progress of that tremendous struggle, he
had never let goand gazed, half doubtful of
the stranger's purpose, into his eyestill
reassured
by the grave smile which played upon
the features of the Spaniard, and by perceiving
how effectual had been his aid, when earthly
aid seemed hopeless, he suffered the tense
muscles of his dark visage to relax, and
stretching
out his hand to his preserver, uttered a few
words in the Spanish language, not strictly true
in the pronunciation, but in a voice of most
melodious richness, thanking him for his timely
aid.
But little heed did the young gallant pay to
his addresses, for he had thrown aside his
blood-stained weapon, and raising the slight
body of the maiden from the earth, for she had
not as yet recovered from her fainting fit, bore
her as easily as though she had been but a
feather's
weight, with her head leaning upon his
shoulder, and her long tresses flowing in dark
luxuriance over his arms, into the sheltered
portico. Placing her on one of the low cotton
cushioned stools, and supporting her against his
breast, he called aloud in the Indian tongue,
which he spoke fluently and well, for water;
and having sprinkled her lovely face, he set
about restoring her with a degree of eagerness
that savored not a little of the gallantry of
knightly courtship. Nor was it long before
his efforts were crowned with complete
success
;
for in a moment or two the fringed lashes
partially arose, revealing the dark eyes, still
swimming in unconscious languor. Dazzled
by the full light, she once again suffered the
lids to fall, and remained for a few moments
perfectly passive in his arms; although he felt,
by the increased pulsation of her heart, which
throbbed almost against his own, that life and
sense were speedily returning. Again she
raised her eyes, and gazed for an instant with
an air of simple wonderment in his face; then,
while the warm blood rushed back in a crimson
flush to the pale features, she attemped to start
from the half embrace in which he held her.
Fear nothing, gentle one, he said, in her
own liquid tongue, with a calm placid smile,
which did more to reassure her than the words
which fell half unheard on her ear, yet
confused
and giddy.
Fear nothing, gentle one, from me. Not
for the wealth of the whole Indiesnot to be
monarch of Castile, would I work aught of
harm to thee or thine!
While he was speaking, her eye wandered
from his face, and falling on the blood-stained
group, which lay confusedly piled on each
otherthe lifeless limbs of the dead hind and
fierce hounds, one transfixed by the unerring
arrow of the brother, the other slain by the
sharp rapier, which yet lay beside them on the
turfthe panting charger, which stood,
although
unfastened, in the cool shade of the
palm trees; and the two dogs which had
survived
their fellows crouched humbly on the
grass before the portico, their tongues lolling
from their jaws, their sides panting from their
late exertion, and their eyes closed listlessly,
she saw the truth intuitively, and, with a quiet
smile, sank back again upon his breast, unable
yet to rise, and lay there until her brother had
brought forth the females of the household to
attend her.
Leaning on these, the fair girl left them, with
a gesture of farewell as dignified, yet easy,
as though she had been the lineal scion of a
hundred European monarchs. She was not
absent long, however, for she had returned ere
the Spaniard learned from his host, while he
was busily employed in wiping and returning
to its scabbard his trusty rapier, in picketing
his charger, and securing his two houndsthat
the girl whom he had so bravely rescued from
a terrible and painful death, was in good truth
of royal birtha Caribbean princessthe niece
of that peerless queen Anacaona, who, though
the sister of that most dauntless foeman of the
white invaders, the valiant Caonabo, lord of the
Golden House, had proved herself from first
to last the friend and patroness of the pale
stranger; who, in after days, returned her
kindness with ingratitude so base and
barbarous
.
In a short time, then, the Guarica returned,
and thanking her preserver with the most
feminine
and easy grace, pressed him to stay and
share their morning meal; and he, half
captivated
at the first by her artless beauty, assented
willinglyand lingered there, enchanting the
simple mind of the Indian beauty by all the
rich stores of his cultivated intellect; and
listening
,
in turn, to the sweet native ballads
which she sang to him, in her rich melodious
tongue, not till the morning meal alone was
ended, but through the heat of the high noon,
and even till the dewy twilight; and when he
said adieu, a tear swam in the dark eye of the
maiden, and her small band trembled in his
grasp; and he rode pensively away beneath the
broad light of a moon, a thousand times more
pure and brilliant than that which silvers the
skies of his own bright land, bearing along
with him, far in his heart of hearts, deep
thoughts and high warm feelings, blended with
doubts and cares, and the engrossing impulses
of interest conflicting with the wilder passions
of a hot and impetuous nature. Nor did he
leave behind him, in the breast of the young
Guarica, sentiments less novel, or feelings less
tumultuous. Truly, to them, that day was the
hinge whereon the doors revolved of future
happiness or misery! For, from that day, each
dated a new life, fraught with new wishes, and
regulated by new destiniesand to each was
it the harbinger of many strange adventures, of
many joys and many sorrows! and, whether
for evil or for good, of their doom here, and
it may be, hereafter.
CHAPTER II.
Days
, months, and seasons held their course,
yet there was no change in the deep azure of
the glowing skiesno alteration in the green
luxuriance of the forestno falling of the
woods into the sear, the yellow leafno
fast succeeding variation from the young
floweriness of spring-tide to the deep flush of
gorgeous summer, and thence to the mature
but melancholy autumnto the grim tyrant,
winter. In that delicious island nature had
lavished
on the earth, in her most generous
mood, the mingled attributes of every clime
and region. The tender greenery of the young
budding leaf was blent at one and the same
moment, and that moment, as it seemed,
eternal
,
with the broad verdant foliage; the smiling
bud, the odoriferous and full-blown flower, the
rich fruit might be seen side by side on the
same treeon the same bough. Nothing was
there to mark the flight of timethe gradual
advance of the destroyer over the lovely land;
nothing to warn the charmed spectator, that
for him, too, as for the glowing landscape,
maturity but leads to decaydecay which ends
in death! Verily but it is a paradise for the
unthinking!
And who were more unthinking than the
young Spaniard and his Indian love? Who
were more happy? Morn after morn beheld
Hernando de Leon threading the pathless forest
now with horse, horn, and hound, sweeping
the tangled thicketsnow skirring in pursuit
of his falcon over the watery vegas; and now,
with keen observant eye, and cat-like pace,
wandering, arbalast in hand, in silent search
after the timid deer; but still in one direction,
and still with one intent to join the fair
Guarica
!
Day after day they loitered, side by side,
among the cool shades of the mighty woods,
while the fierce sun was scourging the clear
champaign with intolerable heator sat
reclined
by the cold head of some streamlet,
fuller
to them of inspiration and of love than were
those fabled founts of Gadura, whence Eros
rose of yore, twinborn with the dark Anteros,
to greet the rapt eyes of Iamblichus.
The powerful mind of the young soldier had
been cultured, from his earliest youth, to skill
in all those liberal arts and high
accomplishments
by which the gallant cavaliers of Spain
had gained such honorable eminence above
the ruder aristocracy of every other land. To
his hands no less familiar were the harp and
gittern than the Toledo or the lance. To his
well-tutored voice, the high heroic ballads of
his native land, the plaintive elegies of
Moorish
Spain, the wildly musical areytos of the
Indian tongue, were equally adapted. Nor
did its accents sound less joyously in the clear
hunting halloa, or less fearfully in the shrill
war shout, that it was oft attuned to the
peaceful
cadence of a lady's lute. His foot, firm in
the stirrup, whether in the warlike tilt, in the
swift race, or in the perilous leap, was no less
graceful in the rapid dance, or agile in the
wrestler's struggle on the greensward. He
was, in short, a gentleman of singular
accomplishment
of
a mind well and deeply trained;
shrewd, polished, courteous, yet keen and
energetical
withal, and brave as his own trusty
weapon. Like every dweller of a mountain
land, he possessed that high and romantic
adoration
of the charms of nature, that exquisite
appreciation of the picturesque and beautiful
whether embodied in the mute creations of
wood, wild, and water, or in the animated
dwellers of earth's surfacewhich, in the
breasts of others, is rather an acquired taste,
nurtured by delicate and liberal education, than
an intuitive and innate sense. Handsome,
moreover, eloquent, and young, it would have
been no great marvel had the brightest lady of
the proudest European court selected Don
Hernando
as the ennobled object of a fresh heart's
holiest aspirations. What wonder, then, that
the untutored Indian girl, princess although she
was, revered almost to adoration by her own
simple people, secluded, from her earliest
childhood
,
from aught of mean or low association,
removed from any contact with the debasing
influences of the corrupt and contaminating
world, secured from any need of grovelling and
sordid laborvoluptuous and luxurious as the
soft climate of her native isle, yet pure as the
bright skies that overhang itromantic and
poetical
,
as it would seem by necessity, arising
from her lonely musingwhat wonder that
Guarica should have surrendered, almost on
the instant, to one who seemed to her artless
fancy, not merely one of a superior mortal
race, but as a god in wisdom, worth, and beauty
a heart which had been sought in vain by
the most valiant and most proud of her
nation's
young nobility. His grace, his delicate
and courteous bearing, so different from the
coarse wooing of the Charib lovers, who
seemed
to fancy that they were conferring, rather
than imploring an honor, when they sought
her hand; his eloquent and glowing
conversation
these
would alone have been sufficient to
secure the wondering admiration of the forest
maiden; but when to these was added the
deep claim which he now possessed on her
gratitude, for the swift aid which he had borne
to her when in extremity of peril, and the
respectful
earnestness of pure, self-denying love
which he displayed towards her, it wonld in
truth have been well nigh miraculous had she
resisted the impression of her youthful fancy.
Nor were such unions between the dusky
maidens of the west, and the hidalgos of Spain,
by any means unfrequent or surprising,
among the earliest of those bold adventurers
who had been sharers, in his first and second
voyages, of the great toils and mighty perils
which had been undergone by that wise
navigator
who, in the quaint parlance of the day,
gave a new world to Leon and Castile. On
the contrary, it was rather the policy of that
great and good discoverer, who, in almost all his
dealings with the rude natives, showed higher
sentiments of justice and of honor than could
have been expected from the fierce and
turbulent
age in which he lived, to encourage such
permanent and indissoluble alliances between
the best and bravest of his own followers, and
the daughters of the Caciques and nobles of the
land, as would assuredly tend, more than any
other means, to bind in real amity the jarring
races brought into close and intimate contact
by his discoveries and conquests.
There was not anything, therefore, to deter
Guarica from lavishing her heart's gem on the
handsome cavalier who had so singularly
introduced
himself to her favor, and who so
eagerlynay, devotedlyfollowed up that
chance-formed acquaintance. For several
months, despite the ancient adage, the course
of true love did, in their case, run smooth. No
day, however stormyfor heavy falls of rain,
accompanied by sudden gusts of wind, with
thunder claps, and the broad fearful lightning
of the tropics, were by no means unfrequent
prevented the adventurous lover from threading
the tangled brake, scaling the steep, precipitous
ascent, fording the swollen riverstraight as
the bird flies to his distant nest. No turn of duty
hindered himthe imposed task performed
from hurrying through the hot glare of noon, or
through the moonless night, to visit his
beloved
.
At first, his well-known ardor in the
chase accounted to his comrades for his
protracted
and continual absences from their
assemblies
,
whether convened for woodland
sports or wild adventure; but when it was
observed
that, though he never went abroad, save
with the hawk and hound, or arbalast and the
bird bolts, he brooked no longer any
comrade
in his sportive labors; that, though
renowned
above his compeers for skill and
courage
in the mimicry of war, he often now
returned
jaded indeed, and overspent with toil,
but either altogether empty-handed, or at least so
ill-provided with the objects of his unwearying
pursuits, that it was utterly impossible to
suppose
that a hunter so renowned could have
indeed
spent so much toil and time, all to so
little
a purpose. This, for a short space, was
the point of many a light jestmany a merry
surmise gradually grew to be the subject of
grave wonder and deliberation; for it was now
remarked by all, even by his superiors, that
Hernandothough he had been of yore the
keenest volunteer to offer, nay, to urge his
services
,
when any foray was proposed against
the daring tribe of Caonabo, the bold Cacique
of the Charibs, who now alone, of the five
hereditary monarchs that erst held sway in
Hispaniola, dared to wage war against the
white invaders of his native fastnessesno
longer sought to be employed on such
occasions
nay,
that he even had refused, as it
appeared
,
to those who had solicited aid, on slight
and feigned excuses, to join their perilous
excursions
.
Whispers increased among his
comrades
,
and ere long grew to be dark murmurs
rumor said that no hunter ever saw the
form of Don Hernando backing his fiery
Andalusian
,
or heard the furious bay of his
stanch bloodhounds in any of those haunts
where strayed most frequently, and in the
greatest plenty, the quarry which he feigned to
chase; fame said, and for once truly, that
though the best scouts of the Spaniards had
been urged by curiosity to play the spy upon
his movements, their utmost skill had availed
nothing; that whether in broad day or in the
noon of night, they never could keep him in
view beyond the margin of one belt of forest
land, or track the foot-prints of his charger,
although
the soil was deep and loamy, into its
dark recesses; that, in whatever course he
turned his horse's head, or bent his footsteps,
on departing from the fortress of his friends,
he ever reached by devious turns, and secret
bypaths, that same almost impenetrable thicket,
and there vanished. It was an age of
credulous
fearof dark, fanatical superstitions. He
who, a few short months before, had been the
idol of his countrymen, the soul of their
convivial
meetings, the foremost and the blithest
in their bold hunting matches, was now the
object of distrust, of doubt, of actual fear, and
almost actual hatred. Some said that he had
cast by his allegiance to his country and his
kingthat he had wedded with an Indian girl,
and joined himself to her people, heart and
handthat he kept up this hollow show of
amity with his betrayed forsaken countrymen
only that he might gain some sure and fatal
opportunity of yielding them, at once, to the
implacable resentment of the Charib Caonabo.
Others, more credulous still, averred, in secret,
that he had leagued himself, more desperately
yet, and yet more guiltily, with creatures of
another world! that mystic sounds, and voices
not of human beings, had been heard by the
neighbors of his barrack-chamber! and one,
he who had scouted him furthest and most
closely, swore that, on more than one occasion,
he had beheld a grim and dusky form rise
suddenly
,
as if from out the earth, and join him in
the wildest of those woodlands through which
he loved to wander.
Thus did the time pass onwardHernando
and Guarica becoming every day more fond and
more confiding, and, if that could be, more
inseparable
;
and, at the same time, suspicion,
enmity, distrust, becoming more and more
apparent
at every hour between him and his
Spanish kinsmen.
Thus did the time pass onward, without the
occurrence of anything of moment either to
disturb the blissful dreams of the young lovers,
or to awaken a suspicion in their breasts, that
they were themselves the objects of distrust or
of espial.
Yet every day closer and closer were the
toils contracting round them; strong enmities
were at work, weaponed by puissant energies
and quick intelligences; and, though they knew
it not, they were even now on the brink of an
abyss.
Thus did the time pass onward; till, on a
close and sultry afternoon, in the latter part of
autumn, when the thunder clouds were
mustering
thick over the azure vault, and now and
then a pale flash on the far horizon, succeeded
by a distant rumble, told of the coming
hurricane
,
three or four horsemen, whose dress
and accoutrements proclaimed them at once to
be Spaniards from the fortress, were seen to
issue from the forest, and ride rapidly across
the little plain towards Guarica's dwelling.
At first a blithe smile lighted up the features
of the young princess, as the sound of the
hoofs came to her ears, while, occupied in
light feminine labor, she was standing in the
inner chamber of her cottagefor, horses being
as yet the exclusive property of the invaders,
and no other Spaniard than her own Hernando
having as yet visited that sequestered spot, she
doubted not that it was her lover, who, in the
eagerness of his unwaning passion, had thus
anticipated the hour of his coming.
Full of this sweet idea, her lovely features
gaining a deeper and more feeling charm, from
the inspiration which seemed to infuse them at
the mere thought of him she loved so passing
well, she bounded forth to meet him. But,
before
even her foot had crossed the threshold,
she repented her precipitation: although it was
already too late to remedy it.
Her ear, quicker by nature than that of any
European, and sharpened now beyond its wonted
keenness by the strange powers of overruling
passion, had detected, even as she sprang forth
to meet the comers, first, that instead of one there
were several horses, and next, that her lover's
Andalusian was not of the number. Strange it
may seem that that lovely girl, who, perhaps,
never in her life had seen ten horses, nor
listened
to the tread of any save Hernando's charger,
could have sworn to
his
springy tramp out of
ten thousandstrange it may seem, and
incredible
to us, whose instincts are quenched by
dwelling amid the monotonous occurrences of a
life spent in the midst of busy crowds, whose
ears are deadened and eyes dimmed unto the
sounds and sights of nature; but it is trueshe
knew it in an instant, and half paused upon
the door-sill, wondering what chance could
have brought strangers thither; and
apprehending
,
she knew not what, of coming evil.
And all of us knowat least all of us who
have known sorrow, or anxiety, or even
strong and overmastering passionhow
rapidly
thought flits at times through the spirit
how that, which to the body is but a point of
time, but a fleet second, may to the mind be an
age of ages.
In the mere instant that Guarica, bounding
forth towards the portico, paused half alarmed
upon the threshold, a hundred flitting fancies
passed through her brainfancies of joy, and
hope, and agony, almost despairbut with the
instant which had given them birth they ended.
Knowing instinctively that she must have been
seen already, and having, though more than
a little frightened, no motive for concealment,
she stepped forth quietly; and found herself in
the presence of two persons, whom her quick
intelligence discovered instantly to be cavaliers
of rank and birth; and as many more whom
she recognised as servants, with hounds in
leashes, and hawks on their fists, who had
just pulled up their horses at the door.
He, who appeared the principal personage of
the two, was a tall, powerful, gaunt man, not
in reality above a year or two De Leon's
senior, but in exterior show far more advanced
in life. This might have been the
consequence
of the hardships he had undergone, or
it might have arisen from the predominance of
those fierce and fiery passions which wear
away the body, even as a keen blade frets and
in time destroys its scabbardbut, whether
from one cause or the other, his brow, instead
of presenting the fair bread expanse which
was so striking in Hernando's noble
countenance
,
was furrowed by three wrinkles, as deep
as are usually seen in men of sixty years; and
these were again cut at right angles by the
strong indentation of an habitual frown. The
features were all in themselves well formed
and handsome, although the aquiline nose was
so thin as to seem almost fleshless, the cheeks
hollow, and the eyes sunken. The general
expression, too, was grave and dignified, and
far from unpleasing; although the heaviness
of the brow cast over it a sort of melancholy
gloom; and at times a dark sneering smile
distorted
the thin lips, altering for the worse the
entire character of the face, and giving it, so
long as it lasted, a singular and intense air of
malignity and contempt.
The figure of this gentleman was, it is true,
gaunt and thin, almost to meagreness; but not
so much as to impair, in any degree, his
muscular
and sinewy strength, which appeared to
be prodigious. His demeanor, though
somewhat
formal and stately, was full of the grace
of dignity, if not of ease; and his whole
aspect
,
set off by his dark, rich hunting-dress and
his magnificent bay charger, was striking and
impressive.
His companion was an older man, yet
bearing
in his round and jovial face, although his hair
and beard were grizzled, far fewer marks of
age than his fellow-hunter. This was a broad
and square-set person, with a quick merry eye,
a bronzed face, and a constant smile about his
full, arched lips; his countenance, too, was as
strongly marked with bold and daring
frankness
,
as was the other's with dark and
suspicious
gloom; and his bearing as abrupt and
impulsive, as his friend's was self-restrained
and formal.
Any one at all used to judge of men's
professions
by their aspect or their manners,
might have pronounced this gentleman a sailor,
without fear of contradictionnor did his seat
or hand upon his horse, which were both
artless
and ungainly, contradict the surmise. He,
too, was richly dressed, though far more
gaudily
than his companion, and he bestrode a
strong and active horse, quite equal to his
weight, though lacking the high, blood-like
type, and spirited action, of the bay charger by
his side.
It was the former of the two cavaliers who,
with an air half-insolent, half-condescending,
addressed Guarica, as she came forth upon the
portico, in a few words, imperfectly pronounc
ed and ungrammatically put together, of the
Indian dialect of that province; requesting
permission
to take shelter, until the storm, which
was threatening so nearly, should pass over,
and alleging, as a further cause for their
intrusion
,
that they had seen the building from the
edge of the forest, wherein they had been
hunting all the morning, just as they were
deliberating
whither they should fly for refuge
from the tornado.
Guarica replied instantly, in pure Castilian,
to which the most critical ear could have taken
but slight objection; begging them to alight
from their horses, and accept such
accommodation
as her poor dwelling could afford them.
Stables, she added, we, of course, have
none to offer you; but there is a hut yonder,
which we use as a store-house, empty now,
wherein your serving-men can tie their horses.
I beseech you enter.
Neither of the cavaliers, both of whom
dismounted
instantly, showed the least surprise,
or made any comment on her speaking the
Spanish tongue so fluently; although the
younger cast a quick, keen glance,
accompanied
by the peculiar smile which has been
mentioned, to his comrade, as they followed
her, after giving directions to their servants,
into the building. For she paused not to show
them the way humbly, but led them, with the
air and gesture of a princess, into her
dwelling
.
Again a look of intelligence was
interchanged
between the Spaniards; and the sailor
licked
his lips with the affectation of a liquorish
air, as she swept forward; but there was
nothing
in the look that betokened astonishment,
though there was much that spoke of
admiration
,
and perhaps something of self-gratulation
at their own shrewdness.
Could they have read, however, all that was
passing in Guarica's mind, they would
perhaps
have found less reason for the latter
sentiment
than they imaginned; so accurately had
the wild Indian girl already judged the cause
and the motives which had brought them to
her lonely dwelling.
Her quick eye, running over the whole
group, even in the short time while the cavalier
was speaking to her, had taken in, without
seeming to note anything at all, the closest and
most minute details. Thus, among other things,
she observed that both the gentlemen and their
followers were armed far more heavily than
was usual for hunters; both the latter having
the short, heavy arquebuses of the day slung
at their backs, and both the former carrying
huge wheel-lock pistols at their holsters.
She saw, moreover, that although the horses
were somewhat heated, as must be the case in
a day so singularly sultry, they were not
splashed with mud, or embossed with foam
that the hounds were as sleek as when they
left their kennel in the morning, and evidently
had not been uncoupledand that the dresses of
the riders were in too orderly array, with their
plumes trim and unbroken, and their spurs
bright and bloodless, to allow it to be imagined,
even by a novice, that they had been engaged,
for hours, in so rude a pastime as the chase,
and that, too, in so wild a forest region.
A slight smile of contempt flitted across her
lovely face, as she thought within herself
They are but poor deceivers, after all
perhaps
,
in their self-opinion, they fancy that it
needs no exertion of their high European
faculties
to dupe a
savage
. But this time they are
mistaken. They are no hunters, that is clear.
I wonder what has brought them hither?No
good!no good! I fancy. I do not like the
tall man's looks; but I will watch, I will find
out, before they go. And even while she was
pondering these things with herself, she called
three or four Indian maidens from an inner
room, and having spoken a few words in a low
tone to one, who darted out of the house
immediately
,
and made her way, without being
seen by the Spaniards, into the forest, she gave
directions to the others to prepare refreshments
for the strangers; and though she spoke in
her own language, she used phrases so
purposely
simple, that they were readily
understood
by her unwelcome guests, who had just
entered. Their instructions to the servants
ended,
It is fortunate, she then said, quite
naturally
,
and as if she believed their story
perfectly
it
is very fortunate that you should
have seen our cottage, for there is no village
or house very near us; and I think we shall
have a heavy storm. I almost wonder you
should have ventured so far from Isabella.
We have seen the clouds gathering here all the
morning.
It is fortunate, indeed, said the younger
cavalier, and I believe we must confess
ourselves
but artless woodmen, Sanchez and I
for we had no suspicion of the storm at all, till
we heard the thunder. Yes, thanks to
Heaven
!
we are wondrous fortunate.
You will think so, should it prove such a
tornado as I look for, she answered, simply,
looking out of the open door towards the
storm-clouds
,
which were gathering thicker every
moment
.
I meant that we are fortunate in finding so
sweet and beautiful a hostess, here all alone,
in the wild forest, and speaking our own
tongue, too, like a Castilian princess! Are you
the lady of the castle, fair one? and do you
queen it here alone, without court, or guards,
or courtiers?
Oh! she replied, with a light laugh, I
have heard of your grand Spanish compliments,
which you cavaliers deem it right to bestow on
every woman, if she be old even, and wrinkled.
And, as for speaking your language, I must
have been dull indeed had I not learned it from
aunt Anacaona; and more
Anaaona! And have we indeed the
happiness
to kiss the hands of a niece of that
peerless
queen and lady, the friend and protectress
of our people? exclaimed the same gentleman
who had spoken before; while his ruder
companion
broke out into a loud whistle of
astonishment
,
which he expressed yet further by a
loud sea-faring oath, and a repetition of the
name, Anaaona!
The queen Anaaona
is
my aunt, and has
ever been the Spaniards' friendmay they
prove grateful to her. But I was about to say
that I do not live alone; my brother, Orozimbo,
dwells with me, and will be here anon; he,
like yourselves, is hunting with his vassals.
I would he were here to receive you more
befittingly
.
That were impossible, most peerless
flower
,
began the cavalier, but Guarica quietly
interrupted
him.
I pray you pardon me, Senor, she said,
but if we have learned your language in
order
to converse the better with our
masters
,
and she laid rather a bitter emphasis on the last
word, we have not yet adopted, nor do we
wish to do so, your gallant modes of speech,
which seem to us mere falsehood and
hypocrisy
.
My name is Guarica, a simple Indian girl,
and neither flower nor pearlas such I am
glad to shelter and to serve you. Will you not
walk into the inner chamber? you will find
seats there to repose you; and my maidens will
bring some wine of the palm and some fresh
water; you must be parched with thirst.
Pray entermake no ceremonyand excuse
me.
And with the words she raised a
many-colored
mat of rushes, which hung across a
low doorway, and waving them towards the
large airy chamber wherein she was sitting
when their horses' tread apprised her of their
coming, she retired from the hall, where they
had as yet been standing, and left them alone
to their own devices.
By Heaven! but this is a strange business,
Guzman, exclaimed the sailor, now speaking
for the first time. I do not wonder at
Hernando
passing his time here, nor do I blame him
for it, by St. Jago! I would I were in his
shoes. She is the perfection of a
bona roba
.
I wonder has he married her, or does she love
him
paramour?
But what the devil are we to
do next?
You
are to hold your tonguethat is to
say if you can, by any means, and not to spoil
everything by your absurd and ill-timed
jesting
;
and, above all, you are not to keep calling
me Guzman and Herreiro, he added, sinking
his voice into a whisper, as he pronounced the
last words. I vow to God, if you do it again
I will put my dagger into you.
Your dagger, will you? answered the
other, bursting into a rough laugh. No you
won't! no you won't, Guzplague on it! there
I go again. Who the devil can think of such
things? but you will put no dagger into me, I
can tell you.
And why not? why not, I pray you, when
you plague me sowhen you would plague
the archangel Gabriel out of patience with
your buffoonery and folly? why should I not?
In the first place, because I would not let
youwhy two can play at dagger-work as
well as one, man! and I think I am as good as
you, any day. But if I were not, I wear a
secret
, when I ride with
you
for I have heard
a thing or two, and I don't forget what I hear,
either
What have you heard? what have you
heard? exclaimed the other, furiously, but
turning very pale as he spoke. Say onI
insist on your saying on! You have said too
much, or not enough; speak! out with it, what
have you heard?
Nay, said the sailor, never mindI do
not want to quarrel; and if I did, this is no
place for it. Let us go in, as the girl told us.
I would not have said aught, but you spoke of
stabbing me. Come, comeforget it! let us
go in.
And, with the words, he stalked on with a
sturdy step, and a quiet fearless smile, into the
room Guarica had indicated; but the other
paused behind, and muttered through his teeth,
He knows too much! he knows too much!
He is dangerous; but what a fool he was to let
me find it out. In one thing he is right,
however
,
this is no place, and no time, either;
and we have other cards to play, too, for the
nonce! but patiencepatience!
And, with a grim smile, he too walked in
after his companion, and throwing himself
down on a pile of soft cotton cushions,
smoothed his disordered features, and took a
careful observation of the room, and every
article
which it contained. And there were many
things most unusual to behold in an Indian's
dwelling, and such as must naturally have
excited
both comment and surprise in any persen
not prepared fully to encounter them. Upon a
centre table of some variegated wood,
elaborately
carved and polished, lay several Spanish
books of romance and poetry, a mandolin of
exquisite workmanship, and several sheets of
music, marked with the rude notation of the
day. There was a standish, too, with several
pens, both of reed and quills, and several rolls
of parchment. Upon the walls were five or
six bold and masterly sketches of combats with
the Moors of Granada, and one or two views
and sea pieces. In one corner of the room
stood a long arquebuse, which both the
strangers recognised in a moment; while, from
the antlers of a stag, which adorned the wall,
there hung a powder-horn, a set of bandoleers,
a pair of gilt Spanish spurs, and a
hunting-bugle
.
Upon a long divan or couch under the
window was a black velvet cloak and a plumed
hat.
At these things, when Herreiro entered, the
man he had called Sanchez was gaping with a
fixed wondering stare, and when he perceived
that the other had come in, he pointed to them
with his finger, and was about to speak, when
Guzman cut him short in a quick whisper.
I see, I seeit is just as I thought; but
do not seem to notice themfor God's sake do
not speak; I am sure that girl is watching us.
I do beseech you, do not seem to see, and yet
see everything.
Tush! you are always so suspicious;
now, I think
Of course you do, Herreiro again
interrupted
himof course you think it is going
to rain; why it is raining over there already.
Sanchez stared at him, but before he could
reply, Guarica, who had entered unperceived
by him, as he sat with his back towards the
door, though Herreiro had perceived her,
invited
him to take some wine which a girl was
just bringing, with tropical fruits and cool
water.
In a few moments afterwards Orozimbo
entered
,
carrying in his hand a couple of long
javelins, the head of one of which was wet
with fresh blood; and followed by several
Indians
,
two of whom bore a deer, slung by its
legs to a pole resting on their shoulders.
These threw themselves down to rest under
the portico, but Orozimbo walked straight into
his sister's guest-chamber; and though he
expressed
no surprise, but greeted his visitors
hospitably, it was evident to his sister that he
partook of her astonishment, if not of her
apprehension.
Meanwhile the storm burst with a degree of
intense and concentrated fury that cannot be
conceived till it is seen, and can be seen only
within the tropics; the thunder rolled in one
continuous and incessant roarthe whole
expanse
of heaven was one broad glare of blue
and livid lightningthe wind raved horribly,
sweeping the largest trees away as if they
were mere straws in its path. At length the
rain poured down in torrents, the wind sank,
the thunder died awaythe danger was at an
end; and, within two hours, the setting sun
beamed out again serenely, and not a token of
the storm was to be felt or seen, save in the
fallen trees, and in the freshness of the air,
cooled and reanimated by the thunder-gust.
During the storm the strangers had
conversed
on many subjects, endeavoring, evidently,
and the younger man more particularly, to
render themselves agreeable to Guarica; and,
above all, to appear perfectly at ease and
offhanded
.
But in neither one nor the other of
these ends were they at all successful; and
that, too, as it often happens, in consequence
of the very means they took to promote them.
In the first place, the courtly air,
overstrained
compliments, and yet more than these, the
ominous and sneering smile of Guzman,
impressed
Guarica with feelings of anything
rather than favorable; and, in the second, the
very care which the strangers took to avoid
all allusion to the articles betokening, as
clearly
as spoken words, the habitual intercourse
of the inhabitants with some gentleman of
Spanish blood, convinced hernot that they
did not see themfor that would have argued
them blind, or at least stupidly unobservant
but that they were prepared to see them there;
and that their visit was, in some sort, connected
with Hernando de Leon.
As the storm had now cleared off, and as
night was drawing near, they had no excuse
for remaining longer; and, with many
courteous
speeches, and many formalities of thanks
and leave-taking, they mounted their horses
and departedhaving declined Orozimbo's offer
to send a guide to show them the nearest way
to the fortress of Isabella.
Among the last words he uttered, Guzman
had, with great adroitness, as he thought,
contrived
to let out very naturally that his own
name was Sylva de Fronteiro, while he
continually
addressed the sailor as Juan Sanchez;
thereby convincing Guarica, beyond a
peradventure
,
that both these titles were unreal; for
she had overheard the latter call Herreiro
Guzman
,
and had caught some words of the
rebuke
which the blunder had called forth.
In a word, neither the brother nor sister
was deceived, for scarcely had they ridden ten
yards from the door before Orozimbo said
Who are they, Guarica; who are they;
and what brought them hither?
Nay, brother, answered the lovely girl,
I never saw either of them before; they
said they were out hunting, but that is not
true, for they had never let their hounds loose,
nor even soiled their boots.
They are spies, said the boy, spies on
Hernando, and I fancy they gave us false
names.
I am sure they did, answered Guarica,
I heard the little man call the other `
Guzman
,'
when they thought me out of hearing;
but De Leon will be here anon, and then we
shall know all about it.
I will know all about it sooner. What
ho! give me my bow and arrows there.
What time comes Hernando?
Not till the moon is above the forest-tops;
he was on guard all day, answered Guarica,
simply.
And that they knew right well, said
Orozimbo
,
but I will find them out! And now
one word, Guaricabe thou sure that De Leon
means thee honor. These Spaniardsaye,
the best of them, are but false knaves and
liars; and by the sun and moon, and all the
hosts of heaven! if he be the villain to deceive
thee, and thou the dupe to be deceived, this
handthis very hand of minedost
understand
,
Guarica? Girl! girl! I would rather
see thee deaddead by my own hand, than
guilty with a Spaniard!
And I would rather be so dead, replied
the girl, very firmly; but you wrong both
him and me.
Look to it, thou, that it be so! Fare thee
well; remember who thou art, and who were
they before thee. Ere the moon set will I
learn something of these fellows.
And snatching his long bow and four shafts
from the tall Indian who had brought them at
his bidding he waved a farewell to his sister,
bounded across the lawn, and entered the forest
at the point where, a little while before, the
cavaliers had struck it on their route for
Isabella.
CHAPTER III.
The
strangers had not ridden many yards
across the meadow, before one of the servants
spurred his horse sharply forward, and riding
up alongside of his master, said
I do not know, my lord, what the girl
meant, when she said there was no stabling;
for I never laid my eyes, in all my life, on a
neater rack and manger than were in that shed
or outhouseand a good steel chain with a
running billet, and a head-stall of Spanish
leather, fit for a count's charger. Good store
there was of bedding, too, and better maize
than we have at the fort for the troop horses.
Nor was that all, senor, for there had stood a
horse there within twelve hoursthere was
fresh dung in the stall.
I knowI know, Pacheco, all about it,
replied Guzman, and thou shalt know, too,
one of these daysso thou wilt only hold thy
peaceone word blabbed at the guard-room or
canteen will spoil everything.
You may trust me, my lordI never
talk!
I know you never do, Pacheco,
answered
Herreiro; you are a faithful fellow, as
well as a stout soldier.
The man touched his bonnet, and fell back
to his companion, highly gratified, and began
inculcating to him the necessity of silence.
WellI hope you are now satisfied, said
the sailor. I hope you are satisfied that, as
yon runagate Charib dog informed you,
Hernando
comes hither to court you Indian beauty
She is temptation enough, truly, without
bringing
treason in to aid. Why, she would set
half Ferdinand's court afire with those eyes of
hers, half passionate lustre and half sleepy
languor!
Satisfied am I, right well, that thou art a
fool, Gomez, said Herreiro; I doubt not now
that you fancy I shall abandon it
I don't see, for my part, what there is to
abandon, or to prosecute either. Here has
Hernando de Leon seduced a pretty Indian, and
passes all his spare time fondling herwell!
there is no sin against martial law in that, I
trowor if there be, few of us here shall
escape the provost marshal. Or if you like
better, he is wooing her to honorable marriage
and that the old admiral is like to consider
an especial service; particularly when the
wooer stands so high for prowess as
Hernando
;
and when the bride is the niece of the
unconquered Caonabowhy, he will deem it
a sure pledge of the pacification of the race.
I thought as muchjust such an
argument
as a thick-skulled, addle-brained sailor
like yourself would be sure to draw from it.
But II can see further. I will so plot it,
that I will brew from these ingredients
Beware that your brewing, interrupted
the other, return not bitterly to your own
lips. For all that I can see, all you are like
to gain in this matter, is that Hernando will
knock your brains out, like a mad dog's, for
meddling with his inamorata.
Would God that he would try itI ask
nothing betteranything, anything to give me
a chance of one fair thrust at his accursed
heart!
I' faith, you are a good haterwhatever
you may be beside, answered the sailor
Gomez
;
but, for my part, I cannot see why you
hate the lad so deadly. They tell me he has
saved your life some three or four times
Thrice! thrice! curses be on his head!
replied Don Guzman, gnashing his teeth with
deadly spite. It is for thatfor that I hate
him! From the first time I ever saw him, I felt
that in him was my bane. In everything he
has crossed my pathin everything outdone
me, foiled, defeated mehis praises are the
deadliest poison to my souland, from my
school-days upward, his praises have never for
a moment ceased to ring trumpet-like in my
ears. Then, as in veriest spite of Fortune, he
must make
me
the very butt whereon to prove
his valor, his magnanimity, his self-devotion
he must force
me
, whom it well nigh choked
in the utterance, to swell the burden of his
glory. Death to his soul! how I hate him!
and then, here, here is new cause for hatred, if
there were none before.
Here?new cause here?in what, I
prithee
?
Here!art thou blind, Gomez? Here in
this girl, this angel, this Guarica!but if I
call the fiend himself to aid, here I will outdo
him.
Gomez looked long and steadily in his
companion's
face, as if he would fain have read
something there, which he expected; but,
disappointed
,
he withdrew his eyes, and shook
his head doubtfully.
What, in the name of all the fiends of hell!
dost thou stare so for? What seest thou in my
face, man, to fascinate thee?
Naught! Guzmannaught! I looked to
see utter madnessstark lunacysheer
frenzy
!
but I see none of these thingsand yet so
surely as there is a God in heaven, thou must
be mad
For what should I be madI pray thee?
answered Herreiro, angrily! my pulse is as
cool as thine, my brain a thousand times more
clear, and vivid in conceptionfor what should
I be mad?for loving this most perfect of
heaven's creatures?
Aye! for that very thingmost vivldly
mad! replied the sailor. I knew you ever
for a fierce and voluptuous devil, but thy blood
must indeed be like Greek fire to blaze out thus
unquenchable at one spark from a brown
wench's eye!most wildly mad in thisand
absolutely frenzied, when you would dream of
winning her from De Leon. Why he hath
had her heart, possessed her soul, these six
monthsand think you that he is so weak a
rival, and that too, when so stabilished in her
favors? Why, if you and he were to start
fairly, he could give you his topsails and beat
you; as I have seen an Algerine felucca run
our best caravellas hull down in an hour.
Tush! man, think better of itto judge by one
look I saw her give you, were you the only one
in the island, she would have none of you!
I will have heror die for it! answered
Don Guzman, fiercely. So let that be the
end of it!
The end of it, then, let it beas it
will
sure enough! For Hernando will kill you
like a rat, as soon as he finds you meddling
with his Bonnibella. But we had better ride
on somewhat quickly now, and get out of his
track; for we are in the very path he always
rides; and he is off his guard by this time, and
is now flying hitherward, I warrant me, upon
the wings of hot anticipation!
That is the first word of sense you have
spoken to-night, said Herreiro; let us
gallop
.
And with the word they put their horses to
their speed, and dashed along the sort of forest
path, which had been worn in the virgin soil
by the hoofs of De Leon's Andalusian, so
constantly
during the last six months had he
passed
5
and repassed between the cottage of his love
and the Spanish fortress. After an hour's
riding
they came to a spot where a broad shallow
rivulet, flowing upon a pebbly bed, rippled
across the path, and turning abruptly into its
channel to the left hand of Hernando's track,
they descended it slowly, the waters rarely
mounting above their horses' fetlocks, for
something better than a mile, where it flowed
out of the shadowy woods, into an open plain
or bega, wide of Hernando's route, across
which they sped rapidly towards Isabella.
It was not, probably, half an hour after the
time of their turning into the stream that the
tramp of a horse, had there been any one there
to listen, might have been heard coming up
from the settlements, and in a moment or two,
De Leon, followed by his trusty hounds,
cantered
along the path; but as he reached the
little
ford he pulled up suddenly, for there, in
the centre of the horse track, stooping down as
if to examine some late footprints in the mois!
soil, stood the Charib boy Orozimbo.
Ha! Orozimbowhat hath brought thee
so far from home at this untimely hour!
Knavery, if not villany, Hernando,
answered
the youth, in Spanish, which he spoke
now with much more accuracy, both of
pronunciation
and of syntax, than he had done at
his first meeting with De Leon; but still not
nearly with so correct an emphasis as his
beautiful
sisterand perchance treason!
Treason! cried the young Spaniard, by
whom, or whom against? what do you mean,
boy?
By whom, I know not, answered
Orozimbo
,
but against thee, if I err not. And
he proceeded to relate to him the circumstances
of the visit Guarica had received that day; and
their reasons for suspecting that all was not
right, nor as it seemed to be. He described the
persons of the riders with a degree of minute
accuracy, extending to the smallest details of
their dress, to the fashion of their spurs, the
ornaments of their sword hilts, the marks and
colors of their horses, the very spots on their
hounds; such things as no mortal eye, save of
an Indian, could have observed in so short a
period, as had enabled him to take in and
comprehend
the whole.
At first, Hernando de Leon listened half
carelessly
,
thinking in his own mind that the visit
must have been purely accidental, attaching
little consequence to the details, and half
inclined
to smile at the habitual suspicion of the
Indian, so characteristically and needlessly
displayed
.
Soon, however, it appeared that his attention
was excited, for he now listened eagerly, asked
two or three quick and pertinent questions, to
which he received answers as intelligent and
clearand, after the boy had ceased speaking,
pondered for a few moments deeply, and then
said
That is oddit must have been Gomez
Aria, with Guzman de Herreirothere are no
others in the fortress to whom this description
could apply
Yes! yes! interrupted Orozimbo, eagerly;
`I had forgotten thatGuarica heard the short
man call the other, `Guzman.' It was they, I
am sure of it. Are they friends of yours?
are they true men?
Herreiro is: I would stake my soul's
salvation
on it! I have saved his life thrice, at
the risk of my own. And as for Gomez, he
is a good blunt sailorand I have never
wronged him. Yet it is passing strange. You
say they rode home by this path?
To this spot, and here they have turned off
down the rivulet's bed to avoid meeting you;
knew they the hour at which you would leave
Isabella?
Herreiro did, for he asked me to ride out
with him to-day, and I told him I was officer
of the guard until eight o'clock at night. I
wondered somewhat when he asked me; for
I have noted a shade of coolness in his
manner
lately.
Beware of him! said Orozimbo; he
means you no good. They had not been
hunting; no! not they; they had not so much
as uncoupled their bloodhounds. And neither
one nor other of them noticed, or seemed to see,
the Spanish books or the music which you left
the other day; or even your gun and bugle
horn. Had they been honest, they would have
naturally inquired about those things, which are
not to be found, you know, in every Indian's
cabin.
He can mean me no evil, said Hernando,
thoughtfully; he never had a cause
He has one now! answered Orozimbo,
quickly.
He has a cause now? a cause to mean me
ill? How sowhat cause?
Guarica.
Guarica? how? a cause to injure me!
Guarica?
Yes! yes! Guarica; for he loves her.
Loves her? Why he has never seen her
but for an hour to-dayand do you say he
loves her?
Aye! said the boy, drily, loves her, as
much as you Spanish ever love Indian maidens.
He lusts after her young beauty
Hold, Orozimbo! said De Leon, looking
him steadily and sternly in the face, was
that meant to me?
Perhaps! answered the youth, gloomily,
perhaps! and yet no! no! I believe thou art
honest, De Leon. Yet I doubt, sometimes,
even thee.
Mark me, Orozimbo, replied Hernando,
leaning from his tall charger, and pressing the
naked shoulder of the Charib heavily with his
right hand, mark me. For myself, I care
not for your suspicions; but if I deemed that
your rash tongue dared syllable one doubt of
Guarica's puritythat your brain had
surmised
,
even for a second's space, that she
would listen to a dishonorable suither
brother
though you be
What then, her brother though I be, what
then? cried Orozimbo, under strong
excitement
.
I would strike you to my feet! the young
Spaniard answered, gravely, to my feet! for
calumniating
,
in your sister, one of God's angels!
You would do well! cried the boy,
grasping
his hand; I should deserve it! But I
doubt neither of youleast of all her! But
when I think of the wrongs you Spaniards
have done to usof our hearths defiled, our
names disgraced, our wives and sisters torn
from our bosoms, wooed and caressed and
courted until your passions or your whims are
satisfied, and then sent back dishonored and
undone to be a blot upon the homes they once
adornedwhen I think on those things,
Hernando
de Leon, my soul grows black within
me, and I doubt all things! and I tell
you
you who love herI marked you Guzman's
dark and snakelike eye dwell on Guarica's form,
as never man's eye dwelt on maiden whom he
hoped not to dishonor, whom he lusted not to
destroy. I tell you he gloated on every heave
of her swelling bosom, on every undulation of
her limbsnot a movement, not a turn of her
figure could escape him. By the God whom I
worship, my soul burned to slay him where he
sat. Let him come here again, and a shaft
from this bow that never misses, shall drown
the flames of his accursed lust in his black
heart's blood!
Nay! nay, my friend, and soon to be my
brother, be not rash, Orozimbo. I trust thou
art too hasty I trust that, in this at least, thou
art too suspicious. But if it were so, if it were
as thou thinkest, dost imagine that II,
Hernando
de Leonwould leave to any other man
alive, were that other the Cid Ruy Diaz of
Bivar
,
the right of avenging a wrong offered to
my promised wifethe privilege of shedding
his life blood that dared but to look on her too
warmly? No! no! believe me, Orozimbo, if
it be so, he dies upon this blade which twice
has beaten death back from the gates of his
existence
!
But not a word of thisnot a word, on
thy life, to Guarica! I will myself speak
with Don Guzman, when I return to-morrow.
I think he will not dare, even if he should
wish it, to show aught but respectful courtesy
to my promised bride.
It shall be done as you wish, Hernando,
answered the youth, but beware of him.
Certain
am I, that he is no true man, or honest
friend; and for the rest, he knows even now,
as well as I do, that you daily visit Guarica;
though it may be he fancies her your paramour,
and not your destined wife. But, as I said,
beware
of him, and let him beware of me; for as
surely as there is a God, who witnesses our
thoughts, as clearly as our actions, so surely
will I shoot him, like a dog, if I catch him
lurking about her. And now go on your way
to Guaricashe waits for you.
And you, Orozimbo?
I will pursue these men until I house them
fairly, that I may learn to a foot the path in
which they travel; for by that same path will
they return again.
No violence, my friend, promise me that
there shall be no violence.
I do, replied the Charib, laying his tawny
hand on his bare bosom; I do promise you.
Why should I harm them until I am certain?
I am not quite so mad as that, Senor
Hernando
.
Then goit is as well thou shouldstand
keep good watch; for I am ordered hence with
a detachment to the new fortress eastward, and
shall be absent seven days, or perhaps longer.
Watch over her while I am gone; for if he
dare attempt aught, it will be thenthough I
think it not of him.
Ordered henceha! ordered away! cried
the boy; when was that? When did you
hear of that? Are you sure he had naught to
do with it?
The order was conveyed to me this
morning
from my superiors. Don Guzman had no
voice in it, save as one of the council; besides
it is a high and honorable post! Farewell,
and be thou prudent; ere I set forth I will seek
occasion to hold converse with him. Good
night, and fare thee well, if thou return not to
the cottage ere I leave it.
And shaking hands kindly with the young
and gallant Indian, he cantered forward, full of
high hopes and tender dreams, to join his
beautiful
Guarica; while, with the patient and
doglike
sagacity of his race, her brother set
himself
to track out inch by inch, the route of those
strangers, from whose visit his suspicions
feared so much of evil.
But though Hernando, partly from a
reluctance
to admit himself the possibility of such a
surmise, and still more from a prudent
apprehension
of wakening the fiery soul of the
Charib
boy to some deed of signal vengeance, the
consequence of which might be to cause a war
of extermination between the races; but though
Hernando had expressed his confidence so
strongly in the good faith of Herreiro, that
confidence
,
as he rode onward in deep
self-communion
,
began to wane; and if not quite
extinguished
,
was much weakened before he
reached
the dwelling of his lady love, and in her
witching smile forgot all thought of peril.
As soon as Orozimbo left him, he began to
reflect within himself upon the altered conduct
of Don Guzman; for he could not deny to his
own heart that it was altered strangely. From
having been at one time his most constant and
familiar comrade, he now remembered that for
many weeks past Herreiro had avoided him;
and, if compelled by the routine of duty to
exchange
a few words with him, had done so
hurriedly, and without any longer pause than
was necessary. When he thought upon this,
he began naturally enough to think upon the
reason why he, so late the idol of his friends
and fellow soldiers, should have now earned
their suspicion and dislike. Nor could he but
confess that in some sort the fault had been
his ownthat he had been so utterly
engrossed
by his passion for the princess, as to
neglect
all else except his dutyand almost that
also! Nor could he wonder that his own
sudden alienation from the pastimes and
pursuits
of his associates, should have given rise
in them not only to a like alienation, but to a
feeling of resentment and distrust, and perhaps
even of hatred, ever the child of irritated
vanity.
He struck his hand on his breast with a
gloomy feeling of self-condemnation Alas!
he muttered to himselfAlas! how often do
even our best feelings lead us astrayhow
often
do we by our own first injustice towards
others beget that injustice towards ourselves of
which we afterwards so bitterly complain!
But I will speak with him to-morrow, ere I
start; I will speak with him openly and
frankly, and all shall be well. And now for
Guarica.
By this time he had traversed the tract of
forest land, and reached the edge of the lone
savannah, whence he could mark the cottage
home of his beloved, o'ercanopied by its tall
palms and feathery mimosas; the moon was
hanging like a lamp of silver in the serene and
cloudless sky, wherein a thousand glorious
constellations unknown to our colder
hemispheres
were burning with a clear and deathless
lustre, undimmed by any mist or earthly
vapor
.
Myriads of fire-flies were glancing in the
thick foliage of the trees, or flitting to and fro
over the dewy grassperfumes were
steaming
up from every herb and flower, and the
light air that fanned the face of the young
Spaniard was loaded with a rich and spicy
fragrance
,
almost too powerful for the senses.
There was a hum of melody upon the soft
night breeze, the blended voices of ten
thousand
small nocturnal insects, but sweeter,
clearer, more melodious far than all swelled up
from the distant cottage, the pure voice of
young womanhood, rising in notes of sacred
song to the very throne of Holiness. The
young man paused to listen with a soul
thrilling
with delightit was the hymn to the Vir
gin, and though the intermediate words were
lost in distance, the burden
Ave Purissim
pealed in her clear and silvery accents high as
the swell of a seraphic trumpet. While he
yet stood and listened, the light, which beamed
fair and uninterrupted from the casement of
Guarica's chamber, was suddenly obscured,
and he might see the slight and exquisite
proportions
of the fair girl pencilled distinct and
sharp, against the glowing background, as she
stood looking out into the night awaiting his
approach, who, though unseen, was so nigh to
her.
He gave his horse the spur, and in five
minutes
was beside her. It is not in the power
of words to describe such meetings. Those
who have loved, as did the young Hernando,
fervently, wildly, passionately (yet withal so
chastely and so purely that his most ardent
wish had called no blush to the chariest
maiden's cheek), can remember, can conceive.
To all beside, the high and holy aspirations,
the sweet blending of those kindred souls, is a
sealed book; and sealed it must remain, until
to them, too, love shall give the key.
Suffice it they were happy; as happy as
aught of mortal mould may be. No thought
of care or evil came nigh them: lapped in the
dreams of young romanceabsorbed in their
unselfish, fond affectionthey had no thoughts
but of the blissful presentno hopes but of a
blessed future.
Long they sat, hand in hand, in that serene
and tranquil happiness, which is too deep, too
full of thought, to find vent in many words;
and afterwards, long they conversed of their
future prospects, anticipating the arrival of the
great and good Columbus, who was soon
hourly expected to return from Old Spain, and
whose consent alone, and presence, they
awaited, in order to be made one in the sight
of man and God.
The night was wearing late, and the slight
meal of fruits, and cake, and sweet palm wine
had been tasted, yet not once had Guarica ever
thought of mentioning the visit of her lover's
countrymen; nor had Hernando found courage
yet to tell her that seven days must elapse
before
he should again behold her.
But now, when the time had arrived to say
farewell, and he was forced reluctantly to tell
her allreluctantly, not only that it was
painful
to himsell to dwell even on his temporary
absencebut that he could not bear to see
those sweet eyes swim in tears, that charming
bosom swell with the sob of suppressed agony
now, in the agitation and the anguish of
that parting moment, the fears, which she had
that day for the first time experienced, came
back upon her, dark and gloomy.
And, hanging on Hernando's shoulder, she
owned, even while she strove to smile at her
own weak and womanish dismayshe
confessed
that she, too, had read in the dark eye
of Guzman, she knew not what, that had
filled
her soul with harrowing dread; with
forebodings
such as she never had entertained, or
thought of before; which had hung all the
evening like a heavy storm cloud darkening
her very soul; and which, though banished
for a space by his presence, had again
returned
,
sadder, and heavier, and darker than
before
.
It was in vain that Hernando argued with
her, as he had argued with her brother; that
he used every faculty of his powerful mind to
convince, to soothe, to reassure herit was in
vainshe would not be consoled.
I know it, she said, in reply to all that he
could urge; I feel it here, and I know it
will be soI know that the time of my trial is
at hand. God grant me strength to pass
through it stainless and unscathedbut I
foresee
my peril, and the quarter whence it cometh.
I know that you must leave meI would not
have you stay, or loiterno, not to save my
life: for what should you be, with your
soldier's
honor tarnishedor what would be left
for me, if I should tempt you to dishonor?
No! my beloved, no!You must begone, and
leave Guarica to her trials and her God! Pray
for me, my beloved, pray for meand oh!
whatever shall fall out, be well assured of this
that never will Guarica survive her honor,
or her love for De Leon. Farewell, then,
dear Hernando; but, ere you go, grant me one
boonwill you not, dearest?the first boon
Guarica ever asked of her Hernando?
Can you ask if I will, Guarica? Take
anythingtake all! my life, my very soul is
thine. What shall I give thee, dearest?
This! said the girl, laying her hand on
the hilt of a small, slight, though long stiletto,
with a square blade, scarce thicker than a
lady's bodkin, which he wore in a golden
scabbard at his girdlegive me this only!
Nay! nay! this were an ominous gift,
Guarica; ask anything but this.
Will you refuse me my first prayer,
Hernando
?
I would not willingly refusebut there
is an ancient saw about sharp-edged gifts. I
am not superstitious, and yetand yetI will
own the truthI do not like to give it!
Then will I buy it of you: what shall I
give? See, she confinued, smiling, the
other day you asked me for a lock of hair:
give me the dagger quick, and you shall have
it!
And with the words she drew it from the
sheath, and severed a long, silky ringlet.
Give me the scabbard, now, and you shall
have thisand
And what, Guarica?
And what you never would have dared
to ask of me. And she cast down her eyes;
and a quick blush shot across her sunny
features
;
and a visible thrill shook her frame, as
if she half repented the words she had uttered.
A kiss, Guarica?
She raised her eyes again, timidly but
unshrinkingly
,
to meet her lover's ardent gaze:
You will not think me overbold or
unmaidenly
,
Hernando?
You! you unmaidenly, Guarica!the
saints in heaven as soon!
And as he spoke, he unlinked the jewelled
scabbard from his girdle, and laying it in her
hand, folded her for one moment in his arms,
and printed one long, chaste kiss, on lips that
returned not the pressure.
But for what can you want such a
keepsake
,
dearest?what will you do with it?
he asked, as he released her.
Wear it next to my heart, she answered,
her soft eye lightening with a bright,
enthusiastic
inspiration, and her whole form
appearing
to dilate with energy and soul. Now I
am mistress of myselfnow I am mistress of
my honor!
Lovely enthusiast!and thinkest thou
thou couldst find the courage or the strength to
use it?
Think Ithink I, Hernando? No! I
think
notI know it. Should that man dare
to wrong me, so surely as I hope to live in
heaven hereafter, where he stood, there should
he die by a girl's hand; or, if that should fail,
I have a heart myself, that lies not so deep but
this would reach it. Now, I am happy, love
now I am strong and fearless. Fare thee
wellfare thee well, Hernando, and dread
nothing
.
Spotless you leave me now, and
loving
,
and spotless you shall find me, aye! and
loving, whether it be on earth or
there!
and she pointed with the gleaming dagger to
the calm, azure heavens, as she spoke, in a
voice so tranquilly harmonious, and with an
air of majesty so perfect, that Hernando almost
asked himself whether she were not a being of
nature
too pure and ethereal
to be the object of
mere mortal love, and fitter for man's adoration
as a guardian saint or angel.
Beautiful, glorious creature! he
exclaimed
,
almost involuntarily, it will be needless
all; there lives no man on earth daring enough
to dream of harming thee; and if there were,
the Lord, who watches over all his virtuous
creatures, would surely send down legions of
thy kindred angels to defend thee!
Hernando!
Guarica! sweet Guarica! Farewell!
And the young lovers parted. Sad word,
alas!sad thought. For who that part can
dream when they shall meet again, or what
shall pass before that meeting?
CHAPTER IV.
Morning
had dawned already, when
Hernando
returned to the fortress of his
countrymen
,
and all was noise and bustle; two
companies
were under arms without the gates, and
the whole esplanade between the walls and the
sea was alive with men rolling down casks of
ammunition or provisions to a tall caravella,
which lay in the little basin at the wharf, with
her foretopsail loose, in readiness to sail, as it
seemed, at a moment's notice.
As Hernando dismounted, two or three
officers
,
who were inspecting the arquebusers and
pikemen, stepped forward to salute him.
How soon will the tide serve, Seor
Gomez
?
asked the young cavalier, addressing
the personage who had accompanied Herreiro
on the previous day.
Not for two hours, at the earliest, Don
Hernando, replied the sailor; but I am
waiting
only to have the soldiers put on board,
before
I shove off into the stream.
I will give ordersI will give orders.
How soon shall you want me on board?
My boat shall wait you in an hour at the
port stairs.
I will be ready, senor. Don Luis
Mandragone
,
get your men on board instantly.
Steadily, sir! steadily! no hurry! Forward,
march!
And for a few moments he stood still,
observing
the movements of the troops, who,
with that steadiness of severe discipline which
rendered the Spanish infantry the most famous
in the world, went through the requisite
man
uvres
with equal speed and facility.
This done, Hernando turned to the sentinels
on duty, and inquired if Don Guzman de
Herreiro
was within the walls, but, greatly to his
disappointment, he was answered in the
negative
;
and, on making further inquiries, still
more to his vexation, he was informed that,
although he had not returned home till a late
hour on the previous evening, he had set out,
alone, to hunt before daybreak.
Not a word did De Leon utter in reply, but
his brow grew as black as night, and he strode
away, hastily, to his own barrack, and locking
himself in, to avoid interruption, took pen and
paper, and addressed a long letter to his whilom
friend and comrade.
For he was not deceived in the least by the
pretext of hunting; knowing, as he did, that
Herreiro was by no means so ardent an
admirer
of field sports, as to get up before the sun
two following mornings, to ride after the
stanchest
hounds that ever opened upon game.
He doubted not, therefore, that, whatever the
pretence, his Guarica, his own betrothed, was
the true object of pursuit to a man, whom he
knew bold, resolute, voluptuous, unscrupulous,
and persevering. It was a moment of strange
agony! For though he never so much
dreamed
of doubting Guarica's purity of soul, or
power to resist more potent fascinations than
were like to be brought against herthough he
imagined not that Herreiro would dare
resort
to violencestill it was anguish to believe
that she, his soul's idol, would have to endure
the solicitations, to brook the insolent addresses
of this bold libertise.
It was now that he felt bitterly the folly of
his conduct, in so estranging himself from his
comrades: for he had no one to whom he
could confide his anxieties, of whom he could
ask comfort and advice. The rather that the
very man to whom it would have been most
natural that he should apply, was he against
whom he was now called upon to take counsel.
Short was the space which was left to him,
either for action or deliberation, and perhaps it
was well for him that it was so; for assuredly,
under the spur of instant necessity, he took a
course which, if the boldest, was the wisest he
could have adopted.
He sat down and wrote a long, frank letter
to Herreiro, as one devoted friend to another.
He apologized in some sort for his late
strangeness
and allenation, by accounting for it;
which he didingenuously, frankly, truly.
He wrote to him of Guarica, as if he were
ignorant
that Herreiro knew of her existence: he
told him of his first fascination, of his deep
love arising thence, of his intention to make
her his wife, immediately on the return of
Columbus
;
and then, touching on his compulsory
absence from Isabella, he commended his
mistress
to the care of his friend, in all loyalty and
honor; conjuring him to watch over her, to
protect her in case of any peril, to be to her,
in short, if necessity should arise, as a brother.
This packet finished, and confided to the
charge of Don Guzman's confidential servant,
which was not done until the hour of
embarkation
was at hand,Hernando's mind was
more composed and tranquillized than it had
been since his discovery of Herreiro's conduct.
He cannot, thought he, within himself,
after receiving thishe cannot dream of
prosecuting
any dishonorable suit towards my
destined wife First, I cannot believe his heart
so treacherously base and evil: second, he dare
not; for he knows that, did he so, within six
hours of my return, he would have ceased to
draw the breath of life: and third, as
gentleman
and belted knight, he dare not meet the
obloquy and scorn of every honorable man,
which would burst on his head should he
despise
this frank and loyal trust.
And in this renewed confidence, he stepped
on board the boat that was to bear him to the
stately caravella; and as he climbed her
castellated
prow, and stood upon her guarded
deck, with the free, fair breeze laughing in her
shrouds and halyards, and the blue waves of
the bright Caribbean rippling and gurgling
round her bows, sorrow, and care, and sad
anticipation passed from his heart, as a cloud
is swept away by the autumnal wind from the
face of some rich champaign, and in their
place the sunshine of ambition, and blithe
energetic
action, possessed the spirit of the
adventurous
soldier.
So true it is, that for man, however deeply
and devotedly he love, that love is still but the
amusement, the luxury, if you will, of his
existence; while, on the contrary, to a woman
it is the necessity of lifenay, it is life
itself
.
It certainly is not possible that any man on
earth could have loved more sincerely, more
fervently, than Hernando; and yet, from the
instant when the brave frigate left her
moorings
,
spreading sheet after sheet of snowy
canvas
to the favoring breeze, and dashing the
small seas asunder in jets of flashing spray,
not a thought of anxiety or sadness came to
disturb him, or, if it did, it was banished by an
effort of strong will, as being, if not unmanly,
at least inconsistent with his bolder duties.
Fair blew the breezes, and rapidly the good
ship sped before it, and the cheer of the stout
mariners, and the jest and song of the idle
soldiery
,
to whom this summer voyage was a gay
holiday of rest from the monotonous routine of
the garrison, made merry, though rough music
Action and bustle, and perhaps strife
enthusiastic
,
thrilling strife before themthe walls of
Isabella ere long sunk on their lee, and they,
and all that they contained, were soon
forgotten
.
But in the forest-home of poor Guarica there
was no keen excitement, no hurried action, to
banish heavy shadows from the heartno
change of scene to divert the weary eyes from
thoughts forgotten by the sight of familiar
objects
.
No new, strange sounds to distract the
ear, filled as it were with old memories,
recalled
at every moment by old, accustomed noises.
There she sat in her wonted chamber, where
he had so lately sat beside her, gazing upon the
same sweet landscape which so often they had
admired togethernow turning to the books
which he had given her, now trying to distract
her sorrows by singing, to his mandolin, the
Spanish airs which he had taught her. But
all would not do; the one dread thought, the
one dread terror, sat on her heart, haunted her
as with a real presencethe fixed
presentiment
of evilevil from that dark, terrible Don
Guzman.
And, as if to increase the weight of that
terror, it chanced that Orozimbo, who, fearful
as herself of some deep laid and treacherous
stratagem, had resolved to devote the whole
time of Hernando's absence to watching over
Guaricawas called away at dawn that very
morning, with every vassal he could muster, to
attend a general council of the tribe, convened
by Caonabo, whose mandate, as his uncle and
his chief, he neither dared dispute nor could
resist.
Again, therefore, was she left alone with
her maidens, to whom, knowing the inutility
of awakening their terrors fruitlessly, she had
confided nothing of her apprehensions.
The day, however, passed, until the sun had
buried his lower limb in the green summit of
the tall forest which encompassed the
savanuah
;
and no alarm had occurred, nor any
sound come from the neighboring woodlands,
to denote the vicinity of any stranger. The
lapse of time, as it ever will, bred something of
security, and she began to reprove herself with
cowardly and shameful weakness, and to
endeavor
to convince herself that, as Hernando
had assured her, Don Guzman's visit must have
been purely accidental.
It wanted, perhaps, two hours, or nearly
three of the true sunset, although the shadows
of the woods were already cast in level lines of
purple over the smooth savannah, when her
girls came in to announce to her that they were
going down to bear the cotton cloths they had
been spinning to the bleach ground beside the
brook. Once, for a moment, it occurred to her
to retain one of the girls near her person, but
with a smile at her own cowardice, she
changed
her mind, and suffered them to leave her all
alone, reflecting, as she did so, that if danger
should arise, they could afford her little or no
protection; and again, that should she be
alarmed, a moment would carry her to the spot
where they were assembled.
She sat still, therefore, for a space, listening
to the gay sound of their laughing voices, until
they wre lost in the distance: and then,
although
she held a volume of some high
Spanish
poet in her hand, she fell into a reverie,
which lasted till the purple hues of evening
were gradually stealing towards the zenith.
She had just, partially aroused from her
meditation
,
begun to marvel at the long tarrying of
the girls, when she felt, rather than saw, for
her eyes were lowered to the ground, that some
one had passed the window near which she
was sitting.
At the next moment a footstep, which her
quick Indian ear told her was a man's, and a
European's, fell heavily upon the portico.
Instinctively her hand glanced down to the
hilt of the stiletto which she wore, as she had
said she would, next to her heart, within her
muslin and robe, and as she loosened the keen
weapon in the sheath, a high and flashing smile
illuminated her dark features.
At the same moment, the tall form of Dou
Guzman de Herreiro stood on the threshold of
the door.
He was dressed in a full suit of black cloth,
with hat, plumes, mantle of the same color,
and the swift eye of the girl perceived instantly
that he was heavily, almost, indeed,
ostentatiously
armedfor in addition to the long
Toledo
blade which hung at his left side, and the
heavy dagger which counterbalanced it, he
had a pair of horseman's pistols at his belt, so
large and cumbrous that they would appear
almost out of place in holsters at the
saddle-bow
.
He did not speak a word, but, removing the
hat from his high, pale brow, stood gazing at
her with an eye so fixed and baleful, that it
seemed almost as if he believed he could
fascinate
her.
And she rose instantly, and faced him,
tranquil
and calm, and, though paler than usual,
firm and untrembling.
Then stepping one pace forward, and
extending
his hand, as if to take hers, which
hung by her side motionless, he said in tones
of affected softness
Well, my sweet princess of the forest,
happy am I, again, to find you all alone.
Don Guzman de Herreiro, she replied,
still confronting him with a quiet eye, and
rejecting
his hand, as though she bad not
perceived
that he offered itDon Guzman de
Herreiro will perhaps condescend to explain
the motives that have led him to this intrusion.
There is no storm to-night, nor has the chase,
I think, this time led him hither?
You know me, thenyou know me,
exclaimed
the Spaniard, a bright color for a moment
kindling his sallow features. Fortunate
that
,
my sweet Guarica; for it will save the
awkwardness
of introductions.
I do know you, senor, the young girl
answered
steadily, and when you have
answered
me my question, you shall know
me
,
which I now perceive you do not.
Your question, said Herreiro, with an air
half forgetful and half supercilious; Aye!
why I have come hither, is it not?to see
you, then, my beauty. It is your grace, your
charms, that have brought me hither
And for what end, I pray you, or to what
purpose?
These things, sweet one, he answered,
carelessly, are, perhaps, explained better by
deeds than by words; some little time, and a
few soft attentions, make all that clear and
simple, which, if told bluntly, might alarm
your sex's charming sensibility.
I prayed you yesterday, senor, to spare
yourself the trouble of paying me these fine
compliments, as they are merely thrown away
I will now add, that if they be meant as serious
gallantry, they are, if possible, more useless
than when regarded as mere figurative
flourishes
,
employed to keep your tongue in tune.
So scornfulah! so young and beautiful,
and so contemptuous withal.
How should I be other than scornful?
answered Guarica, still perfectly unmoved,
when your addresses can be regarded only as
mockery or as insult.
Insultyou errsweet Guarica. What
if I come to lay my heart in all honor at your
feetto say to you frankly
Were that the casewhich it is not, she
answered, as frankly would I tell you, that
I cannot accept your heart, having none to
bestow
on you in return.
Again, what if I were to say that it is not
your heart, but your beauty
Senor!
That overlooking all past frailties, all
tenderness of the heart towards one
To put a stop to all this matter at once,
she interrupted him, speaking very rapidly,
and with a marked and thrilling emphasis, I
will fill up your sentence. To one,
you
say
to Don Hernando de Leon, say I, whose
promised
bride I am. You will see now the
propriety
of urging me no further. Don Guzman,
you are answered. If that you be a gentleman,
you will leave me.
And do you really think, my angel, that I
believe such nonsensethat I even suppose
you
to believe it? De Leon's paramour, if you
love the title, and much honor you do to his
good tastebut his wifehis wifeha! ha!
you make me laugh. By heavens! you make
me laugh, Guarica!
And with the word he advanced a little way
towards her; but she exclaimed in a clear high
note, that pierced his ear like the blast of a
silver trumpet
Stand back! stand back! I say not if
you be a gentlemanyou, who are recreant
to every law of Spanish chivalry or knightly
honor! You, who are false to your noble
comrade's trust! you, traitor and knave and
liar!I say not, if you be a man, for nothing
worthy the name of man would so insult and
outrage a helpless solitary girl! But still, I
say, stand back! Back! not for shame, or
honesty, or honor! but for fear! Back! lest,
when he return, Hernando scourge you like a
vile cur as you are, scourge you before the
face of your chivalric countrymen!
A fair defiance, lovely Guarica, a fair but
dangerous defiance. Never, if you will be
advised
by me, taunt a man on his personal
courage
.
You are a brave girl to defy me thus,
when you are at my mercy, when you are
alone.
I am not at your mercy. I am not alone!
Not at my mercy? not alone? But you
know not that I have watched my timethat
I am thoroughly aware, that, save we two,
there is no living creature within earshot!
I care not how you may have watched, I
care not what you knowI am
not
at your
mercy? I am
not
alone!
As how, sweet beauty? By heaven!
your daring lends fresh lustre to your
loveliness
!
I am the mistress of myself, and God is
with me.
See, then, said Herreiro, sneeringly, if
God will aid you. Come, girl, wilt grant to
love, what thou perforce must yield to
violence
?
Her lips moved rapidly, but no sound
reached
his ear. Her eyes were turned upward.
But her right hand was firmly clasped within
the bosom of her robe.
Come, Guarica, be wiseresistance is in
vainsubmit me
Beware thou! I will not submit thee!
And she stood pale and motionless as marble,
but as firm at the same time, and almost as
fearless. Maddened by passion, and excited
almost to frenzy by her scornful bearing, he
sprang to seize her; his right hand had already
clutched her left arm, as it hung by her side,
his left was flung about her waist, when, in an
instant, in the twinkling of an eye, the spell
was brokenthe blood rushed in a torrent, to
brow, cheek, neck, and bosom of the pale
statue, her eye flashed fiery indignation, her
right hand sprang into the air, the keen blade
of Hernando's dagger glittering through the
dusky twilight.
Die! she cried; ravisher and villain
die in thy sin and shame!
And with a quick and fiery energy that made
up for the want of strength, she smote him
three times in the bosom with the speed of
light, that the strong man let go his hold, and
staggered back a pace or two, like one who
has received a mortal wound.
Yet Guarica knew that the villain was
unwounded
,
for every blow that she dealt him
had jarred her slight arm to the shoulder, as the
point of her weapon glanced from the
secret
chain mail which Herreiro wore beneath his
doublet. Had the blade been of less perfect
temper it had been shivered to the hilt. As it
was, it had not lost one iota of its trenchant
keenness, and, as she started back, she coolly
tried its point with her finger.
Best leave me, senor! she exclaimed.
From me you can gain nothing, even on terms
more shameful to your manhood!
You are mistaken, girl! he replied,
fiercely
,
for he was no coward, and his blood was
up. Your God will no more aid you, than
will your foolish bodkin pierce my good
Spanish
mail. Prepare yourself for the worst. It
is now pride and vengeance. Look to
yourself
your
will find no mercy!
I expect none, she answered, and as he
rushed towards her, his eyes glowing and his
cheeks flushed with fiendish passion, she added,
looking up towards heavenYet I am
mistress
of myself! come one step nearer, and by
the God whom thou dost not believe, and who
shall yet smite thee in thy unbeliefin my
own heart I plunge this dagger, and on thy
head be the blood and the curse!
And with the word she tore away the cotton
robe that scarce restrained her panting bosom,
and raised the long keen blade aloft with proud
determination.
My flesh will hardly turn the point, which
thy mail armor scarce resisted!
He read it in her firm and compressed lip, he
noted it in the steadfast gaze of her earnest eye,
he heard it in every note of her clear,
composed
,
and unfaltering voicethat resolution,
fixed and sure as death. He knew by the
concentrated
energy and force with which she had
stricken him, that no weakness of her woman
arm would mar her purpose in the execution.
He was foiled, and he knew itfoiled and
defeated
by a girla savage!
Unable to persist in his base intent, unwilling
to retreat, he stood infirm of purpose,
speechless
,
and vacillating. At length he faltered
forth
Bravely played! bravely played, on my
soul! Guarica, it could not have been done
better had we been both in earnest, whichha!
ha! ha! it makes me laugh! ha! ha! it does,
by St. Jago! which I believe you really thought
I was. Come, confessconfess, noble
Guarica
,
didst thou not think that I was in
earnest
?
Didst thou think that I was? replied
Guarica, with a smile of contempt and loathing.
Well is it for thee that thou wearest a coat of
proof when thou playest these merry jests
else had my dagger and thy heart's blood been
acquainted. Yes! senor, she continued,
changing her tone of bitter scorn into an accent
of deliberate and firm assertion. Yes, senor,
I do believe, or rather I do know that you were
in earnest, and on this night, seven days hence,
we will see what Hernando de Leon will
believe
touching it. And now, senor, you
offered
me some advice awhile since, which I
will repay by offering some to you in turn.
Betake yourself to your horse as quickly as
you may; I hear my maidens' voices coming
hitherward, it may be there are men with
them.
To hell with your counsel, minion!
cried Herreiro, perceiving himself now
thoroughly
detected, and yielding to his furious
hate and disappointed malice. You think
yourself invincible, because this time you have
baffled mebut patience! patience! and the
time will come! and hark you, girl! on that
same day whereon Hernando learns what has
passed this night, on that same day he dies!
Ha! do I touch you? Tell him, fool, tell him,
and you seal his death-warrant!
Ha! ha! shrilly laughed Guarica, and
sneeringly. It is my time, nowmy time to
laugh! she cried. Nay, 'twould make dumb
things laugh to hear
you
threaten
you
, and
him!
Enraged beyond endurance by her taunts, he
had half drawn a pistol from his beltwould
he have had the baseness to aim it at a
woman's
life?when the quick tread of many
men was heard withoutthen! then, for the
first time, when aid was close at hand, and
terror causeless, Guarica's courage failed her
she uttered one long shriekthe revulsion of
her feelings was too much for her, she fell to
the ground fainting.
One bound carried Herreiro clear through
the open windowhis horse stood close at
handhe was upon his back, the spur in his
side, the bridle lifted, when the loud charib
war-cry pealed around him, and a long arrow,
shot in haste and aimlessly, whistled close by
his ear.
The good horse stretched into his gallop
another and another shaft just grazed him
harmless
he
was safesafe by a few short yards
alone, so furiously did the revengeful Charibs,
headed by Orozimbo, press the chase. And so
long and so stanchly did they keep it up, that
when he crossed the echoing drawbridge, and
stood in safety within the battlemented walls
of Isabella, the dark forms of the Indian
runners
were visible on the savannah, at a short
half mile's distance; and their loud yells and
whoops were heard fearfully distinct in the
quiet night.
CHAPTER V.
Day
after day passed onward, but no more
did Guarica hear or see of Don Guzman de
Herreiro; for not only did he not again
venture
to approach her forest home, but not once
did he quit the guarded precincts of the
fortress
.
And well was it for him he did not.
Perhaps, indeed, it was a secret instinct that
taught him to conceal himself within the
barrack
square, a consciousness that wrong, so
deadly as he had mediated to the forest
princess
,
could not be offered with impunity. Bold
as he was, and daring in the battle field,
perhaps
his heart failed him when he thought of
lurking foes concealed in every brake, waiting
with all the deadly patience of Indian revenge,
to wing the fatal arrow to his heartand well
was it for him.
For from the very hour in which Orozimbo
had tracked him to the fortress, saved only by
the fleetness of his charger, from that very
hour not ten steps could he have made beyond
the drawbridge, without encountering death
beyond a peradventure. Day and night,
fair and foul, the wakeful Charibs lay
concealed
around; never was there a moment
when one at least of Orozimbo's men was not
within easy arrow range of the castle gates.
One watching while another slept, one feeding
while another fasted, constantly, resolutely,
was the ward keptthe watch and ward of
vengeance.
Yet with such skilful subtilty, with such
deep craft was it all ordered, that though
Herreiro
might have met his spies on the look
out, he could have learned or suspected
nothing
.
The watcher now would be a solitary
fisherman
playing his scoop-net at the basin's
mouth; now a wild hunter offering his game
for sale to the officers; now a group of old
Indians
with palm and wine and fruits, and now
a knot of striplings playing or wrestling on the
green before the esplanade; but each and all
with bow and quiver at his back, eyeing
furtively
but keenly the form of every passer, each
and all ready and alert to avenge the insult
offered to their young princess.
Nor while the gates of Isabella were thus
formidably guarded and beset, was Guarica
again left unprotected or alone. Whenever
Orozimbo was abroad, and he was now abroad
more frequently than ever, for it appeared that
something new and strange was in the wind,
armed musters being held almost nightly of
Caonabo's vassals, whenever Orozimbo was
abroad, two or three stalwart Indians might be
seen at some point or other within sight and
earshot of the cottage, while others were on the
scout constantly among the woods, through
which a foe must pass to reach the dwelling
of Guarica.
That something was on foot among the
savages, as they were still termed by the
Spaniards, could not be doubted. The great
Lord of the Golden House had mustered all his
warriors; and many subjects of the four other
independent caciques of the Island, who, more
timid or less patriotic than the heroic Caonabo,
shrank from collision with the whites, were
gathered to the banners of the champion of his
people.
This was especially the case with the
tribemen
of the queen Anacaona. Invariably the
friend of the white men herself, she had
inculcated
the like pacific notions into the minds of
her kinsmen; so that Orozimbo and Guarica
had been scarce second to their aunt in good
will to the pale invaders.
The fiery blood of the young Indian had
been, however, so thoroughly aroused by the
atrocious outrage offered to his sister, that he
had joined heart and hand with his warlike
kinsman, who had determined on a
simultaneous
onslaught upon every Spanish post,
previous
to the return of the great Admiral. Not
a few of the best and boldest of his tribes were
united with him, but knowing well the
predilection
of his aunt and sister for the European
colonists, all had been carefully concealed from
them. While Orozimbo satisfied his conscience
as to the consequences of his conduct on his
sister's fate, by charging all his followers to
respect
the person of Hernando, and preserve him
at all hazards, and by obtaining a pledge of his
safety from the great cacique.
Such was the state of things when De Leon
returned from his mission, late in the afternoon
of the seventh day from his parting with
Guarica
.
The plans of Caonabo were all laid and
determined; but the day and hour on which the
attack should be made he still kept buried in
his own bosom, lest once known to his people,
treason, or drunkennessfor, since the coming
of the white men this curse likewise was
entailed
upon the Indianor careless indiscretion
might betray it to the foe. Even Orozimbo
knew no more than the meanest of his
tribes-men
;
night after night every inferior chief was
ordered to hold all his men in readiness, though
none knew for what; and night after night, up
to the evening of Hernando's coming, each had
received a mandate instructing him to disband
his people until the following moon-rise.
Scarce had Hernando disembarked from his
caravella, ere he hurried to the quarters of Don
Guzman, expecting to receive a solution of all
his doubts and surmises. But when he
reached
his door, he was, to his extreme
astonishment
,
refused admittance, on the pretence that
Herreiro had been very ill and confined to his
bed during the whole period of his, Hernando's
absence, and that the leech had forbidden
strictly that any person should have access to
him.
Frustrated thus, he inquired of the servant
whether the packet he had left on the morning
of his departure was deliveredto which
question
the man answered promptly, as it
afterwards
appeared truly, that it wasthat he gave
it to his master, on his return from hunting, the
same day on which he received it; although,
he added, that he knew not whether Don Guz
man had read it, having been taken ill
within an hour or two of his return, in
consequence
,
it was supposed, of a sun-stroke.
Having exhausted thus every source of
information
that was open to him, Hernando,
after making his report to the commandant,
and receiving his conge for the night, ordered
his horse to be prepared immediately, and rode
away into the forest, taking his bloodhounds
with him.
In the meantime the officers were revelling
in the mess-room, with cards, and dice, and
wine, and dark-haired Indian women; the
sentinels
were slumbering or drinking at their
posts; the cannon were unloaded; the walls
almost unguarded. Riot and luxury within,
and relaxed discipline; and without armed
foes, thirsty for blood and vengeance.
So stood affairs when Hernando galloped
from the gates, fearless and free of heart, and
full of bright and gay anticipation. The very
news he had received from Herreiro's servant
resassured himfor it had not occurred to him
to doubt its truth. So that, secure in his
imagination
that Guarica could have been troubled
by no fresh intrusion, he rode joyously along
the forest track, in all the confidence of happy
and successful love.
He was surprised a little, it is true, at
meeting
,
three times on his road, an armed Indian,
apparently on the scout; such a thing never
having previously happened in all the times
he had come and gone to and fro. But the
men, all of whom happened to be acquainted
with his person, spoke to him pleasantly, and
passed on their way; and Hernando, indeed,
almost forgot that he had seen them, until,
when he saw Guarica, and she related to him,
amid tears of gratitude and joy, all that had
happened, he perceived and appreciated the
object of the wise precaution.
Fierce and tremendous was his indignation,
as, without a touch of fear at the foul menace
of Herreiro, the fair girl related to him the
whole of that thrilling scene; but so much
more were his love and admiration kindled
towards
the heroic maiden, that his ire
smouldered
in his bosom as quietly as though he
had entertained no such feeling. So much so
that Guarica herself almost wondered that,
with so much cause for violent and quick
resentment
,
her lover's mood should be softer,
calmer, and more tranquil than its wont.
Little she knew that the current of fierce
wrath, when stillest, is ever deadliest and
deepest. Little she fancied that Hernando's
spirits were so gay and lightsome, his manner
soft and unconcerned, because he saw his
course of vengeance plain before himbecause
he knew that on the morrow his enemy must
pay his debt even unto the uttermost farthing.
After a little while, as is sometimes the case
with all of us, when our spirits are enkindled
and our sensibilities aroused far beyond their
wont, the atmosphere of the airy room in which
the lovers sat appeared to them confined and
oppressive, their souls seemed to want scope to
expandthey panted for the free air of the
wide, starry heavens, and forth they strolled,
arm-in-arm, through the quiet moonlight, across
the beautiful savannahacross the little brook,
dry-shod upon the snow-white stepping-stones
and thence along the forest's edge whence
first Hernando had beheld her.
That, since their loves had grown into
maturity
,
had been to them a hallowed place
aud on the streamlet's bank, just the spot
where he had forced his Andalusian steed to
leap it, De Leon's hands had built a rustic seat,
beneath the shelter of a huge palm tree, and
close to the verge of the unbroken forest.
Thither they bent their steps, led by some secret
mutual impulse, and there they sat down, side
by side, in happiness too deep to find vent in
many words.
It was Guarica who spoke first, and when
she did, it was of the subject that was ever
foremost in her mind, the villany and treason
of Don Guzman. But she struck no
responsive
string in Hernando's mind; and he spoke
wide of the mark, making some passing
observation
touching the beauty of the night.
But let us speak, she said, of this
Herreiro
:
think you that he will dare attempt his
menaced vengeance?
His vengeance, paltry knave! said
Hernando
,
scornfully. No! but let him dread
minefor it shall find him out before he dream
of it; nor shall his feigned distemper save him!
But let us think of him no further. He is not
worth one instant's care. The viper is but
perilous so long as we suspect him not; once
seen, he is so harmless, that it is scarce worth
the while to crush him, and, for the rest, it will
be but a little spacea little space, which we
must bear with patiencescarcely a week, I
trust, my own and best beloved, before the
good and great Columbus shall return; and
then, then, sweet one, there will be an end to
all your doubts, anxieties, and fears. He is the
best, the noblest, the most just of men. He is
my friend, too, and a tried one. He once
returned
,
I will avow at once to him my love for
my Guarica; his consent it is meet that we
should have before our union, and of it I am
certain! Thenthen, thou shalt be mine, for
ever mine, in the sight of men, as thou art now
in the sight of Heaven and all its angels!
My own Hernando! was her sole
answer
,
for her heart swelled as she spoke, and
her passion was too strong for words, and two
large diamond tears collected slowly on the
long, silky fringes of her eyelids, and hanging
there like dew-drops on the violet's petal, slid
slowly down her soft, transparent cheeks.
Tearstears, Guarica! cried the lover,
half reproachfully. Can it be, can it be, that
thou shalt doubt me?
me
, who have never
asked the slightest freedomnever essayed the
smallest and most innocent familiarity; me,
who would rather diedie, not on earth only,
but for all eternity, than call up one chaste
blush upon those maiden cheeksthan wake
one doubt in that pure heartthan print one
stain upon the whiteness of that virgin mind!
Can it be
No! no! exclaimed the girl, panting with
eagerness to interrupt him, for he had spoken,
hitherto, with such impetnous haste, that she
had vainly sought to answer him. No! no!
Sooner would I doubt Heaven than thee.
Hernando
.
They were tears, not of sorrow, not
of doubt, but of pure, heart-felt joy! I know
thou art the very soul of honorI know thou
wouldst ask nothing of thy Guarica that it
would not be her pride, her joy, her duty, to
bestow. It was but joy, dear, dear Hernando,
to think that we would so soon be united
beyond
the power of man to part us.
Even as she spoke, while her cheek almost
touched the face of her young lover,for, in
the intense excitement of the moment, she had
leaned forward, clasping Hernando's hand in
both her own, and watering it with her tears,
a sharp, keen twang, mixed with a clash, as
if of steel, was heard behind them; a long,
dark streak seemed to glare through the
narrow
space between their heads, with a low,
whizzing sound, and on the instant a bolt, or
arrow, stood quivering in the stem of a
palm-tree
opposite.
To spring upon his feet, to whirl his long,
two-edged Toledo from the scabbard, to dart,
with a loud shout, into the thicket, calling
upon his trusty hounds, which, quite
unconscious
of any peril, were slumbering at
Guarica's
feet, to whom they had become familiar
guardians, was but an instant's work to the
young and fiery Hidalgo. For at least ten
minutes' space, he was absent from the Indian
maiden; who, trembling with apprehension for
the safety of him whom she had learned to
love far more than life itself, with every tinge
of color banished by mortal terror from her
features, awaited his return. With every
sense on the alert, eye, ear, and spirit on the
watch, she stood in terrible excitement. She
heard him crashing through the tangled brake;
she heard his loud voice cheering the eager
blood-hounds to track out the footsteps of his
hidden foeman; but no bay of the sagacious
animals, no clash of steel or answering
defiance
,
fell on her anxious ear. His search was
vainhis anxious labor fruitlessno fraying
of the interlaced and thorny branches showed
where the dastardly assassin had forced a
passage
for his retreating footstepsno print in
the clayey soil revealed where he had trodden;
and, stranger yet, the keen scent of the
sagacious
dogs detected not the slightest taint upon
the earth, or on the dewy herbage, although they
quested to and fro, three hundred yards, at
least, in circuit, around the tree wherein the
well-aimed arrow stoodsure evidence of the
murderer's intent. He returned, baulked and
disappointed, to Guarica; big drops of icy
perspiration
standing, like bubbles, on his high,
clear forehead, and his whole frame trembling
with the agitaton of strong excitement.
By Him who made me, he exclaimed, as
he returned to her, this is most marvellous!
there is not, nor hath been, within two hundred
yards of us, a human being since we have sat
hereif I may trust the sight of mine own
eyes, or, what is truer far, the scent of my
good hounds! Yet here, he added, as he tore
from the stem of the tall palm tree the short,
massive bolt, with its four-cornered barbed
steel head, here is the evidence that one
and that, too, a Spaniardhath been, or now
is, close beside us. Come, dearest, come, let
us leave this perilous spot. By Heaven! but
it is wondrous strange!
In silencefor the girl was too full of
terror
,
the cavalier, of dark and anxious thought,
to enter into conversehe led her homeward.
Across the bright savannah, gleaming in the
moonlight, they reached, ere long, the portico
of her loved home, and there, after a tender
parting, Hernando vaulted into the saddle of
his fiery Andalusian, whistled his faithful
blood-hounds to his heel, and dashed away, at
a furious gallop, towards the fortress of his
unfriendly countrymen. Eager, still, to
discover
,
if so it might be, something of him who
had so ruthlessly aimed the murderer's shaft
that night, Hernando rode directly to the spot
where he had sat with Guarica when the fell
missile was discharged: he saw the grass
betraying
,
by its bruised and prostrate blades, the
very spot by which they had been sitting; but
all was still and lonely. Onward he went
across the very ground which he had searched
so carefully scarce half an hour before, and,
ere he had traversed fifty paces, both
bloodhounds
challenged fiercely. Calling them
instantly
to heel, the cavalier alighted, bound his
hot war-house to a tree, and eagerly scanned
the soil. At the first glance, deep printed in
the yielding mould, he found the clear print of
a Spanish buskin, furnished with a long,
knightly spur. To follow the trace backward
was his first impulse; and scarce three minutes
were consumed, before he tracked it to a tall
and shadowy oak, the bark of which, scarred
and defaced, showed that some person had,
not long before, both climbed it and descended.
Ha! he exclaimed, striking his breast
with his clinched hand, ha! idiot that I was,
who thought not of this! It matters not,
however
;
by God! it matters not; for right soon
will I have him! Forward, good hounds,
he added, forward, hark, halloa, ho! hark,
forward! And the vexed woodlands rang to
the deep-mouthed dogs, and the hard gallop of
the hunter. They reached the open ground, a
league of forest having been already passed,
and the hounds, for a moment, were at fault.
Springing again to the earth, Hernando easily
discovered, by the prints in the soil, that here
the fugitive had taken horsehaving, it would
seem, left his charger under the keeping of a
menial, while prosecuting his foul enterprise;
for henceforth
two
broad horse-tracks might be
seen running distinctly over the bare savannah
homeward. Laying the hounds upon the
horse-track, the cavalier again re-mounted, and
the fresh dew aiding the scent, away they
drove, at a pace almost unexampled, through
brake and bush, over the open plain, athwart
the murky coverthill and hollow vanished
beneath their fiery speed, rock and tree glanced
by and disappeared, so furious was their pace;
the deepest torrent turned him not, nor the
most perilous leap deterred himfor the most
fiery, the most constant, the most pervading of
all human passionsdeadly revenge, was
burning
his heart's core, turning the healthful
currents
of his blood to streams of fiery lava.
The deadest hour of night had long been
passed already, when he dashed forth upon
that desperate race; the pale cold light of
morning
was streaning, broad but still, over the
ramparts of the Spanish fortress, when Don
Hernando de Leon pulled up his foaming steed
before the drawbridge. Early, however, and
untimely as was the hour, men were abroad
already. A mounted servitor, in livery of
Isabel and silver, riding a coal-black jennet,
and leading by the bridle-rein a tall bay charger,
trapped and housed richly with the same colors,
was retiring from the gates, which were just
closing, toward the barrack stables. Towards
this steed, jaded and spent with toil, and all
embossed with sweat and foam-flakes, and
galled and bleeding at the flanks from cruel and
incessant spurring, the savage blood-hounds,
still in full cry, dashed without check or stint,
and would have pulled the bay horse down had
not the stern voice of their master checked
them. He rode up to the groom, and in a deep
voice, calm, slow, and perfectly unmoved,
demanded
,
Whose charger?
Without reply the servitor was hastening
away, when he asked once again, in fiercer
tones, drawing his dagger as he spoke
Whose charger, dog? Speak, or thou
diest! Whose charger? and who hath now
dismounted from him? Not that I need thy
voice to tell me what I already know, but that
I choose to hear my knowledge confirmed by
human words. Whose charger?
Don Guzman de Herreiro's, replied the
faltering
menial; he hath even now gone in
the bridge is not yet lifted.
Excellent well! replied the cavalier,
excellent
well! Mine ancient comrade;
excellent
well! My fellow soldier, whose life I
have thrice savedonce from the Moors, amid
the mountain glens of Malaga, once from the
surf, among the dread Antilles, and once here
in this isle of Hispaniola, from the envenomed
arrow of the Charib. Excellent well, Don
Guzman!
In the meantime dismounting at the gates, he
gave his charger and his hounds to the care of
a favourite domestic who awaited him; and,
with a firm, slow step, crossing the
drawbridge
,
stopped for a moment to address the
sentinel.
So, he said, old Gaspar, thou keepest
good watch. When went Don Guzman
forth?
After we set the watch yestreen, fair sir,
replied the old Castilian, presenting, as he
spoke, his partisan. Now I bethink me, it
was scarce five minutes after
thou
didst ride
forth into the forest!
And he hath now returned?
But now.
No further words were interchanged; the
young knight slowly passed across the
courtyard
,
entered the vaulted passage which led
towards the chambers of Don Guzman, paused
at the door, and without one word struck on
the panel one strong blow. A stern voice
from within cried enter! And he did enter,
and closed the door behind him, and locked and
double locked it; and though strange sounds
were heard, and fearful voices, about half an
hour passed ere be came forth; and when he
did so, his face, though very stern and calm,
was pale as death; and he retired to his own
quarters without a word to any one.
CHAPTER VI.
It
was not until a late hour on the night
following
that of Hernando's departure from the
presence of Guarica, who was now far more
seriously alarmed at what she never doubted
to be an attempt, on Herreiro's part, to execute
his deadly menace, than she had been at his
outrage towards herself, that Orozimbo returned
from Caonabo's council, heated, and out of
breath, as if he had run hard; and somewhat
fatigued, but with an air of high enthusiasm
and excitement, such as before she had never
seen in her brother's features. So much,
however
,
was she engrossed with the thoughts of
what had, the previous night, befallen her
proving as it did, beyond a doubt, the implacable
and fiendish malice of Don Guzman, and filling
her with the wildest apprehensions for her
beloved
Hernando's safetythat she paid fair less
attention to the manner or appearance of her
brother, than under any other circumstances she
would have done. Eagerly, and with a
vehement
rapidity of speech, singularly at
variance
with the calm and almost inanimate
tranquillity
of her usual demeanor, she related to
Orozimbo, without remarking the absent and
distracted expression with which he listened to
her, the wondrous attempt on her life and that
of De Leon.
If she was not surprised, however, at the
vacancy of his look, as she began her
narrative
,
she was indeed astonished, although
she well knew the excitability of his nature,
at the tremendous burst of passion with
which he replied to her last words.
I thank the Great Spirit, he cried,
springing
to his feet, and shaking his hand furious
ly aloft, I thank the Great Spirit that it is
so! This, this alone was needful to banish
the last throb of compunection, to extinguish
the last spark of mercy or of friendship in
my soul. Ha! ha! It is well, very well!
He would have slain thee? Ha! let him
look to himself, now, dog and villain. Now
am I all the Charib; now am I all my
country's
!
Give me my arms, give me my arms,
Guarica, I am but wasting time, when time
is most precious. Give me my helm of tiger
skingive me the golden buckler, the strong
war-club of my father; never yet was it
brandished in more just or holy cause; give
me
Hold! Orozimbo, exclaimed the lovely
girl, now terrified by his continued
vehemence
,
what mean you, brother? For
what should I give you arms? Are you
mad, that you dreamyou, you alone, of
seeking out this Spaniard in his guarded
fortress. Why, boy, the very sentinels
would spurn you from their gates!
Will they? ha! will they? Will the
two paltry sentinels who stand beside their
empty cannon, spurn back unconquered
Caonabo? Let them look, I say, let them
now look to themselves, these ravishing
and murderous Spaniards. By the great
gods! they shall learn, and that ere
to-morrow's
dawn, that it is one thing to strain
in the hug of an Indian warrior, panting for
vengeance and arthirst for blood, and another
to dally in the soft arms of an Indian
maiden!
Brother, what mean you? Brother,
brother, what fearful words are these
what frantic meaning do they bear!
Ask me not, ask me not, Guarica; these
are no times for foolish thoughts or girlish
councils. Give me my arms, I say; let me
begone; give me my arms!
And with the words, he seized
Hernando's
bugle from the wall, and, springing to
the window, blew a long thrilling blast,
which was answered on the instant by the
dull roar of a dozen conch-shells, sounding
the Indian war-note everywhere through the
mighty forest.
There is your answer, Guaricathe
souls of a thousand warriors, the bravest
of the brave, are alive, are burning in those
war-notes. Give me my arms. I say
before
to-morrow's day-break, there shall be
no more Isabella; by the gods! no more
Spaniards!
But as he spoke she threw herself at his
feet, clung to his knees, watered his feet with
her tears; she called on him by every
tenderest
pledge, invoked him by every dearest
name, reminded him of every fondest
memory
,
implored him by the soul of her
gallant
father, by the love of their dead mother
implored him for her sakefor her sake,
whom that dying mother had confided to his
chargeif he would not see her die
broken-hearted
at his knees, to forego, to forget his
fearful purpose, to desert the disastrous
combination
.
It was long, very long, ere she succeeded
in the least in bending him; he was
intractable
,
fierce, resolute. The last worst
outrage
had maddened him. It was long ere
he would listen in the least to the voice of
nature, much less to the words of reason.
But at last nature did prevail, and old
affection
;
his heart melted, and he raised her
from the ground and kissed her, and mixed
his tears with hers. But even when this
step was gained, she had yet much to do,
ere she could win him to her wishes. Pride
now forbade him to desert the expedition in
which he had enlisted with such zealous
ardorto forsake the comrades to whom
his faith was pledged, to prove disloyal to
the monarch to whom he insisted that he
owed allegiance. But Guarica's mind,
although
a woman's, and a young lovely
woman's too, was of the firmer and the
sterner stuff, and in the end it conquered.
Reason and wisdom were on her side, and
for once reason and wisdom carried the day,
over passion and brute violence.
She showed him, in clear colors, the
hopelessness
,
the madness of the expedition; she
proved to him, beyond the power of paradox
to resist, that even if in the first their efforts
should be crowned with success, the end
would but be the more disastrous to the rash
patriots, and to their country.
Even, she said, even if you should
carry Isabellaif you should, as you tell me
you have sworn to do, burn it with fire, and
raze it to the very earth, till not one stone
remain upon anothereven if you should
drown the smoking embers of the last
Spanish
dwelling with the life-blood of the last
Spanish soldier, what will all this avail you?
Is not the great, the God-like, the invincible
and irresistible Columbus, even now flying
hitherward on the wings of the very wind to
which you propose to fling your banners of
defiance? Does he not bring with him a
fleet, a whole fleet, freighted with steel-clad
men, invulnerable, and with no mimic
thunderbolts
?
And will not he avenge
merciful
as he is, and good, and graciouswill
not he exact awful retribution for the
destruction
of his comrades? And who dare
hope to succeed, to strive even, against the
unconquered, the unconquerable admiral?
Spare them, my brother, spareI will not
say your sister, but your king, your
countrymen
,
your country!
But how? replied Orozimbo, mightily
moved both by her arguments and her pas
sion, how shall I dare be a desertera
traitor to my tribea recreant to my honor?
How, if I do so, shall I ever dare again to
show my face before my tribemen?to take
my seat in the council of the chiefs? No!
sister, no! it is too latetoo late! and if
you be i' the right, as now I believe you are,
to-morrow will be a day fatal both to us and
to our invaders. I wouldI would, indeed,
that I had told you of our plans heretofore,
while there was yet the time to listen to your
argumentsbut it is now too late, and I must
on.
It is never too late to repent, brother,
answered the eager and excited girlnever
too late to exchange evil for good counsel,
madness for wisdom, crime for virtue. And
it is evil counsel, it is madnessyes!
Orozimbo
,
it is crime; knowingly to rush
headlong
on destruction; nor to destroy yourself
alone, but to involve hundreds in one
common
,
hopeless, unnecessary ruin. Listen to
me, and believe me, brother. You may think
you
do
think, doubtless, that I am but a
love-sick girl, pleading the cause of selfish
passion, terrified for her lover's safety, and
willing to give up all beside, friends,
kinsmen
,
country, so that my senseless love for
this stranger of a hostile race may be
gratified
.
No! by my Christian faith, no! by
the Christian's God, whom he has taught me
to adore! it is not so. Were there a
reasonable
hope that permanent success could follow
your bold exploitwere there one chance in
the thousand that our country could be once
more freethat the invader's foot-prints
could be erased for ever from our virgin
shoresthat no white face should ever more
be seen in our happy fieldsthen, Orozimbo,
then would I cry forward! forward! although
your first step should be planted on my
breaking
heart, and the next on my Hernando's
prostrate head! Then would my voice be
the first and the loudest to cheer you to the
fray, as it is now the only one to warn you.
And why not,asked her brother,
gloomily, as he sat with his head buried
between his handsWhy is it not so
now?
You know why not, she answered,
firmly. You know that, were every white
man swept, to-night, from the face of our
fair island, thousands and tens of thousands
would spring up in their places. When was
the Spaniard's footstep ever checked by the
fear of peril?when was his lust of gold
every repressed by thoughts of the risk
incurred
in snatching? Their race is as
numerous
as the green leaves of the forest, or as
the sands on the sea-shorein fierceness
they are the tiger's equals, in wisdom they
are almost gods! Look at the beasts which
they have trained to fight their battles: the
glorious war-horse, with his eye kindling to
the trumpet; the dreadful blood-hound, more
wily and more savage than the jaguar; look
at their bright, impenetrable armor, from
which your strongest shafts rebound, as from
the earthfast rock; look at their
cannon-shot
,
more perilous to man than beaven's own
thunders. And then thinkthink if a few,
a mere handful of adventurersfor such
they were who first landed on our shores
if they have subjugated half, aye! four-fifths
of our nation, and that for the mere love of
gold and of dominion, think what their
nation
would effect in its majesty and might,
roused to revenge the blood of its slaughtered
sonsroused to uphold and vindicate the
honor of its name! No! brother, no! when
the first little band stepped forth from their
winged canoes upon our hospitable shores,
had our people then broken down upon them
with the spear and mace, the death-drum and
the battle-cryhad they all perished to a
man, and none returned across the wide,
wide sea, to tell their comrades' fatethen
might we have been saved from the white
man's dominion. But the very day that
saw the first caravella spread its wings to
the homeward breeze, that day, I tell you,
riveted on our necks a yoke that must
endure
for ever. I tell you their mariners, their
very dumb and senseless galleys, know the
path to and fro the trackless deep, as surely
as you know the wood-tracks of our native
island. For every Spanish breath you quench,
a hundred, and a hundred times a hundred,
will be quenched, and for ever, of our own;
for every drop of Spanish blood you shed,
rivers shall flow of ours. The white man
has an eye that descries everything, though
seas may roll between; an arm that strikes
a thousand leagues aloof; a hand that, when
it once hath closed upon its prey, never
fore-goes
its hold! I have spoken!but I look
not that you will believe me! Go! pour
your naked hundreds against the mail clad
cavaliers; go! dash your bare breasts on
their walls of granite; go! and expose your
mortal flesh to the blasting breath of their
cannon: and then, when all is lost, when,
hunted to the last verge of the precipice,
bayed by their unrelenting hounds, cut down
by their resistless steel,no longer even to
be saved as the remnant of a peopleye
call upon the earth to yawn and swallow ye,
upon the rocks to fall and cover yeand
earth and rocks are pitiless as your avenging
foementhen, I say, then remember the
words of her whom you murderedof your
sister, your only and fond sister, who told
you all these things, how they should be,
and you heard not her warning, but laughed
her words to scorn, and murdered herthe
last of your unhappy race!
Murdered you! he exclaimed, starting
to his feetmurdered you, Guarica! and
his dark features were convulsed, and his
limbs trembled with the violence of his
contending
passions.
Ay, Orozimbo! murdered; for think you
that I could, even if I would, survive him
and that, too, knowing him slaughtered by a
brother!
But I have charged my warriors, he
exclaimed
,
vehementlybut I have drawn an
oath from Caonabo, to spare him in the
strife, and, the war ended, to treat him as a
friend and kinsman.
And how long would your charge be
heeded?until the first frenzy of the strife
had turned their blood to liquid fire. And
how long would Caonabo's oath be kept, after
its end was answered? Tush! brother,
tush! If you can so deceive yourself, so
can you not deceive me; moreover, think you
Hernando de Leon is the man to be spared
to spare himself in such a conflict? Think
you Hernando de Leon is the man to survive
the extermination of his comrades, and to
clasp in his own the reeking hands of their
butchers! If he were so, he might seek
some European girl to share his life, and his
infamyan Indian maid would scorn him.
No! Orozimbo, follow out your plans, and
mark what I tell you: when the last blow is
stricken, when the last heroes die around the
flag-staff of their country's honor, there will
be found my slaughtered love, and there will
I die on his body. Go! boy; we meet on
earth no more. Go, brother, to
your
duty; I
have mine, likewise?
She ended; but long before she ended, her
soul-fraught eloquence, the fire and pathos
that were blended in her words, and above
all, the truth of what she said, had won back
the ascendency which she had ever had over
her brother's spiritthe ascendency of moral
strength over physical powerof mind over
matter. It was now his turn to cast
himself
at his sister's feet, but, ere he could
do so, she had caught him in her arms,
and clasped him to her heart, and covered
him with the chaste kisses of a sister's holy
love.
Guarica! he said, dear, dear Guarica,
you have prevailed. Do with me as you
will; I am your slavethe creature of your
bidding. Only think for me, and say how I
shall save my honor!
Go to your uncle! she cried
impetuously
.
Go straight to the wise and noble
Caonabo, and say to him as I have said to
thee
It would avail me nothing; he would
either strike me to the earth, or drive me in
scorn from his presence: he will endure no
opposition to his will, and hear no reason.
As well may you hope to turn the sun from
his course, as Caonabo from his project.
Then mark me, brother. This plot of
the great cacique depends, you tell me, on
his finding the fortress unprepared, and the
guards negligent and off their duty?
Aye! he replied, but what of that?
Ask me no further. Only observe what
I say: all shall go well yet. At what time
is your onslaught appointed to begin?
Soon after day-break
Then go: join your leaderstake your
arms; lead your followers hence; but be sure
that you lead all of them: leave not a soul
behind you to play the spy on me. Where
do your warriors muster?
By the spring, which they call the `
hunter's
rest,' in the woodlands, within a mile of
Isabella.
I knowI know, replied Guarica;
then go, brother, go: be of good cheer; all
shall go well yet. Ask me no questions;
but he sure that you send scouts to mark if
the Spaniards be so unprepared as you
imagine
,
ere you proceed to the attack.
So it is ordered, sister. But you mean
not
Ask me no questions, she replied,
smiling; for I shall answer none.
Whate'er
I do, that will I do honestly and wisely,
and it were better for all causes that you
should know naught else. Kiss me, dear
brother, and farewell; it is long, long past
midnight. Farewell, go to your duty, and
remember
Never will I forget, Guaricanever will
I forget what you have said to me this night.
By all the gods! I swear to do, henceforth,
whatever you command me.
And with the words, he seized the arms
which she gave him hastily, clasped her once
more in his arms, and, calling to his Indian
followers, who were collected under arms
already, at a short distance from the building,
to follow him at their speed, he set of at a
long, swinging run, over the open meadow,
and through the deep woodland, towards the
forest rendezvous.
Scarcely was her brother out of sight,
before
the girl, who had eagerly watched his
departure, and satisfied herself that none of
his myrmidons remained behind, applied
herself
hastily to collect some articles of clothing
more suitable, as it appeared, than those she
wore, for a long and toilsome walk through
the forest. She bound a pair of stronger
sandals on her feet; she girded up her dress
succinctly, in a form not unlike that of the
graceful Doric chiton, as represented in the
statues of Diana. She took in her hand a
long, light, reed javelin, with a flint head:
it may have been as a staff to support her
footsteps; it might have been as a weapon
of defence; and with no further preparation,
alone and unprotected, save by her own high
resolutionby that innate and noble daring
which springs from the consciousness of
chastity, and innocence, and truththat
glorious confidence of incorrupt virginity,
concerning which
It is said that a lion will turn and flee
From a maid, in the pride of her purity.
Fearless and firm in her high self-reliance, in
her yet higher trust in God, forth she went
into the wild and midnight forest, upon her
errand of goodwill and mercy. The sky
was dim and clouded; not a star twinkled
through the murky gloom: not a moonbeam
checkered the dark shadows of the heavy
trees: yet on she went, unshrinking and
undaunted, although the howl of the wolf
and the prowling foot of the panther came
constantly to her ear; though the snake
coiled itself in her path, and the tangled
briers opposed her passage, still, all night
long, she travelled steadily onward, in the
intent to warn the garrison of Isabella of
the approaching peril, that they might be on
their guard in time, and that the attack might
be spared.
Full of her noble purpose, inspired by
high benevolence and immortal love with
strength beyond her powers, she struggled
insensible to fatigue, and superior to weak
terrorsbut all would have been in vain, for
the day was beginning to show the first pale
tokens of its coming in the far east, while
she was yet many miles aloof from the
Spanish fortress, and cold apprehension near
akin to despair, was usurping rapidly the
place of high hope and confidence, when
suddenly, as she turned an angle of the
blind deer-path she was treading, her eye
was attracted and astonished by a clear light,
burning purely in the deepest part of the
forest.
Holding her very breath for fear its
slightest
aspiration might betray her, and treading
stealthily upon the fallen leaves, she stole
towards it, and, ere she had gone many steps,
a strange sight met her eyes.
In a small sheltered glade of the forest,
stretched on the ground, with their watch
cloaks round them, in deep slumber, their
long lances planted erect by every sleeper's
head, and their bright burnished helmets at
their sides, lay ten Spanish cavaliers; their
tall chargers with their steel-plated
demipiques
,
champons upon their frontlets, and
iron poitrels on their breasts, stood round
them, linked by their chain bridles, each
horse hard by his lord.
But at a little distance from the rest one
man kept watchbut kept watch rather as
6
a cowled monk than as a dauntless warrior
for he knelt on both his knees, with his
hands clasped in earnest supplication before
an exquisitely painted picture of the virgin,
which he had hung, by a little chain attached
to it, from the hilt of his dagger driven deep
into the stem of a gigantic palm tree. It
was before this picture that burned, in a
small lamp of richly embossed silver, fed
with some odoriferous oil, the strange clear
light which she had seen through the dim
aisles of the forest. It was a wild and
singular
scene, and worthy of the pencil of
Salvator. The sweet white silvery light
streaming upwards, and playing over the
heavenly features of the Madonna, which
seemed to smile in the focus of its
consecrated
radiance, thence flashing on the dark
enthusiastic features of the kneeling
warrior
,
dancing upon his waving plume and
polished armor, and thence flickering less
distinctly over the figures of his sleeping
comrades, and over the large limbs of the
barbed chargers, which looked even larger
and more formidable when half seen in the
dim and hazy lustre of the distance.
The warrior who was kneeling at his
orisons in that wild place, and at that
untimely
hour, was a man not above the
middle
height, perhaps rather under it, but very
powerfully built, with broad shoulders and
thin flanks, and a chest singularly prominent
and deep; his arms were long and muscular,
and his legs, although slightly bowed
outward
,
perhaps from constant exercise on
horseback, were unusually strong and
sinewy.
From head to heel he was sheathed in a
full panoply of Spanish steel, richly wrought
with gold arabesques and bosses; his casque
with its tall crimson plume, which indeed
he rarely laid aside, was on his head,
although
the avantaille was raised, displaying
his bold manly features. Gilt spurs of
knighthood was buckled on his heels over
his greaves and shoes of burnished steel,
and from a scarf of rich crimson silk hung
his long two-edged broadsword.
Such was Alonzo de Ojeda, the wildest
and most daring spirit, the most fiery
warrior
,
the most perfect knight of the bold
band which had left the gay courts of their
native land for the fierce forays and the wild
adventures of the new western world.
Fervently as he was praying to the
especial
object of his chivalric and
imaginative
worship, his ear, accustomed to every
sound, however slight or distant, of the
forest
,
caught instantly the light tread of the
Indian maiden, and recognised it as instantly
for a human footstep.
He started to his feet, and cried aloud
Ho! who goes there?
And ere the last words had left his lips,
all his brave partisans were afoot, and on
the alert around him.
If you be friendly, he continued,
draw near fearlessly; if foes, be on your
guard! and then turning towards his
nearest
comrade, It was a woman's tread I
heard, if I mistake not
He had said but thus far, when Guarica
stepped forth modestly but firmly into the
circle of light which the lamp cast for a
little space around the armed group, saying
It is, Sir Knight, indeed a womanbut
as she is so fortunate as to recognise
Alonzo
de Ojeda, she knows full well that she
is as safe in his presence in the wild forest,
alone, and unprotected, as she would be
surrounded by a hundred of her tribes-men!
Lady, replied Alonzo, for
lady
you
must needs be, to understand so truly the
spirit and devotion of a true cavalier, you
do me, I am proud to say, no more than
justice. But what are your commands at
this dead hour? or wherefore have you
sought me thus strangely, and how have you
found me?
I sought you not, Don Alonzo,
answered
the Charib maiden; I sought you not,
but right fortunate is it that without seeking
I have found you, for life and death is on
my haste, and the distance, which I cannot
accomplish even in hours, your coursers will
make good in minutes.
Your words are full of emphasis,
answered
Ojeda, gravely, and you speak as
one used to authority, and accustomed to
command. May I know with whom I am
conversing?
My name will avail you little, senor.
It is, I think, unknown to youI am called
Guarica; but if my name be strange, my
lineage is well known to youI am the
niece and adopted daughter of queen
Anacaona
.
Of the good queenthe friend of the
Admiral? Say then, dear lady, what is your
errand? If done it may be at all, trust me it
shall be done right speedily.
It must be so doneif it be done at all.
But it must be said in your private ear. It
is too secret, too full of dread import, to be
spoken even before your chosen comrades.
And with the words she motioned him to
move a little way apart, and he followed her
with an air of deep respect, which,
however
different from the mode of treatment
most of his countrymen would have
vouchsafed
to an Indian girl, was perfectly in
keeping with the grand though perhaps
exaggerated character of his knight errantry.
Although, therefore, he moved out of
earshot
of his brother partisans, he did not
suffer her to go so far from them that any
motion on the part of either should be
unseen
by all; for with a delicate
compunction
,
most honorable to his feelings, he was
resolved that her reputation should in no
wise suffer by her noble confidence in his
integrity.
The other Spaniards, who awaited in
great wonder and some surprise the issue
of this strange conference, soon saw by the
extreme surprise which every gesture of
Alonzo indicated, that the girl's news must
be indeed important. They could perceive
that he asked two or three questions, which
were answered readily, and it seemed
satisfactorily
,
for after a minute or two, Alonzo
raised her hand to his lips, and kissed it
respectfully
saying,
Thanksthanks! eternal thanks!
This never shall be forgottennever! and
be not alarmed, there is ample time!
Then turning to his men, he cried in quick,
commanding tones
To horse! to horse, hastily!
But even in the hurry and confusion which
succeeded, confusion tending unto order,
they could see that Guarica again spoke to
him even more urgently than before, and
they heard him answer,
I promise youI promise you, upon the
honor of a cavalierupon
my
honor, it shall
be as you wish. Unless they return again,
there shall be no bloodshed.
And again kissing her hand, he hastily put
up his picture of the virgin and his hallowed
lamp in his knapsack, where at all times
and in all expeditions he ever carried them,
mounted his war-horse, thundered his orders
in a voice meant by nature for command, and
spurring his horse to the gallop, rode
furiously
,
straight as the bird flies through the
forest, to the gates of Isabella.
Don Guzman de Herreiro had just ridden
out of sight, as Alonzo reached the
drawbridge
,
which he found actually lowered,
with but some three or four half drunken
soldiers lounging about the gate-house. But
ere he had been within the walls ten minutes,
the drums beat to arms, the great alarm bell
tolled, the gates were barricaded, and the
bridges raised; cannon were loaded, and
extra
ammunition served to the cannoneers.
The Spanish flag was hoisted, and the whole
garrison was mustered in full war array upon
the guarded ramparts.
These preparations had been made about
an hour, when two or three Indians were
seen lurking about the edge of the nearest
woodland, and their appearance being hailed
by a flourish of trumpets, and a show of
soldiers manuvering upon the esplanade
above the gates, they instantly retired, and
nothing was heard or seen that day from the
walls of Isabella to justify the suddenness
of Alonzo de Ojeda's arrival, and the alarm
he had occasioned.
CHAPTER VII.
The
whole of the day on which Hernando
de Leon returned from his nocturnal chase,
passed gloomily; no eye of sentinel or
warder beheld Don Guzman de Herreiro, nor
was he at the hall wherein his comrades
feasted. Hernando, on the contrary, far
from his wonted temper, was there the
gayest
of the gay; his repartee the keenest yet
most polished; his laugh the merriest; his
song the most entrancing. Men who had
known him for long yearswho had fought
by his side in the wild forays with the
Saracens
of bright Grenada, and in the scarce
less desperate encounters of the tameless
Charibmen who had borne all perils of the
sea, the wilderness, and worse than all, the
lazar-house, with him; men who had feasted
at the jovial board, and drained the wassail
cup for years with him,
now
marvelled; they
felt as though there were something in his
manner which they had never known
before
;
a melancholy in the merriment, yet
mingled with a recklessness which baffled
their sagacity; a deep romantic sentiment,
an all-pervading tone of profound thought
in his lightest converse, blent with an air of
strange abstractiona breaking off from
graver subjects, and plunging into bursts of
wild and furious mirth; and then again a
softening of the mirth into the sweetest and
the saddest touches of imagination that poet
ever dreamed, or minstrel sang. Thus passed
the evening meal; and when the comrades
parted, the souls of many who had felt
estranged, they scarce knew why, from the
young cavalier, yearned to partake again his
high and generous friendship, grasped his
hand more warmly than they had done for
months, although their present mood of
kindliness was in no less degree unmeaning,
than had been their suspicion and distrust
Gaily they parted, with many merry
comments
on the unwonted absence of Don
Guzman, and many a jocular conjecture as
to the cause of his feigned illness; for when
the trumpets had rung forth their gladsome
peals of invitation to the festive board, the
seneschal had borne to the presiding officer
his courteous greetings, and regrets that he
was ill at ease, and might not, for that day,
participate in their accustomed revelries.
They partedand night fell dim and silent
over the Spanish fortress. Throughout that
long and weary night the lamp was still
replenished
in the lone chamber of Don
Gazman
;
and still from hour to hour the solitary
inmate paced to and fro the floor, his long
spurs clanking with a dull and heavy sound
on the rude pavement; and now pausing to
mutter, with clenched hands and writhing
lip, fierce imprecations on his own headon
the head of his detested comrade, and on the
weak hand which had failed to execute his
deadly purpose; now hurrying onward with
unequal but swift strides, as though he
would have fled the torture of his own
guilty thoughts. Thus did he pass that
night, in agony more bitter than the direst
tortures that ever tyrant wreaked on mortal
body; and when the first grey light of
dawning
morn fell cold and chill through the
uncurtained
casements of his barrack-room, it
found him haggard and feverish, yet pale
withal, shivering as though he were an
ague-stricken sufferer. The morning gun
pealed sharp and sudden from the ramparts,
and far and long its echoes were repeated
from the dark forests which girt in, on every
side, with their interminable walls of
deathless
verdure, the battlements of Isabella.
At the sound Guzman started, as does the
miserable guilty wretch who hears the
sullen
bell toll the dread signal for his
execution
!
Manning himself, however, with a
start, while the blood rushed, as though
indignant
at his former weakness, to lip and
cheek and brow, he instantly resumed his
agitated walk, nor did he break it off, nor
give the smallest symptom of perception,
when a quick, hurried blow was struck upon
the panel of the door; a second and a third
time was that low tap repeated, but still Don
Guzman heard it not, or if he did hear,
heeded not; then the door slowly opened,
and a grey-headed veteran, clothed in the
liveries of that noble house to which,
perchance
,
his master was the first scion who
had brought no lustre, thrust in his
time-blanched
locks and war-worn visage.
Your charger waits, senor, he
whispered
;
the hour has long gone by.
Hurry, then, hurry, shouted Herreiro,
fiercely, and belting on his long Toledo, and
casting his broad-leafed sombrero on his
disordered
locks, he rushed out with wild haste,
no less to the dismay than the astonishment
of his stanch servitor, whom he had
summoned
,
almost savagely, to follow him.
Far otherwise had passed the hours of
darkness to Hernando de Leon. The
banquet
ended, he had withdrawn to his
chamber
,
as though he had no further object than
to lie down upon a peaceful bed, that he
might thence arise with the succeeding morn
to go about his wonted avocations. He had
sat down before his little escrutoire, and,
having finished several letters, sealed and
directed themcast off his vest and doublet,
and drawn from his feet his falling leathern
buskinsthen throwing himself upon his
knees beside his pallet-bed, buried his head
between his hands, and for some time prayed,
as it would seem, in deep though silent
fervor. Rising at length erect, he spread his
arms abroad, and in a clear high voice,
unconscious
,
evidently, that he spoke aloud,
and above all, bear witness Thou, he
cried, bear witness Thou who knowest and
seest all things, that not in any mortal wrath
not in the mood of blind and senseless
anger, nor in that selfish strain of vengeance
which thinks of private injury, do I go forth
unto this strife, but as unto a high and
solemn duty! Not as mine own avenger
for to Thee, and to Thee only, doth belong
the right of vengeancebut as the
vindicator
of society, the punisher of crime,
which else must go unpunishedthe righter
of the wrongedthe champion of the weak
the faithful, although frail defender of
thine holy law. If this be not so, forsake
me thou, oh Lord! Give me up to the
mercies
of my direst foesuffer me to fall
unavenged
,
unwept, and unhonored! But if
in truth and honor, and in right I do go forth,
strike Thou, as is thy wont, for the right,
likewise.
This said, he lay down quietly upon his
couch, and, ere five minutes had passed over
him, slept peaceably and sweetly as an
infant
,
until the self-same gun which had
aroused Don Guzman from the perturbed
visions of his guilty conscience, broke his
refreshing slumbers. Arising instantly, he,
too, girt on his sword, buckled his mantle
over his broad chest, fixed his hat firmly on
his head, and strode forth, all unsummoned,
to the water-gate. There stood four noble
chargers; his own proud Andalusian, with a
less high-bred charger at his side, backed by
the page Alonzo, who, with a merlin on his
wrist, and the two powerful blood-hounds,
without which never did Hernando ride forth
into the wilderness, crouching before him,
sat patiently awaiting the arrival of his lord.
A little way aloof a menial, clad in the rich
liveries of Isabel and silver, held the bay
coursers of Herreiro and his old squire.
No foot did Don Hernando set in stirrup,
but seizing the reins firmly in his left hand,
while with his right he grasped the cantle
of his demi-pique, he swung himself at once
with a light leap to his charger's back.
Flinging
the reins free to the impulse of the fiery
horse, while he stood yet erect, he curbed
him tightly up as his feet struck the sod, and
slightly pricking him with his long gilded
spurs, dashed off at a hand gallop into the
wild glades of the forest.
A short mile's distance from the walls of
Isabella, embosomed in deep woodlands,
there was a small savanna, scarcely a
hundred
yards across, clothed with short mossy
grass, which, in that lovely climate, never,
at any season, lost the rich freshness of its
emerald verdure; for, in its furthest curve,
lurking beneath the shelter of a group of
tall and feathery palm-trees, where lay the
basin of a tiny crystal spring, whence
welling
forth, in copious and perennial beauty,
a silver streamlet issuedand, compassing
two-thirds of that small plain with its
refreshing
waters, stole away silently among
the devious wilds through which it flowed,
unmarked, into the neighboring sea. Here
it washere, in this lovely and secluded
spot, farfar as it would seem removed from
the fierce turmoils, the stern bitterness, the
angry hatreds of the world, that the two
foe-men
were to meet. For half an hour, at
least, Hernando had sat there, motionless as
a statue, upon his docile charger, awaiting,
in the centre of that sylvan solitude, the
coming of his antagonist.
Just as he had begun to marvel at the
protracted absence of his intended slayer,
the sharp and rattling clatter of a horse's
gallop, tearing his route through the dense
saplings of the tangled wood, was heard
approaching
;
and in another moment, his reins,
and neck, and chest embossed with flakes of
snow-white form, and his flanks bleeding
from incessant spurring, Herreiro's charger
bore him, at the top of his speed, into the
scene of action. As he approached,
Hernando
raised his hat, with the stern courtesy
exacted by the strict punctilio of the duel
from every honorable cavalier; yet well
schooled as he was to suppress each outward
token of every inward sentiment, the noble
cavalier half started as he beheld the ravages
worked by a single night of anguish on the
proud mien and comely features of his
antagonist
.
His hair, which on the previous morning
had been as dark and glossy as the black
raven's wing, was now not merely tangled
most disorderly in hideous elf-locks, but
actually
streaked with many a lock of grey;
while his whole visage, which, though swart
and somewhat stern, had yet been smooth and
seemly, was scored by many a line and
furrow
,
ploughed deep into the flesh during
those few fleet hours, by the hot
plough-shares
of remorse and scorching anguish.
No salutation did he make in answer to the
bow of his brave young opponent; but
whirling
his long rapier from its sheathDraw!
he cried, draw, sir! Look on the sun for
the last time and die! and, as he spoke,
plunging his spurs even more furiously than
he had done before into the bleeding flanks
of his good horse, he dashed at once upon
him sword in hand, hoping, it was most
evident
,
to take him at advantage, and bear him,
unprepared, to earth. If such, however,
were his ungenerous and foul intent, most
grievously was he frustrated by the calm skill
and perfect resolution of Hernando; who
merely gathering his reins a little tighter,
unsheathed his keen Toledo; andwithout
moving one yard from the spot whereon his
Andalusian stood, watching with fiery eye
and broad expanded nostrils, the motions of
the other charger, yet showing by no
symptom
,
save the quivering of his erected ears,
that he was conscious of the coming strife,
extended it with the point towards Herreiro's
face. On came the fierce assailant; on! with
the speed of light; his left hand clasping the
reins firmly; his right drawn back, in
preparation
for the deadly thrust, far past his hip;
while the bright point of the long two edged
blade was ghttering in advance of the bay
charger's frontlet! Now they are within
half-sword's lengthand now!see! see
that quick, straight flash, bright as the stream
of the electric fluid, and scarce, if anything,
less rapid! it was the thrust of Guzman, well
aimed, and sped with strength, that, had it
reached the mark, must have propelled it
through the stoutest corslet that ever
bucklered
breast; much more through the slight
silken jerkin which was the only armor that
would have opposed its brunt. Midway,
however, in its glancing course it was met
by the calm, firm parry of Hernando's sword;
and thus, diverted from its true direction,
passed harmless, slightly grazing the bridle
arm of the young cavalier. On came
Herreiro
still; and for an instant's space it seemed
as though the shock of his charger at full
speed must have born down the slighter
Andalusian; but scarcely had he parried that
home thrust before, with a quick motion of
the bridle hand; so quick, indeed, that it was
scarce perceptible; and a slight
corresponding
pressure of the spur on the flank
opposite
,
Hernando wheeled his charger to the
left; feinted a thrust at his foe's face; and,
circling quite around him, delivered a full
sweeping cut against the back part of his
neck. With perfect mastery of steed and
weapon, Don Guzman met this perilous and
unexpected movement. Pulling so hard on
his long Moorish curb, that his horse,
checked
at once, stood upright and almost fell
backward on his haunches, he swung his
sword round to the guard so actively, that the
strong blow fell harmless. Then they closed
hand to hand; fragments of the short mossy
turf flew high into the air, spurned by the
iron heels of the excited chargers; sparks
flew from the collision of the well-tempered
blades; feathers were shorn, blood flowed
on either side! Yet neither failed nor
faltered
.
At length a furious down-right cut,
aimed by Don Guzman full at Hernando's
head, glanced from his guard, and falling on
the ear of the high-blooded Andalusian,
almost
dissevered it! Maddened with torture,
the brave brute obeyed the bit no longer, but,
with a yell of agony, bolted, despite the
utmost
efforts of the rider. Herreiro marked
his advantage, and as the horse
uncontrollably
dashed by him, cut, by a second rapid
lunge, his adversary's rein asunder.
Frantic
although his horse was with pain, and
freed from the direct restraint of the half
useless
bridle, Hernando was not carried far
before he recovered mastery enough to wheel
him round once more to the encounter.
Perceiving
,
instantly, that all chance of success
by rapid turns or quick manuvring was at
an end, he now, adopting his opponent's
system
,
dashed straight upon him, and when
within arm's length, throwing his own reins
loose, caught, with his left hand, the long
silver cheek-piece of Herreiro's bit, wheeling
his own horse counter to flank upon him, by
the mere dint of spur without the slightest
exercise of bit or bridle; and shortened, at
the same time, his sword to plunge it from
above into the throat of the assassin.
It seems as though no earthly power could
have availed to rescue Guzman from his
desperate
situation. His horse, exhausted by
his own exertions, reeled visibly beneath the
shock; his rapier, far extended and abroad,
could by no means have parried the down.
thrust, which hung above him:But in that
very point of time, that very second, long as
a thousand ages, in which he saw the dark
glance of his injured comrade's eye fixed
banefully upon him; in which he noted the
grim smile mantling upon his scornful lip; in
which he shuddered at the gleaming point of
the suspended rapier, which no effort of his
own could possibly avert; in that dread point
of time, a yelling shout arose from all the
circumjacent woodlands; a howl, as though
the fiends had all broken loose, to rend the
upper air with their discordant voices, and,
with the yell, a volley of flint-headed arrows
came hurtling through the air; another, and
another! but, with the first, Hernando's
half-won
triumph ended! For, as he brandished
his avenging sword aloft, clear through his
elevated wrist drove the long Charib shaft;
a second grazed his plume; a third, most
fatal of the flight, pierced through the very
heart of his proud Andalusian, and hurled
him lifeless to the earth. Herreiro turned,
turned for base flight; but not long did his
forfeit life remain to him, for, with the second
volley, down went both horse and man,
transfixed by fifty shafts, gory and lifeless!
And the last words that smote upon his
deafening
ear, among the yells and whoops of
the wild Charibs, were those shouted in his
own sonorous tongueThis arrow for
Guarica!
And, in good truth, it was that arrow,
winged from the bow of Orozimbo, that did,
as he had sworn so deeply, drown the flames
of his lust in his heart's blackest blood.
Mount! mount, Alonzo, mount, boy, and
fly, shouted the dauntless cavalier, as he lay
wounded, and encumbered by his
slaughtered
horse.
The bold boy heard, but obeyed him not!
Forth he rushed, sword in hand, forth to the
rescue of his lord; and forth, at the same
instant
,
from the forest, forth sped the Charib
Caonabo and his unconquered horde, with
spear, and mace, and bow, and barbarous
war-cry! Down with your sword, 'tis
madness to resist, cried the young Spaniard:
and the next second had not passed, before
the servant and the master were both the
fettered
captives of the invincible cacique.
CHAPTER VIII.
After
the death of Herreiro, and the
capture
of De Leon, the Charibs, who had so
suddenly unmasked their ambuscade, in
which, with the wonted patience of an
Indian
,
they had lain during the occurrence of
events which to them must have seemed
strange and inexplicable, appeared, for some
short time, to be in confusion, hurrying to
and fro, like bees alarmed and swarming in
their hives, without any very distinct plan
or method.
After a little while, however, they were
brought into comparative order by the
exertion
of their chieftain, and were arrayed in
five parallel columns, in the well-known
Indian
file; each headed by a plumed cacique,
and containing, as nearly as Hernando could
conjecture, each, something better than a
hundred warriors.
In the meantime, Hernando, with the page,
was compelled to sit down at the foot of the
tree to which Alonzo's horse and the
bloodhounds
were attached, and both were bound
firmly with their arms pinioned behind them
to the mossy trunk.
An interval of nearly half an hour
followed
,
the chiefs being continually on the look
out, as if they expected messengers; and as
these did not come, even more uncertainty
was displayed than before in the movements
of the savages, who broke their ranks, and
crowded round a little knoll at some
distance
,
on which Hernando could perceive a
tall, powerful Indian, with a plumed crown,
and many ornaments of gold on his breast,
and about his neck and arms, whom he took
to be Caonabo, the great Charib chief; the
most resolute opponent and formidable foe
the Spaniards had encountered on the island.
Around this chief there was soon collected
a group of chiefs gesticulating violently, and
speaking very loud; so much so that
Hernando
was well nigh convinced that, once or
twice, he heard his own name mentioned: an
idea in which he was confirmed by seeing
that many of the Indians looked towards him,
and two or three pointed with their hands, as
the sounds which he judged to be intended
for his name were repeated.
Looking more earnestly, as he now did, he
thought that one of the figures of the younger
chiefs resembled Orozimbo; and he was
certain
that this person was arguing violently
with the great chief, and, as he believed,
concerning himself likewise.
While he was gazing with all his eyes, a
deep and sudden sound came down the wind,
from the direction of the Spanish town. It
was the heavy din of the alarm bell,
followed
,
almost immediately, by the faint rattle of
the drums, scarce audible at that distance,
calling the garrison to arms. This in an
instant, put an end, as if by magic, to the
confused debate.
The men hurried back into their files, the
chiefs took their places at the head of each;
and if it was indeed Orozimbo whom he had
seen, he could no more distinguish him among
the crowd: nor did he again see the person
whom he had fancied to be he, during the
whole course of the day.
Scarcely were the Charibs again steady in
their ranks, before three or four Indian scouts
came rushing up, breathless and black with
sweat, from the forest, with tidings, it would
seem, of great importance. For they flew
straight to the gigantic chieftain, and he,
after hearing their report, called out four or
five old caiques, and held a short, grave
consultation. After this, Hernando and his
page were unbound from the tree, and, with
their arms still fettered, placed, each apart
from the other, in the centre of a file, between
two stout Indians.
A word was given; it was passed from
man to man, and then they began their march,
silent and slow, in one long, single file,
towards
the dark and distant wilderness.
All day long did the wily savages retreat,
through the most wild and devious recesses
of the forest, toward their mountain
fastnesses
,
forcing their hapless captives, wounded
though they were, and faint and weary, to
strain every muscle to keep up with them.
At mid-day, for a short hour, they halted at
a bright, crystal spring, deep-bosomed in the
pathless wilderness, kindled their fires, and
applied themselves to the preparation of their
artless meal. Most picturesque and striking
was the aspect of that wild halt; and had it
been at any other time, no eye would
have dwelt on it with more earnest
pleasure
;
no fancy would have sported more
poetically with all its thousand accidents
of light and shade, repose contrasted with
swift motion, rare grouping, and bright
coloring, than that of the young Spaniard.
But as he lay beneath the canopy of a superb
mimosa, with his arms painfully lashed
behind
his back with thongs, recently cut from
a raw deer-hide, his thoughts were all too
painfully absorbed, too vague, wandering,
and distracted, to suffer him to dwell upon,
or notice, that gay spectacle.
Conjecture was at work within his brain;
but, busy as it was, no clue presented itself
to his mind, whereby to solve the mystery.
All was dark, intricate, and gloomy! By
no means could he discover or divine what
could have been the cause of such an inroad;
or by what strange accident he should
himself
have fixed the rendezvous for the
precise
spot where the Charibs had laid their
ambuscade, for that they could have learned
the premeditated duel was, on the very face
of things, impossible. Why such a force of
Indians should have been mustered (for the
band was, at the very least reckoning, five
hundred strong), under their most redoubted
champion, merely to interrupt a combat
between
two Spanish warriors; or why,
supposing
,
as it was far more natural to deem,
that the true object of the expedition had
contemplated some end widely different, after
the accidental capture of one soldier, had the
real purpose of the onslaught been laid by,
and overlooked, in the delight arising from a
success so slight and unimportant! Deeply,
however, as he pondered, he found not,
heretofore
,
the smallest clue whereby to reach
the termination of the maze in which his
thoughts were so mysteriously involved. At
times, a wild and anxious terror would
possess
his mind with the idea that his capture
must be connected in some wise with his
repeated visits to the Charib maiden, whom
he had so devotedly enthroned within his
heart of hearts,meet idol for that magic
shrine!that the most distant surmise of
peril to which she should be exposed, shook
his strong nerves, even as an earthquake
agitates the rock-ribbed mountains. Anon,
as reason told him that such fancies were the
mere visionary workings of a
self-tormenting
spirit, his features would array
themselves
in a wan, sickly smile, and he would
deem, for a brief moment, that cheerfulness
and hope were re-established in his heart.
Thus passed the mid-day halt; the simple
preparations for the Indian meal were ended,
and seated on the velvet cushioned
greensward
,
the natives ate in silence and in haste,
betokening the need of rare and, to their inert
and voluptuous characters, unwelcome toil
and exertion. Food and a calabash of water
were set before Hernando; and a significant,
although mute, gesture urged him to profit
by the opportunity thus offeredbut, though
he was aware of the necessity of keeping up,
as far as possible, his physical, as well as
mental powers, in order to exert himself on
any chance occasion to effect his own escape,
and that of his loved page, from the fierce
savages, the fever of his wounds, enhanced
by the anxiety and burning bitterness of his
soul, had parched his throat and lips, and he
turned with irrepressible and painful
loathing
from the viands, which, though rude
and simple, might well have satisfied the
palate of a soldier fasting since the
preceding
night, and spent with toil and travel.
Deeply, however, did he drink of the cool
liquid crystal, with which his calabash was
often and again replemished by a bright eyed
youth of gentler mien, and milder features
than any other of the Charibs, who, from the
first, had hovered unremarked about the
captives
,
and who now smiled cheerily upon
Hernando, while ministering with something
of solicitude and tenderness to his most
pressing
wants. After the Spaniard had
exhausted
at a single draught the second gourd of
water, and had relapsed into the deep
abstraction
of his own fevered thoughts, he
was half startled by the soothing pressure of
a cool soft hand upon his burning brow,
laving his temples with the same pure icy
element which had so gratefully relieved his
burning thirstturning his eyes up with a
sudden impulse, he caught again the features
of the slight Indian boy, which several times
before had met his gaze that morning,
although unnoticed in the engrossing tumult
of his senses. Again a brilliant smile glanced
over the dark lineaments, and a quick
flashing
light, as if of well-pleased recognition,
leaped from the lustrous eyes. Although his
face was strange, although to the best of the
young Spaniard's memory, never before had
those dusky features met his eyes, there was
yet something in their aspect which was
familiar, something which brought back
Hernando knew not whybright thoughts
of by-gone days, and kindled livelier hopes
of future welfaresomething of indistinct
and vague similitude to some one he had seen
before, although he could not, on the instant,
bring to his mind, or time, or place, or
person
.
Thought was at work within him, to
make out wherein, and to whom, lay this
strange similitude, while still the gentle hand
steeped his hot forehead, and the mild eyes
gazed into his with almost female tender
ness. Sudden it flashed upon himsudden
as the electric gleam! A radiant light shot
from his clouded eyes, his lips moved, and
the first syllables of an Indian word were
quivering on his tongue, when the boy,
instantly
appreciating the meaning of that
sudden
lustre, assuming a grave and warning
airpressed his forefinger on his lip, and
waved his left hand with a gesture so slight,
as to be imperceptible except to him for whom
it was intended, towards the great chieftain
Caonabo, who lay at a short distance under
the overbowering shadow of a huge forest
tree, mantled with thousands of sweet
parasites
,
engaged in consulationas it would
seem from their grave brows and quiet
gestures
of
deep import with his superior
warriors
.
This done, he turned away and was
lost instantly to the sight of Hernando among
the Charib soldiery, who were now
mustering
fast, their simple meal concluded, as for
their onward route. Another moment, and
the gigantic cacique up-started to his feet,
snatched from the branch, whence they hung,
his long tough bow and gaily decorated
quiver, slung them across his naked
shoulders
,
braced on his left arm a light buckler
covered with thin plates of the purest gold,
and grasping in his right a ponderous mace
of iron-wood, curiously carved, and toothed
at every angle with rows of jagged shells,
stalked with an air of native dignitywhich
could not have been outdone, had it been
equalled, by the noblest potentate of Europe's
haughtiest court; across the green savannah,
and stood among his warrior subjects, the
mightiest and noblest of them all; the
mightiest
and noblest, not in the vainer attributes
of rank and birth alone, not in the temporal
power only, which may be and oft is
bestowed
upon the weak of limb and low of spirit,
but in the thews and sinews, the energies,
the daring, and the soul, the power to do and
suffer, the sublime and unmoved constancy
of purpose, the indomitable, irresistible
resolve
,
the all which makes one man superior
to his fellows. A moment he stood there,
gazing around him with a fearless and proud
glance upon the muster of his tribe's best
soldiery; then speaking a few words to a tall
savage, who throughout the day had been
the nighest to his person, he stalked off
slowly
,
followed by four at least of the five
hundred
which composed his band, in a direction
nearly at right angles to the blind path
which they had hitherto pursued, and which
might be perceived beyond the little area
diving right onward between walls of
impenetrable
verdure, into the far depths of the
forest.
Scarce had the last of this train vanished
from sight, before the same tall savage to
whose ear the parting words of Caonabo had
been uttered, marshalled the little band which
had been left, as it would seem, under his
sole command. Fifty of these, bearing their
long bows ready bent, with a flint-headed
arrow notched on the string of each, filed off
under the guidance of an old hoary-headed
Charib, whose wrinkled brow and lean
attenuated
frame would have denoted him as
one unfit for deeds of toil or daring, had not
they been even more distinctly contradicted
by the light vigor of his every motion, by the
keen fire of his glaring eye-ball, and by the
sinewy grace with which he wielded his war
weapons. At the same cat-like pace, which
Hernando had marked in the warriors of the
larger band, these dark-skinned archers
threaded
the defile of the umbrageous path, which
was so narrow as scarcely to admit one man,
and was so densely walled by brakes of cane
and prickly shrubs, that it would have been
a harder task to penetrate their leafy ram part,
than to carve out a path through the most
powerful bastions that mortal workmen ever
framed of eternal granite. A signal from the
chief directed him to follow, and conscious
of the entire hopelessness of any present
opposition
to his will, recruited somewhat by
his brief repose, and cheered yet more by the
imagination that in the number of his captors
he had found at the least one friend,
Hernando
entered with a quick and springy step the
dim pass, while, hard upon his heels, urging
him up close to the warrior who preceded
him, strode the tall figure of the Charib
captain
,
followed in turn by the remainder of his
train, with, in their midst, the frail and
fettered
form of the young Alonzo. Onward
they marched, still onward, tracking the
windings of that narrow road, through the
deep matted swamp, over the rocky ledge,
among the giants of the forest! still walled
at every point by masses of luxuriant
verdure
,
so dense as to make twilight of the
scorching noonday, still so defined that a
blind man might have groped out his way
unerring, and still so straight that it was
utterly
impossible for two to go abreast.
The only changes in the dark monotony
of this dim defile were when it forded some
wild torrent brawling along in gloomy
discontent
among the tangled thickets, or when
it crossed, upheld on narrow causeways of
rude logs, some woodgirt pool, half lake and
half morass, where, for a little space, the
weary eye might strive to penetrate the
arch vista through which foamed the restless
streamlet, or dwell upon the dull and
lead-like
surface of the small standing pool.
Onward
they marched, still onward! The sun,
which all unmarked had climbed the height
of heaven, and all unseen descended to its
western verge, stooped like a giant
bride-groom
to his bed, and a more dull and brown
er horror overspread the trackless forest.
The stars came out in the translucent skies,
spangling the firmament with their
unnumbered
smiles, but not one mirthful glance
might penetrate the solid vault of greenery
which over-canopied their routethe broad,
bright moon soared up far over the tangled
tree-tops, and here and there a pencil of soft
lustre streamed downward through some
verdant
crevice, and a mild, hazy light diffused
itself even in that murky avenue. Onward
they marched, still onward, at one unwearied,
even, silent pace. No halt was made at
even-tide, no halt at the deep midnight, and
the young Spaniard, proud though he was
of his capacity to bear, well trained in every
manly and martial exercise, felt that he was
but a child in strength, and in activity, among
the dark sons of the forest. The boy,
Alonzo
,
had long since given out, and had been
borne an unresisting and almost insensible
weight in the stout arms of two powerful
savages. Onward they went, still onward,
and it was only by the utmost and most
resolute
exertion that Hernando could maintain
the steady, swift pace which his captors held,
without one pant disturbing the calm tenor of
their breathing, or one sweat-drop appearing
on their muscular, swart frames.
Daybreak was near at handa deeper
gloom had followed on the setting moon
the stars had waned, and a chill freshness in
the air betokened the approach of morning,
although the skies were yet untinged by any
gleam of light, when a low whistle was heard
from the head of the long file; man by man
it passed rearward, and all halted. After a
second's space there was a forward
movement
;
and, after a few steps, Hernando might
perceive that the path opened somewhat, and
that the men who went before him, fell
orderly
and steadily as they advanced, into a
column of three front; halting, however, as
they did so, in order that no interval might
be left in their line of march. Then scarcely
had he moved half a yard beyond the spot
whereat the wider road commenced, before
the tall chief mentioned heretofore, and the
man next behind, moved simultaneously, by
a quick, pard-like spring to either side of
him, and grasped his arms above the elbow
with a firm, though not painful pressure.
Meanwhile the heavens had brightened
somewhat, and he might see that a huge rocky
hill, or, as it might have been termed, not
inaptly
,
mountain, rose suddenly, an abrupt and
glant barrier, directly in their front. Rough
as it was, however, and difficult of access, an
hour of constant labor brought them in safety to
the summit, where a scene widely different
from the bleak herbless crags which with so
much of labor they had scaled, presented itself
to the Spaniard's eyes. A table of rich fertile
land, of many miles circumference, was here
outspread upon the ledgy top of the huge hill,
which fell abruptly down on every side, a
precipice
of several hundred feet in sheer descent,
accessible alone by steep and zigzag paths, like
that up which his weary feet had painfully
surmounted
its ascent. Groves of the freshest
verdure
towered high above the black and broken
rocks which walled them in on every side;
fields richly clothed with the tall maize, rustled
and twinkled in the morning air; streamlets of
crystal water meandered to and fro until they
reached the steep brink whence they plunged
in bright and foaming cataracts down to the
vale belowand here embosomed in the
verdant
groves, circled with rich and fertile fields,
watered by rills of most translucent water; here,
on a summit never before trodden by the feet
of European, lay the secluded fastness of the
Charib Caonaboa village larger and more
neatly built than any which Hernando had yet
seen in the fair island of Hispaniola. Some
two, or at the most three hundred cottages, of
the low Indian fashion, with roofs thatched by
the spreading palm-leaves, and pillared porticoes
scattered about in careless groups, irregularly
mixed with groves and gardens, were carefully
surrounded by a deep ditch, supplied with
water
from a dam upon a neighboring streamlet;
and a stockade composed of massive timbers of
the already famous iron-wood, framed with
much skill and ingenuity, in imitation of
Spanish
palisadoes. Columns of smoke were
curling gaily upward from every cottage roof,
and lights were glancing cheerily from every
open door and wide unlatticed casement; and
merry voices rang in friendly converse or
unthinking
song, through the long village streets;
but none came forth to greet, or cheer the
wounded weary stranger, who was dragged on
right on, wistfully eyeing the bright
firesides
,
and listening with envious ears to the gay
sounds of merriment, among which he stood
alone and almost hopeless. At length, when
he had passed every housewhen the lights
and sounds had faded into distance, the hand
which might be said to bear, rather than now to
lead him onward, halted before a towering pile
of rock, upon the further verge of the small
area of table land contiguous to the stern
precipice
.
A light was procured instantly by one of
the inferiors of the tribe, and by it was revealed
a natural aperture in the dark rock, defended
by a grated wicket, composed, like the
stock-side
,
of massive beams of iron-wood, securely
fastened by a lock of Spanish manufacture. A
key was instantly produced from the tall
chieftain's
girdle, and without any word of
explanation
the gate was opened, the Spaniard's bonds
were loosened, a pile of cloaks of the rude
native
cotton was flung down in a dark recess of
the cavewhich, by the dim light of the
flickering
torch, appeared to be of immense
magnitude
.
Hernando was thrust violently in, the
torch extinguished, and the gate closed on the
momentlocked and double-locked behind
him. For a short time he listened to the
departing
footsteps of his captors, and then,
outdone
with weariness and woe, muttered his
hasty prayers, and throwing himself down at
full length on the simple pallet, slept heavily
and soundly until the sun of the succeeding day
was high in the blue heavens, when he awoke
again to recollection of his griefs, and the
feverish
torture of his wounds.
CHAPTER IX.
The
sun was high in heaven, when
Hernando
de Leon awoke from the deep but
perturbed
and restless slumbers which, induced by
the fever of his wounds, and the toilsome
journey
of the preceding day, had fallen on him
almost
before his limbs were stretched upon their
temporary couch. The bright rays streaming
in between the massive beams that barred the
portal of his dungeon, full of ten thousand
dancing motes, had fallen full upon his face,
and uncurtained eyelids, dazzling the orbs
within; so that when he upstarted from his
dreamless sleep, it was a moment or two before
he could so far collect his thoughts as to
discover
where he was, or what had been the
circumstances
which placed him in that wild
abode. By slow degrees, however, the truth
dawned on his mind, and with the truth that
dull sense of oppression that dense and
smothering
weight, which to souls of the highest order
and most delicate perceptions, seems ever to
attend
the loss of liberty. For a while, therefore,
he brooded gloomily and darkly over the strange
events of the past day; the singular mode in
which he had been so unexpectedly entrapped,
the unexplained and unintelligible conduct of the
savages, and, above all, the motives which had
influenced them in their treatment of himself.
Thence his thoughts strayed, by no
unnatural
transition, to the mild features and kind
ministry
of the Charib boy; and when he probed
his memory, he clearly recollected him to be
one of the slaves of Orozimbo's household,
though from this he could draw no plausible
conjecture, either for good or evil. After a
little
space, wandering again, his spirit began to
reflect upon the chances of his liberation; nor
did he meditate long on this topic, before he
came to the conclusion that for his present
escape
from the hands of the fierce cacique, and
for his ultimate return to the settlements of his
countrymen, he must rely entirely on his own
energies. Hope of assistance from without
was evidently desperate. The speed and
secresy
with which the Indians had conducted
their retreatthe ignorance of all his comrades
respecting his own movements on that
eventful
morningthe death, flight, or capture of all
those who had been privy to the time or place
of his encounter with Herreriro, and above all
the great and almost certain probability that
some ulterior object, involving inroads on the
Spanish posts, of magnitude sufficient to
engage
their occupants exclusively in their own
self-preservation, had drawn the wily Caonabo
to such a distance from his usual fastnesses,
all these considerations led the young captive
to believe that on himself alone, on his own
often tried resources, on his own resolute will
and unflinching nerves, on his own deep
sagacity
and dauntless courage, on his own
hardihood
of heart and corresponding energy of
thews and sinews, depended all his hope of
extrication from an imprisonment which
promised
to be long indeed, and painful, unless it
should be brought to a more speedy, though
no less unwished termination through the
medium
of a violent and cruel death.
Stimulated, by reflections such as these, to
something of exertion, Hernando rose from his
lowly couch, with the intent of exploring, to
the utmost, the secrets of his prison house,
which, so far as the uncertain light, checkered
and broken by the gratings through which it
found its way, permitted him to judge, seemed
of considerable depth and magnitude, when,
to his great surprise, as he raised himself, he
perceived that, during his slumbers, his
dungeon
had been visited by some one who had
left, hard by his pillow, a calabash of pure,
cold water, with a slight meal of fruits and the
cassava bread, which formed the principal
article
of nutriment among the simple Indians.
So sound, however, had been his sleep, that the
noise of opening the heavy creaking gate had
fallen
unheard and unheeded on his dulled senses
To lave his heated brow and hands, in the cool
elementto quaff a long, long draught, more
soothing, in his present temper, than the
most fragrant wines of Xenes, or the yet more
renowned and costly Val de Peaswas his
first impulse; but when refreshed and
reinvigorated
by the innocent cup, he turned to taste the
eatables before him, his very soul revolted
from the untouched morsel, the rising spasm of
the throat, the
hysterica passio
of poor Lear,
convulsed him; and, casting the food from him,
he buried his hot aching temples in his hands,
and remained for many minutes, plunged, as it
were, in a deep stuporthen, by a mighty
effort
,
shaking off the lethargic gloom, he drank
again more deeply than before, sprang to his
feet, and strode, with firm and rapid steps,
several
times to and fro the area of his prison,
immediately
within the wicket, where fell the
brightest glances of the half-interrupted
sunlight
.
Shame, shame! he cried, at length
giving
articulate expression to his thoughts
shame, shame on thee. Hernando!to
pine and give way thus beneath the pressure
of so slight an evilfor what is this to thy
hard soul-cankering captivity, among the
savage paynimry of Spainwhere fettered
to the floor thou languishedst for nine long
months, unvisited by the fair light of
Heaven. Shame! it must not be! and he
manned himself, upon the instant, by a single
effort, and, turning from the light, explored
with cautious scrutiny each nook and angle
of the cavern. It was of large extent, wide,
deep, and full of irregular recesses; and
seemed to have been used as a species of
magazine, or store-house; for piles of dried
fish, baskets of wicker-work heaped with the
golden ears of maize, or roots of the cassava,
cumbered the floor; while on rude shelves
were stowed away the simple fabric of the
Indian broom, mattings, and rolls of cotton
cloth, fantastically dyed, and in onethe
most secretnook, protected by a wooden
door, a mass of glittering ornaments, some
wrought of the purest gold, and others of the
adulterated metal, which the savages termed
guanin
, breast-plates, and crowns and
bracelets
,
enough to have satisfied the avarice
insatiate
of a Pizarro or a Cortez. Nor were
these all; for visible amid the darkness, by
the rays which their own gorgeous substance
concentrated, lay bars, and ingots and huge
wedges, of the virgin metal, beside a pile of
unwrought ore, gleaming with massy veins,
of value utterly uncalculable. Slight was
the glance which the young Spaniard cast
upon these more than kingly treasuresa
single crevice opening to the outer air had
been to him a discovery more precious than
the concentrated wealth of all the mighty
mines of the new worlda single coat of
plate, with helm and buckler, and a good
Spanish blade to match them, he would have
clutched with hands that scorned the richer
metalbut these were not; and he turned
from the cacique's treasury with a heedless
air, to resume his hitherto unprofitable search.
Not far did he go, however, before another
wooden door presented itself, closed only by
an artificial latch, which yielded instantly
to his impatient fingers. It openedand
before
him extended a huge and stately hall, for
such it seemed, wide as the cloistered
chancel
of some gothic pile, and loftier; walled,
paved and vaulted by the primeval hand of
nature, first and unrivalled architect, with the
eternal granitenot as the outer chamber,
obscure, or dimly seem by half-excluded
daylight
but
flooded with pure, all-pervading
sunshine, which poured in unpolluted and
unveiled, through the vast natural arch which
terminated the superb arcade. His heart
leaped, as it seemed, with the vast joy of the
moment, into his very throat! All suffering,
all anxiety, all woe was instantly forgotten!
for he was free! free as the fresh summer
wind that was tossed round his head, rife
with the perfumes of a thousand flowing hills!
free as the glowing sunshine that streamed
through that broad portal! With a quick
step, and bounding pulse, he leaped towards
the opening! he reached!he stood upon the
threshold! Wherefore that sudden start?
wherefore that ashy pallor pervading brow
and cheek and lip? One other step, and he
had been precipitated hundreds of feet from
the sheer verge of the huge rock, which fell
a perpendicular descent of ninety fathom,
down to the cultured plains below! His feet
were now tottering on the very brink, and it
required more than an ordinary effort of his
strong active frame to check the impulse of
his forward motion, which had been so
impetuously
swift, that but a little more would
have sufficed to hurl him into the empty air.
With a dull leaden weight that sudden
disappointment
crushed down the burning
aspirations
of his soulhis heart fell sick within
him; he clasped his hands over his throbbing
templeshe was again a captive! It was,
however, but for a moment he was unmanned.
Before a second had elapsed, he was engaged
with all his energies, in the examination of
the smallest peculiarities of the place, hoping,
alas! in vain, that he should still discover
there some path whereby to quit his
prison-house
;
but not the faintest tracknot the
most slight projection, whereon to plant a
foot, was thereabove, below, to right and
left of that huge arch, the massy precipice
was smooth and hard and slippery as glass
and, after a minute inspection, the Spaniard
was reluctantly compelled to own to his
excited
hopes, which fain would have
deceived
themselves, that nothing had been
gained by his discovery beyond the power
of gazing forth over the beauties of that
boundless
scene, which stretched away, for miles
and miles, beneath his feet to the blue waters
of the ocean, which lost themselves in turn in
the illimitable azure of the cloudless skies.
Wistfully did he strain his eyes over the
wide-spread
plain, which from that lofty eminence
showed, map-like and distinct, its every
variation
of hill, or sloping upland, tangled ravine,
or broad and fertile valley, clearly delineated
by the undulations of those mighty shadows
whichthrown by the strong sunshine from a
hundred sweeping cloudscareered like giant
beings over the glittering landscape.
Suddenly
,
while he yet lingered over this distant
prospect, a faint sound burst on his eara
sound oft heard and unforgotten; though so
faint that now it scarcely rose above the
whisper
of the breeze waving the myriad tree-tops
of that untrodden solitude; and the small voice
of the far river whose angry roar was
mellowed
,
by the influence of distance, into a soft and
soothing murmur. He started, and glanced
hurriedly aroundagain that soundnearer
and clearer than beforethe remote din of
ordnance
!
Towards the east he gazed, and there,
winding their way through the calm waters in
close propinquity to the green margin of the
isle, he saw four caravellas, with every
snow-white
sail spread to the favoring gales, with
fluttering signals streaming from their
mastheads
,
and by their oft repeated salvos,
soliciting
the notice of their countrymen. It was
it was, past doubt, the squadron of Columbus
long wished for, and arrived too late! Hopeless
although he was, he watched those caravellas
with a gaze as eagerly solicitous as that which
the benighted sailor keeps on the beacon of his
safetywhile, one by one, they were lost to
his sight behind some towering promontory,
and re-appeared again, each after each,
glittering
forth with all their white sails shimmering
in the meridian light. At length he might
behold
them shortening sail, as though their
haven was at hand, and by and by they shot
into the shadow of a wide wood-crowned hill;
and, though the watcher kept his post until the
sun was bending down towards the western
verge of the horizon, they issued not again
upon the azure waters, beyond that mass of
frowning verdure. With a heart sicker than
before, he had already turned away, in order
to go back into the outer cavern, when a sharp
whizzing sound beside him attracted his
attention
,
and ere he could look around the long
shaft of a Charib arrow splintered itself against
the rocky archway, and fell in fragments at his
feet. The first glance of the dauntless
Spaniard
was outward, to descry, if possible, the
archer who had launched that missile, and with
so true an aim! Nor was he long in doubt
for perched on a projecting crag of the same
line of cliffs, wherein was perforated the wide
cave within the mouth of which he stood, a
hundred yards, at the least calculation, distant,
he saw the Charib Orozimbo. A quiver was
suspended from his shoulders, and a long
Indian
bow was yet raised in his right hand, to
the level of his eye; but by the friendly
wafture
of his left, he seemed to deprecate the
notion that he was hostilely inclined. Again
he waved his hand aloft, pointed towards the
broken arrow, and turning hastily away, was
out of sight before Hernando could reply to
his brief amicable gestures. As soon as he
had roused his scattered energies of mind, the
youthful Spaniard turned his attention to the
fragments of the splintered shaft, and instantly
discovered a small packet securely fastened to
the flint head. Tearing it hence with eager
hastecouched in the Spanish tongue, and
traced upon the scrap of parchment by a
remembered
handhe read the following
sentences
:
Be of good cheerfriends are about us.
When the moon sets to-night, watch at the
cavern
moutha clue of thread shall be conveyed
to thee, by which thou shalt draw up a cord
sufficient for thy weightmeans of escape
shall wait thee at the cliff's foot. These,
through the Charib Orozimbo, from thine,
Alonzo
.
CHAPTER IX.
He tore the billet on the instant into the
smallest fragments, and lest some prying eyes
should fall on its contents, scattered it
piecemal
,
through the rocky porch to the free winds
of heaven. This done he looked about him
carefully for some projection of the rock
whereunto he might fix the rope, on which he
was to wing his flight down that precipitous
abyss, that no time might be wasted when the
appointed hour should come, for the
adventure
;
and soon discovered a tall stalactitic
pillar, close to the brink of the descent, the
strength of which he tested by the exertion of
his utmost power. Satisfied now, that he had
nothing more to do, but to avoid suspicion, and
to await the action of his friends without, he
returned instantly to the exterior cave
secured
the door with care, and dragging back the
cotton mattress on which he had slept the
preceding
night into the darkest angle of the
prison
,
stretched himself on it to expect, as
patiently
as might be, the approach of evening.
Not long had he lain there, before a
grim-visaged
old wrinkled warrior entered with a
supply of food and water. Without a word,
this tawny jailor deposited his load on the
rocky floor, and then, with uncouth courtesy,
applied fresh bandages, besmeared with some
sweet-scented Indian salve, which acted almost
magically to the refreshment of the wound
upon the wrist, which had been pierced by the
Charib arrow. Having done this, he peered
about with silent scrutiny, into each angle and
recess of the cave-dungeon, and then, having
severely tested the strength of the wooden
barriers, swung to and locked the heavy
lattice
,
and departed. Slowly the hours of
daylight
lagged away, but to the slowest and the
longest term its end must come, and gradually
the long shadows, which the setting sun threw
over that green landscape, melted into the
dimness of the universal gloom, and one by
one the stars came out in the dark azure
firmament
,
and all was still and sweet and
breathless
.
Anon, the moon came forth, climbing
the arch of heaven in her pure beauty, and
bathing all on earth in peaceful glory. It
seemed, to the excited spirits of Hernando, as
if she never would complete her transit over
the deep blue skies, and it was with no small
exertion that he compelled himself to wait the
time appointed. Well for him was it that he
did so! for when she attained her central
height, a band of dusky warriors, with the
great cacique Caonabo at their head, well
armed with spears and war-clubs, and
equipped
with many and bright torches, paused at
the grated entrance, and summoned him to
show himself to them, his captors. After this
measure, evidently of precaution, he was left
quite alone, shortly after, he fell asleep for a
short space, although his slumbers were
disturbed
and broken; and the moon had not set,
although her lower limb was sinking fast into
the forest when he awoke. Cautiously he
peered out through the dungeon gate to see
that all was still without, ere he should
seek his post, then, satisfied that no spies were
upon the watch, he noiselessly unclosed the
inner door, fastened it softly after him, and
stealing through the larger cavern, showed his
tall figure in the archway just as the last ray
of the moon glanced on the cliffs around him,
ere he should disappear. She sank, and all
was gloom. A momenta shrill sharp whistle
rang on the night air, and again a shaft
whizzed
by him and fell harmless. A slight thread
was attached to it, which, fathom after fathom,
drew in, until a stronger line supplied its place,
and next a stout cord, and at length, the
promised
rope! With eager hands, he gathered
it link after link, coil after coil, fastened it to
the lofty stalactite, and, after having tried, by
a sudden jerk, the safety of the knot, leaned
forth over the rocky brink to see if thence he
might descry aught of his trusty friends.
Diminished
by the distance into a twinkling
gleam, scarce larger than the fire-fly's spark,
at the crag's base, there blazed a single torch,
and, this slight glimmer seen, without one
word or doubt, the dauntless youth grasped
the stout cable, and launched himself over the
perilous brink into the viewless bosom of the
air. The rope had been prepared with knots
at each foot of its length, through every one
of which was thrust a tough bamboo, forming
a rude extempore step-ladder; yet, though
facilitated somewhat, the descent into that
black, and as it seemed, bottomless abyss, was
still perilous in the extreme, and yet less
perilous
than fearful. Steadily, however, did
Hernando, grasping the short rungs with an
iron gripe, and planting his feet one by one,
descend that fearful ladder; nor, till he stood
unscathed on the firm soil below, did his brain
reel, or his stout nerves tremble; and there,
recovering from the transient tremor and
bewilderment
that fell upon him, he found
himself
clasped in the fond arms of the faithful
Guarica, while round them gathered the bold
page, Alonzo, and Orozimbo, the true Charib
boy, Guarica's youthful brother; who had
alone, designed with skill and with success,
accomplished this desperate adventure of escape.
CHAPTER X.
Brief
time had the young Spaniard and his
Indian
princess for explanation, or for converse,
for while she was yet clasped to his grateful
breast in the first sweet embrace of love, a
long, wild yell rang far into the bosom of
the night from the cave's mouth above, and
the broad glare of a hundred torches,
tumultuously
brandished by as many strong and
savage hands, disclosed to the eyes of the
astounded
fugitives the fierce cacique himself,
surrounded by the flower of his wild chivalry,
armed at all points, with bow and buckler,
war-club and javelin, and pike, thronging the
rocky threshold of that deserted dungeon.
Each swarthy figure stood out revealed on
that bold eminence like animated sculptures
of the far-famed Corinthian brass; the sinewy
frames, the well developed muscles, nay!
more, the very features of every stern cacique,
the plumy crowns, and pictured quivers, all
clearly visible and palpably defined against
the fierce red glow which formed the back
ground to that animated picture. Brief time
was there, indeed! for instantly discovering
the mode by which the fugitive had left his
place of confinement, and guessing that his
flight was but recentfor though the crimson
glare of their resinous torches rendered the
group above as visible as daylight could have
done, it lacked the power to penetrate the
gloom which veiled the little knot of beings
at the base of that huge precipice,two of
the boldest of the great cacique's followers
addressed
themselves to the pursuit by the same
fearful and precarious ladder; while many
others might be seen casting aside the heavier
portions of their dress and armature, and
girding
up their loins for a similar purpose.
Haste, haste, Hernando, whispered
the Indian maiden, in a voice that fairly
trembled
with agitationhaste to yon thicket by
the streamfly thou, Alonzo, and unbind the
horses! Come, Orozimbobrother!
And, as she spoke grasping her lover by the
arm, she hurried him away to a dense mass of
thorny brushwood, which, overcanopied with
many a vine and many a tangled creeper,
clothed the banks of a wide, brawling streamlet,
flowing with a loud incessant murmur, though
in a slender volume, over a bed of gravel, and
small rocky fragments, detached, in the lapse
of ages, from the tall crag that overhung it
H re, fastened to the branches, stood three
Spanish chargers, equipped with the lightest
housings then in use, except that one, in
addition
to the saddle, was provided with a
velvet
cushion attached to the cantle, and kept in
its place by a thong, securing it to the richly
plated crupper.
Mount, mount, Alonzo, cried the
maiden
;
stay not to hold your master's stirrup;
mount, and delay not! Every minute now
is worth a human life! While yet the words
were on her lips, the page had leaped into his
saddle, and swinging her slight form, with
scarce an effort, to the croup of the tall charger,
Hernando, without setting foot in stirrup,
vaulted
into the saddle before her, grasped the reins
firmly with a practised hand, and stirring his
steed's mettle with the spur, rode a few paces
down the channel of the stream, till he had
reached a place clear from the overbowering
brushwood. The boy Alonzo followed hard
on his traces, leading the third horse by the
bridle at his side.
Whereoh where tarries Orozimbo?
whispered again the Charib maiden, in a sweet
low voice of her native tonguewithout
him, all is naught!
Ere she had finished speaking, they cleared
the thicket, and by the strong illumination of
the lights above, a fearful scene was rendered
visible. The foremost two of the pursuers
were half way down the ladder, while three
of their followers had commenced their
perilous
descent, and were now hanging to the
topmost rungs! Wherewhere was
Orozimbo
?
A sharp twang broke the silence which had
succeeded to the yell of the infuriate Indians.
A keen, sharp ringing twang! a hurtling sound
as of some missile in quick motion, followed
a long, dark streak was seen almost
immediately
glancing within the circling radiance of
the torches, towards the leading Charibat the
next instant he relaxed his holda piercing
yell of anguish and despair pealed up to the
dark heavensheadforemost the tawny savage
plunged earthwardand the soft, heavy
plashing
noise announced, as plainly as the clearest
words could tell, that not one bone remained
unbroken after that fearful fall! Another
twangand yet another!and almost
simultaneously
,
with the small, shrill voice of the
fatal cord, another, and another of the
wretched
Indians, transfixed by the unerring shafts
of Orozimbo, were precipitatedone shrieking
hopelessly but incessantly through the deaf
air, until the awful crash finished his cries and
agonies togetherone mute in his stern
despair
from
their slight foothold; while
daunted
by the deadly archery of their unseen
enemy
,
and ignorant how many foes were
launching
death at every shot among them, the
survivors retreated up the ladder, with wild
haste, and when they reached the summit, a
long drawn yell, strangely expressive of malice
frustrated, and disappointed vengeance, told
those who heard it from below that they
abandoned that precarious method of pursuit.
Another moment, and the light passed from the
verge, and a loud burst of dissonant and angry
voices, receding rapidly, betokened that the
pursuers had turned off to seek some easier
exit from the hill-fortress.
Secured thus, by the bravery and foresight
of her stripling brother, from a pursuit so
instantaneous
that escape would have been scarce
possible, Guarica called aloud, no longer
fearing
to betray their proximity to the enemy by
her words:
Hasten, good brother, hasten! We tarry
for thee, Orozimbo, and guided by the accents
of her well known voice, panting from the
rapidity of his previous motions, and from
agitation
in a scarcely less degree, with his full
quiver rattling on his naked shoulders, and the
long bow, which had of late done such good
service, swinging at his back, the Charib boy
darted down the slight declivity, and, wreathing
his hand lightly in the courser's mane, bounded
at once upon his back.
Follow, Guarica; follow me close: there
is no time for words, he exclaimed, as he
snatched the bridle, and dashing at once into a
gallop, drove down the pebbly channel of the
streamthe small stones and water flashing
high into the air at every stroke of the fleet
steed, and indicating to Hernando the direction
which his guide had taken. No easy task was
it, however, to ride down that wild
water-course
;
for though the streamlet was so
shallow
that it barely reached the horses' knees,
the rugged inequalities of its bedhere
thickly
interspersed with rough and craggy
fragments
,
here paved with slippery boulders, and
there with broad smooth ledges of hard slaty
rock, polished by the incressant rippling of the
current, till ice itself hardly would have
afforded
a less treacherous footholdrendered it
perilous indeed, save to a cavalier of the first
order to put a horse to his speed among its
numerous obstacles. At first, the youthful
Spaniard could not conceive the cause which
should have tempted Orozimbo to lead him by
so strange a path; but busy as he was in
holding
up and guiding the stout charger which
nobly bore his double freight, his mind was
actively
employed: and almost on the instant,
remembering the instinct, scarcely inferior to
the scent of the sagacious bloodhound, with
which the Charib tribes were wont to follow
on the track of any fugitive, he saw the
wisdom
of this singular precaution. For
something
more than two hours they dashed on
unwearied
,
though the sparkling waters, which,
driven far aloft, had draggled all their garments
from the buskin to the very plumethe stream
now wending in bold curves through rich and
fair savannahs, now driving into the most
devious
shades of underwood and forest. Still on
dashed, rousing the wild fowl from their sedgy
haunts on the stream's margin, scaring the birds
of night from their almost impervious roosts,
till now the stars began to pale their
ineffectual
fires, and a faint streak on the eastern sky
to tell of coming day. They reached a smooth
green vega, broader than any they had passed
or seen, and here, for the first time, Orozimbo
paused from his headlong race.
All is well, now, Guaricapursuit is far
behind; two leagues hence, just beyond that
fringe of wood which you may see glooming
dark against the opening morn, tarry your
gallant
kinsmen, Don Hernando. Many will
blame us for the deeds which we have wrought
in thy behalf, young Spaniard. All our
countrymen
must
hate us, and if we 'scape this
'venture, our future home must be within the
scope of Spain's all-powerful protection. All
peril is over now for a space, and if thou art
weary, my sweet sister, here may we rest
awhile.
No, no! Guarica interrupted him,
breathless
from the wild speed at which they had
thus far journeyed. No, no! no, no! we
will not pause till we have reached the
cavaliers
.
At least, however, interposed Hernando,
using the Indian tongue, which was no less
familiar to him than his native languageat
least, let us, if we be free from present danger,
ride somewhat gently, in order that our steeds
may so regain their wind, and be in ease again
to bear us stoutly, if aught should call for
fresh exertion of mettle.
Be it so, answered Orozimbo, turning his
horse's head, and riding as he spoke up the
green margin of the rivulet, till he stood on the
level meadow, where he was joined by his
companionsBe it so. Well I am assured
no foeman could have followed with such
speed as to be less than two leagues distant in
our rearand on this open plain none can
approach
us undetected. One hour's advance
will bring us to a band of horsemen, under the
bold Ojeda, that would contemn the might of
Caonabo's tribe.
Taking the lead once more, he trotted gently
forward, the daylight brightening more and
more till the great sun burst from the cloudy
veil that curtained his bright orient chamber,
and filled the earth with lustre and rejoicing.
Love, which, oppressed by doubt, anxiety,
and care, had been remembered only to
aggravate their sorrows and increase their
apprehensions, resumed, beneath that
gladsome
light, its more legitimate and wonted
functions, and, before many moments had
elapsed, Hernando was recounting to the
attentive
ears of the sweet Indian girl his confident
and certain expectations of an immediate
termination
to all the obstacles which had thus far
opposed their union, while he inquired eagerly
into the late mysterious history of his surprise,
imprisonment, and rescue. Few words
sufficed
to make all clear. Chance, aloneblind
and sudden chancehad brought about his
capturea chance which had in fact preserved
the Spanish settlements from certain peril
probable destruction. Apprised, as has been
mentioned heretofore, of the relaxed discipline
and contemptuous negligence of military usages
which had crept on the garrison during the
absence
of its great commander, the wily Charib
had assembled all his bold tributary hordes,
and was even then in full march to commence
an onslaught on walls which he most assuredly
would have found mounted with culverins
unloaded
and watchedor unwatched rather
by sentinels unarmed and sleeping. And
despite
the exertions of Guarica, had the
assailants
not been delayed by the arrival of the
duellists, and the protracted conflict which held
the Charibs gazing in mute wonder, Ojeda's
tidings would have been all too late to save the
city from surprise. As it was, he arrived just
in time; and the report of Caonabo's scouts,
who reported the garrison to be so thoroughly
on the alert that it was clear they must have
received intelligence, determined the cacique to
retreat instantly, and wait a better opportunity.
Hernando's eyes had not deceived him; for
it was in truth Orozimbo, whom he had seen
disputing with Caonabo; and, as he surmised,
it was concerning himself that the argument
was maintained so angrily; the young man
insisting
on his release, and his uncle,
maddened
by his disappointment, refusing
positively
to keep the word which he had plighted
for his safety.
This refusal perhaps it was which,
awakening
a generous indignation on the boy's part,
determined him, yet more than his sympathy
in his beloved sister's affection, to effect by one
means or other the escape of the young
Spaniard
.
In this intent, he judged it best to
accompany
the band on their march; and to carry
out his plans better he appeared to acquiesce
in his uncle's views, and avoided all
communication
with, or apparent interest in the
prisoner
.
Within half an hour of the capture,
however
,
he contrived to send off news of what
had happened to his sister, by a messenger on
whom he could rely, desiring her to seek aid
from the very man to whom she was most
willing to apply, Alonzo de Ojeda; and to
meet him prepared with horses, and with
Spanish
aid at hand, the next morning at a point
which he indicated.
Arrived at the hill fortress, he easily
obtained
the release of Alonzo, on whom the
Charibs set no value, on condition that he
should be blindfolded until he was some miles
distant from the fort.
This once conceded, he seemingly gave up
all further interest in Hernando; and, on
pretence
of conveying the boy homeward, had an
interview with his father and Ojeda, arranged
all the further particulars of the escape, and
conducted it with an energy and skill which
ensured its complete success.
The only danger that remained now to be
apprehended was that some roving band,
several
of which Orozimbo knew to be out, might
discover the bivouac of Ojeda's horsemen, and,
suspecting an escape, attempt to ambush the
fugitives. Of this, however, there appeared to
be little risk, conducted, as their flight had
been, with so much craft and discretion.
And now the wide savannah was already
passed, and at the verge of the forest, within a
short half mile of the spot where Ojeda waited
their arrival, with ears and soul intent on every
sound that might betoken their approach, they
had to cross a narrow streamlet, running
between
deep and wooded banks. Orozimbo, who
was their guide, still led the way, and was in
the middle of the ford, while Hernando with
the maiden was descending the steep path
which led to it, when the well known twang
of the Indian bow was heard, and an arrow
whizzed through the air, so truly aimed that it
passed through the Spaniard's high crowned
hat.
Push on, cried the quick-witted youth
upon the instant; push on, boy, to close
quarters, and, as he spoke, snatching a
pistol
from his holster, he dashed his spurs into
his horse's flanks, and passing Orozimbo in
mid channel, drove up the opposite ascent,
followed by his page, sword in hand.
Then from the brushwood rose a loud,
wild yell, accompanied by a flight of long
Charib shaftsclose to the head and breast of
De Leon they hurtled, but none took effect on
him, or on Alonzo. A sharp cry rang,
however
,
from the rear, followed almost
immediately
by a splash in the shallow water, and
then, with bridle loose and bloodstained
housings
,
the steed of Orozimbo darted at a fierce
gallop onward. Scarce had Hernando
reached
the brow of the ravine before, with
levelled
pikes and brandished war-clubs, a dozen
Charibs rushed against him; and one, more
daring than his fellows, seized on his bridle
rein. Not half a second did he keep his hold,
for, levelled at a hand's breadth of his head,
Hernando's pistol flashed with unerring aim
the bullet crashed through the Indian's
temples
,
and he fell without a word or a groan,
beneath the charger's feet. Rising upon the
instant in his stirrups, the bold cavalier hurled,
with a sure and steady hand, the discharged
weapon in the face of his next opponent.
Then, before he had seen the effect, although
it felled the savage stunned and headlong to
the earth, he unsheathed his trusty rapier with
one hand, while with the other, casting his
bridle loose, he drew and discharged fatally
his second pistol.
All this had passed with the speed of light,
and Alonzo, having at the same time cut
down the first of his assailants, the Indians
broke away on all sides, and it seemed as if
they might have effected their escape; and
so in fact they might have done, had the
young Spaniard chosen to abandon
Orozimbo
to his fate; but such was not his nature.
Reining his charger sharply up, he turned his
head, and called aloud upon the faithful
Indian
.
At the same point of time the Charibs,
who had scattered diverse before his headlong
charge, began again to rally, and one, the
boldest of their number, fitting an arrow to
his bow-string, drew it with steady and swift
aim quite to the head, the cord twanged
sharply, and the shaft took effect right in the
broad breast of Hernando's war horse,
transfixing
his embroidered poitrel. Headlong he
fell to earth, and as he fell, the savages,
gaining
fresh courage, made a simultaneous rush
upon the hapless rider.
So speedily, however, had the skilful
soldier
regained his foothold, and so powerfully
did he wield his rapier, that they still feared
to close with him absolutely. Not so,
however
,
with the fair Guarica, for dislodged from
her seat by the shock of the charger's
downfall
,
she had been thrown to some yards
distance
and seized, as soon as she had touched
the ground, by a gigantic savage, who all
athirst forvengeance and for blood, brandished
his ponderous war-club round his head in the
very act to smite, while hampered by their
numerous foemen, neither Hernando nor the
page could possibly assist her at this fearful
crisis. Just at this moment, the fast,
thick-beating
tramp of many horses at full gallop
was heard by both parties, and the continuous
crashing of the brushwood, through which a
band of Europeans was, it was evident,
advancing
.
The near sound, it would seem,
inspired
both parties with fresh vigorthe
savages
trying to finish their fell work before
they should be interruptedthe Spaniards
gaining confidence and hope from the vicinity
of friends. Too late, however, would the
arrival of Ojeda on the scene of action have
proved to save Guarica, though now he might
be even within two hundred yards, plying his
bloody spurs, and brandishing aloft his
formidable
rapier. Thrice did Hernando rush
upon the Indians in the vain hope of
succoring
his promised bride, striking down at each
charge a Charib warrior; but each time he
was driven back by force of irresistible
numbers
;
and nothing could have saved her from
sure death, had not a bloody form, ghastly,
deathstricken, arisen like a spectre from the
channel of the streamarmed with a Spanish
bladefaithful in death itself, young
Orozimbo
!
Though faint and staggering, he plied
his keen sword with such mortal energy,
that all shrank back from its downright
descent
.
The chief who had seized Guarica,
and whose averted head beheld not the
approach
of this new combatant, received the
full sway of its sheer edge on his bended
neck. Through muscle, spine, and marrow,
the trenchant blade drove unresisted.
Loosing
his grasp upon his captive, he dropped
dead without a word or struggle; and carried
onward by his own impetus, the Charib boy
fell over him, and lay beside him in his
bloodmotionless, although living still. A
second more, and with their battle cry,
Saint Jago! the fiery Spaniards were
upon themwith flash, and shot, and stab,
and stroke, till not an enemy remained alive
upon the bank of the small stream, which,
late so pure and lucid, flowed now all dark,
curdled, and thick with human gore. Ere yet
the mortal struggle was well over, Hernando
caught Guarica to his arms, and the page
Alonzo upraised the body of her faithful
brother
from the earth, and wiped the foam and
gore from his pale lips, while the stern
Spaniards
stood around, mute and awe-stricken,
leaning on the weapons which reeked yet
with the homicidal witness. One form was
there beside Alonzo de Ojeda, on whom
Hernando's
eyes, engrossed by the sad spectacle
before him, had not yet fallena tall and
noble
form, gorgeously clad in scarlet, with
much lace and embroidery of gold. But it
was not the gorgeous dress, scarlet, nor lace,
nor gold, but the long locks of snow shading
that broad and massive browthe air of
conscious
dignity and inborn worth, the impress
of unutterable thought united to invincible
resolve, that stamped upon that face and
figure
a natural majesty exceeding that of
princes
a
majesty becoming the discoverer of
worlds! Silent he stood, and sorrowful;
while the boy Orozimbo, placing the fair hand
of his sister, who, with her lover, knelt above
him in speechless agony of woe, in that of
the young Spaniard, strove hard but
fruitlessly
,
against the grasp of death, which wa
now grappling with his very soul, to give
his feelings soundgasping forth something
of which naught could be heard but the
wordsTake her, love and protecthis
eyes rolled wildly, as he struggled to fix them
on the beloved brow of her for whom he was
dyinghis lips were fearfully convulsed, and
with one murmurSistersister! he sank
upon the earth, as still and senseless as
its least valued clod. Then that great man
broke silence
This is the visible and present hand of
God! Take her, Hernandoshe is yours
yours in the face of man and before God!
Take her to be your wife, for ever and
forever
and
as to her you do prove faithful,
true, and lovingso may it be with you and
yours, here and hereafter!
And the wide forest aisles re-echoed to
the deep Amen, which burst impressively
from the stern lips of the Spanish warriors.
The tenderness of her espoused lord
effaced
,
in time, the cloud from the fair Indian's
brow; and if the source of their first early
love was troubled, so was it not in its
meridian
tide! Happy they lived, and honored,
and when at length they paid the debt, which
all must pay to nature, it was among the
tears of children so numerous and noble, that
to this very day many, the grandest of Spain's
nobility, are proud to claim descent from
Hernando
de Leon and his bright Charib Bride!
THE END.